THE  ROLE  OF  COMMUNITY  COLLEGES

21ST  CENTURY  ECONOMY

AND  INDUSTRY  IN  MEETING  THE

DEMANDS  FOR  SKILLED  PRODUCTION
WORKERS  AND  TECHNICIANS  IN  THE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  19,  2007

Serial No. 110–42

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

36–000PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington,  Chairman

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JIM  WILSON  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  19,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Brian  Baird,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .......................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .......................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Gerald  Pumphrey,  President,  South  Puget  Sound  Community  College
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Stephen J. Fonash, Center for Nanotechnology Education and Utilization,

Pennsylvania State University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Mr. Eric Mittelstadt, CEO, National Council for Advance Manufacturing

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Monica  L.  Poindexter,  Associate  Director,  Corporate  Diversity,

Genentech, Incorporated

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr. Gerald Pumphrey, President, South Puget Sound Community College .......
Dr. Stephen J. Fonash, Center for Nanotechnology Education and Utilization,
Pennsylvania State University ...........................................................................
Mr. Eric Mittelstadt, CEO, National Council for Advance Manufacturing ........

(III)

8
9

10
12

12

13

14
16
20

20
22
29

30
31
36

37
38
40
41

64

66
68

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Ms.  Monica  L.  Poindexter,  Associate  Director,  Corporate  Diversity,
Genentech, Incorporated ......................................................................................

Page

70

IV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  ROLE  OF  COMMUNITY  COLLEGES  AND
INDUSTRY  IN  MEETING  THE  DEMANDS  FOR
SKILLED  PRODUCTION  WORKERS  AND
TECHNICIANS  IN  THE  21ST  CENTURY  ECON-
OMY

TUESDAY,  JUNE  19,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  3:03  p.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Brian  Baird
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Role of Community Colleges

and Industry in Meeting the

Demands for Skilled Production
Workers and Technicians in the

21st Century Economy

TUESDAY, JUNE 19, 2007

3:00 P.M.–5:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

The  purpose  of  this  hearing  is  to  explore  the  current  challenges  facing  industry
in  meeting  its  needs  for  skilled  technicians  and  production  workers  in  advanced
manufacturing  and  other  technology  intensive  sectors.  Witnesses  will  identify  the
issues contributing to the problem and address the mechanisms community colleges
and industry at large are employing to increase the number of these skilled individ-
uals in the workforce.
Issues

• What  are  the  biggest  challenges  to  attracting  more  individuals  to  careers  as
skilled production workers and technicians? What are community colleges and
industry doing to attract more individuals to these careers?

• What  are  key  factors  in  successful  partnerships  between  tech-training  pro-
grams  and  community  colleges?  How  have  both  community  colleges  and  in-
dustry had to adapt to meet each others’ needs?

• How  are  community  colleges  training  students  to  deal  with  the  fast-paced
changes that occur in modern industry? How can industry facilitate this type
of learning?

Witnesses

• Dr.  Gerald  Pumphrey  is  the  President  of  South  Puget  Sound  Community
College,  Olympia,  Washington.  He  has  had  extensive  experience  developing
technician  training  programs  for  community  colleges  and  engaging  industry
partnerships in Washington and North Carolina.

• Dr. Stephan Fonash is  the  Director  of  the  Center  for  Nanotechnology  Edu-
cation  and  Utilization,  Pennsylvania  State  University’s  Nano-Technician  Ad-
vance  Technology  Education  Center.  The  center,  developed  in  response  to  in-
dustry  needs,  serves  as  a  regional  hub  for  Pennsylvania  community  colleges
to train students in advanced manufacturing.

• Mr.  Eric  Mittelstadt  is  the  CEO  of  the  National  Advisory  Council  for  Ad-
vanced  Manufacturing  (NACFAM),  which  is  an  industry-led,  non-profit  orga-
nization  that  develops  and  advocates  public  policies  that  foster  the  growth
and development of the U.S. advanced manufacturing sector.

• Ms.  Monica  Poindexter  is  Associate  Director,  Corporate  Diversity,  for
Genentech,  Inc.,  a  large  California  based  biotechnology  company.  Ms.
Poindexter has worked with local community colleges to develop training pro-
grams  for  dislocated  workers  and  others  to  help  meet  Genentech’s  needs  for
technicians and skilled production workers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

Brief Overview

Technology  and  innovation  have  kept  the  American  economy  strong  in  the  face
of  increasing  competition  in  the  global  marketplace.  Many  reports  have  stated  the
critical  importance  of  American  science  and  engineering  graduates  in  helping  the
country’s economy keep pace with this rapid change. The National Academies’ 2006
publication,  Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm,  is  one  of  the  most  recent  and  influ-
ential of these reports. As industry moves toward producing more high-tech products
and employing technology intensive production methods, the need for technologically
and  scientifically  literate  individuals  at  all  levels  of  the  workforce  will  increase.
Thus, the need for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) train-
ing  is  now  as  important  for  the  worker  running  the  production  process,  as  it  is  for
the researcher who created that process.
Manufacturing Jobs in the U.S. Economy

The U.S. economy has lost a considerable number of manufacturing jobs. Still, the
sector  is  responsible  for  14  percent  of  the  country’s  GDP  and  11  percent  of  its  em-
ployment,  employing  over  14  million  workers.  Despite  cuts  in  the  number  of  work-
ers, productivity in manufacturing has increased substantially. The key to this pro-
ductivity has been the adoption of technology by U.S. firms. Increasingly, production
in American factories is driven by technology, giving rise to the term advanced man-
ufacturing  to  describe  the  activities  of  today’s  factories.1 According  to  the  National
Council for Advanced Manufacturing, advanced manufacturing makes extensive use
of  computer,  high  precision,  and  information  technologies  and  a  high  performance
workforce to efficiently produce many different types of ‘‘high-tech’’ or commonplace
products.

Many  reports  find  that  there  are  not  enough  people  with  the  requisite  skills  to
fill the manufacturing jobs that remain. Moreover, just as technology has fundamen-
tally  changed  the  nature  of  manufacturing,  it  has  also  changed  or  created  many
other  jobs,  such  as  environmental  technicians  and  information  technology  special-
ists.  Low-skilled  jobs,  like  those  that  used  to  exist  at  many  factories,  are  increas-
ingly  rare  in  manufacturing;  technician  and  production  work  is  now  highly  special-
ized and highly skilled. Industry has found it difficult to find enough qualified work-
ers for these jobs. The Manufacturing in America report cites the lack of adequately
skilled workers for production jobs as an important issue that needs to be addressed
to  ensure  the  competitiveness  of  American  manufacturing.  In  the  2005  Skills  Gap
Report—A  Survey  of  the  American  Manufacturing  Workforce,  the  National  Associa-
tion of Manufacturers (NAM) surveyed their members and found that 80 percent of
manufacturing  companies  surveyed  reported  difficulty  in  finding  enough  skilled
workers,  and  90  percent  reported  a  shortage  of  skilled  production  employees.  Simi-
lar  findings  are  reported  by  Manpower  Inc.,  a  leading  company  in  the  employment
services  industry.  Their  2007  Talent  Shortage  Survey  Result,  released  with  a  cor-
responding  white  paper,  found  that  skilled  technician  and  production  jobs  ranked
as  the  fourth  most  difficult  positions  for  U.S.  employers  to  fill  and  the  third  most
difficult when looked at internationally. Employers today need their technicians and
production workers to be technologically literate and have math and problem-solving
skills, while also having ‘‘soft skills,’’ like communication abilities and a strong work
ethic.

Many  states  have  studied  their  own  industry  needs  and  concluded  that  their
workforce is lacking in the requisite skills. This issue is prevalent at the ‘‘mid-level’’
of preparation, referring to those that have post-secondary training, but not a Bach-
elor’s degree. In a 2005 study of the needs of New Jersey manufacturers, specialized
fields  like  scientific  glassware,  chemical  processing,  and  food  processing  were  pro-
jected  to  grow  in  New  Jersey  despite  an  overall  decline  of  manufacturing  jobs.  The
report  noted  that  these  industries  will  need  workers  who  ‘‘possess  the  technical  ex-
pertise to both understand underlying principles of the production process and inter-
act  effectively  with  advanced  machines  and  computers  to  control  these  processes,’’
and  it  highlighted  that  the  state  did  not  have  enough  of  these  people  in  its  work-

1 U.S. Department of Commerce, Manufacturing in America: A Comprehensive Strategy to Ad-

dress the Challenges to U.S. Manufacturers, January 2004.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

force.2 Similar  reports  noting  the  shortage  of  workers  for  skilled  production  and
technician jobs can be found in Washington3, Indiana4, Ohio5, and Texas6.

State and local officials realize that the presence of skilled workers in their popu-
lation is an important factor in the growth and development of industry within their
borders.  For  instance,  Arizona’s  Two-Year  State  Workforce  Investment  Plan:  June
2005–June 2007 stresses the importance of a well trained workforce for the develop-
ment of its economy and places increased training of workers for its high-tech indus-
tries as one of the state’s priority goals. Furthermore, Maricopa Community College,
in  Phoenix,  commissioned  its  own  study  highlighting  the  importance  tech-training
has  on  the  development  of  the  regional  economy.7 Georgia  is  also  among  the  states
attempting to use access to tech-training to attract businesses to the state.8
Community College Programs

Community and technical college programs can produce the kind of graduates in-
dustry  needs  to  fill  these  positions.  These  institutions  have  long  been  involved  in
training  technicians  for  the  Nation’s  workforce,  but  there  is  now  a  growing  aware-
ness  that  community  colleges  can  provide  industry  with  the  adequately  skilled
workers  it  needs.  Serving  as  models  for  technology  training,  the  National  Science
Foundation (NSF) Advanced Technology Education (ATE) centers at community col-
leges develop tech-training programs that prepare students for a wide variety of jobs
in  high-tech  settings.  This  program  funds  33  centers  throughout  the  country  that
offer  both  training  for  local  community  college  students  and  a  research  enterprise
to  develop  and  disseminate  best  teaching  and  curriculum  practices  for  fields  such
as  biotechnology,  chemical  processing,  advanced  manufacturing,  and  information
technology.  These  programs  rely  on  a  partnership  between  the  community  college
and  industry,  and  throughout  the  country  other  institutions  can  look  to  ATEs  as
they develop their own training programs.

Feedback from both colleges and industry personnel on their partnerships, in gen-
eral,  and  ATEs,  specifically,  is  positive.  Employers  like  and  readily  hire  the  grad-
uates of these programs. However, community colleges face many challenges in cre-
ating and developing tech-training programs. Perhaps the most vexing is that these
programs  often  face  low  enrollment.  Since  community  colleges  typically  incur  a
much greater expense in capital costs and maintenance for these programs, they can
find it difficult to begin or continue a program without a large number of students,
especially  on  their  relatively  tight  operating  budgets.  Both  community  college  per-
sonnel and industry representatives claim that careers in manufacturing are either
unknown by or considered undesirable by students and their parents. NAM has re-
cently begun an outreach campaign to high school students to counter their negative
perceptions.  ATE  programs  also  engage  in  outreach  but  it  is  unclear  as  to  the  de-
gree of their success in these endeavors.

An  issue  very  closely  related  to  attracting  large  numbers  of  students  to  the  pro-
gram  is  the  inadequate  math  and  science  backgrounds  of  many  students  enrolled
in  community  colleges.  Community  colleges  must  attract  students  to  these  pro-
grams,  while  also  taking  measures  to  remediate  basic  skills,  most  commonly  in
math.  Another  challenge  the  community  college  must  address  is  balancing  its  role
as a ‘‘feeder’’ institution for four year programs with its ability to deliver specialized
training  for  industry.  Though  articulation  between  tech-training  programs  and  uni-
versity  is  not  always  possible,  community  college  administrators  and  tech-training
faculty are increasingly embracing the need to endow their technology students with
problem-solving  skills  and  an  ability  and  willingness  to  learn  so  as  to  enable  them
to navigate the inevitably changing skill needs of industry.

Highly  involved  industry  partners  are  a  common  theme  among  the  most  success-
ful  tech-training  programs.  Representatives  from  both  industry  and  colleges  claim

2 New Jersey State Employment and Training Commission, Ready for the Job: Understanding
Occupational  and  Skill  Demand  in  New  Jersey’s  Manufacturing  Industry,  Chemical  Processing,
Food Processing, Glass Production, and Printing and Publishing, Spring 2004.

3 Washington  State’s  Higher  Education  Coordinating  Board,  State  Board  for  Community  and
Technical  Colleges,  and  Workforce  Training  and  Education  Coordination  Board,  A  Skilled  and
Educated  Workforce:  An  Assessment  of  the  Number  and  Type  of  Higher  Education  and  training
Credentials Required to Meet Employer Demand, January 2006.

4 The Indianapolis Private Industry Council, Industry Transformation: Growth and Change in

Advanced Manufacturing in Central Indiana, Spring 2006.

5 Rhodes  State  College,  Building  an  Advanced  Manufacturing  Pathway  in  West  Central  Ohio:

A Study of Manufacturing Workforce Development Needs, Fall 2004.

6 Texas Workforce Commission, Strategic Plan: Fiscal Years 2007–2011, 2007.
7 Battelle’s  Technology  Partnership  Practice,  Prepared  for  Maricopa  Community  College  Dis-
trict  and  the  Salt  River  Project,  Competing  with  Talent:  High-Technology  Manufacturing’s  Fu-
ture in Greater Phoenix, December 2005.

8 http://www.gaworkready.org/Technical¥Colleges/aboutTechColleges.html

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

that a willingness to devote time and resources to the partnership is crucial for the
program  to  yield  the  most  qualified  graduates.  Studies  like  Manpower  Inc.’s  2007
Talent  Shortage  Survey  Result  suggest  industries  partner  with  educational  institu-
tion based tech-training programs to address the high need for more qualified work-
ers.
Questions to Witnesses
Dr. Pumphrey was asked to address the following questions:

• What factors are involved in a decision by a community college when deciding
whether  to  develop  or  continue  a  tech-training  program  in  a  particular  field?
How  does  the  college  evaluate  the  potential  impact  of  the  program  in  com-
parison  to  its  associated  costs?  What  are  the  biggest  challenges  faced  by  a
community  college  in  either  initiating  or  continuing  a  program  with  low  en-
rollment?

• What  factors  influence  the  low  enrollment  of  tech-training  programs?  How
can  low  enrollment  be  remedied?  What  efforts  do  your  college  and  others
make  to  attract  the  widest  possible  population  of  students  to  tech-training?
• What challenges does inadequate math/science preparation pose to tech-train-
ing  programs?  Do  you  know  of  colleges  engaged  in  innovative  ways  of  ad-
dressing  this  dilemma,  particularly  through  collaborating  with  secondary
schools?

• What is an industry partner’s ideal role in a community college tech-training

program? Please elaborate on your experiences with industry partners.

• What  impacts  do  shifts  in  industry  demand  have  on  tech-training  programs

and how do community colleges address these?

Dr. Fonash was asked to address the following questions:

• Please  describe  the  evolution  of  your  program—how  it  began  in  response  to
industry’s  stated  needs  and  how  the  program  has  changed  as  the  industry
needs  and  focuses  have  changed.  Please  describe  how  the  program  adjusted
after the drop-off in demand for semi-conductor manufacturing technicians oc-
curred around the year 2000. How do you prepare your students to be adapt-
able to the changing needs in high-tech manufacturing?

• What  demographic  profile  does  your  program  draw?  How  have  you  faced  the

challenge of recruiting more students to your program?

• How  do  you  determine  your  math/science  curriculum?  What  steps  do  your
partner  community  college  institutions  take  to  ensure  students  can  meet  the
demands of your program?

• What is the ideal role for industry partners in developing and running a suc-
cessful  tech-training  program?  Please  elaborate  on  industry’s  role  in  creating
skill standards, developing curriculum, providing student development oppor-
tunities, defraying the cost of equipment, and hiring graduates.

Mr. Middlestadt was asked to address the following questions:

• How have the labor needs of the manufacturing sector changed, and what do
the  current  and  near-future  opportunities  look  like  for  graduates  of  tech-
training  programs?  Are  there  technician  shortages  in  advanced  manufac-
turing and is the problem more concentrated in particular industries?

• What  steps,  such  as  increasing  wages,  benefits,  and  training,  or  being  more
flexible  with  their  hiring  qualifications  are  companies  taking  to  attract  more
students to careers as skilled technicians and production workers? Also, what
are  companies  individually  and  collectively  doing  to  raise  the  perception  of
manufacturing careers among current students and potential students?

• What influences a company’s decision to take an active partnership role in ad-
vising  a  community  college  tech-prep  program?  From  an  industry  point  of
view,  what  factors  foster  a  successful  partnership?  To  what  extent  can  par-
ticular  industries  prepare  training  programs  for  changes  in  the  skills  they
need?

• One of NACFAM’s current focuses is on STEM education. Can you please de-
scribe how deficiencies in STEM education affect a company at the technician
and production worker level of its workforce?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Ms. Monica Poindexter was asked to address the following questions:

7

• Please  describe  how  Genentech’s  partnership  with  local  community  colleges
began, how it currently operates, and its plans for future directions. What fac-
tors contribute to the development and maintenance of a successful program?
What challenges did you need to address in developing this program?
• What is the ideal role for the community college in providing training for your
• How  does  Genentech  benefit  from  hiring  community  college  graduates?  How
important are well qualified technicians and production workers to your busi-
ness?
• What opportunities does Genentech provide to its technicians and skilled pro-
• How  can  community  colleges  and  industry  attract  more  people  to  careers  as

duction workers to develop new skills as your industry changes?

future employees?

technicians and skilled production workers?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman BAIRD. Good afternoon. I would like to welcome every-
body to today’s hearing which will look at the vital role skilled pro-
duction workers and technicians play in today’s workforce.

The Science and Technology Committee as a whole, and this sub-
committee,  particularly,  is  focused  on  improving  math  and  science
education.  In  this  technology-driven  world,  giving  our  students  a
thorough  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics,  or  as
we  say,  STEM,  education  is  the  best  way  to  ensure  that  they,  and
our country, will stay competitive and prosperous.

Reports  like  the  National  Academies’  Rising  Above  the  Gather
Storm, have sent up a number of red flags warning that we are not
graduating  nearly  as  many  scientists  and  engineers  to  keep  up
with the growing economies in China and India.

Similarly  troubling  are  recent  reports  that  we  may  not  have
enough qualified individuals to take the production jobs and techni-
cian  jobs  that  keep  U.S.  manufacturing  and  other  industries  run-
ning.  According  to  the  National  Association  of  Manufacturers,  80
percent  of  their  survey  respondents  report  difficulties  in  finding
qualified  people  to  run  their  production  processes  and  serve  as
technicians. Other State and regional studies report that manufac-
turers in their areas are experiencing the same difficulties.

It  is  well  known  that  U.S.  manufacturing  has  lost  a  significant
number  of  jobs  in  recent  years,  whether  to  off-shoring  or  automa-
tion; but this is only part of the story. Our manufactures have em-
braced technology and lean production methods to stay competitive
within  the  global  economy.  This,  in  turn,  has  shifted  the  labor  re-
quirements  away  from  unskilled  workers  to  skilled,  technology-lit-
erate  men  and  woman  who  can  run  and  maintain  complex  ma-
chines  and  produce  a  high-quality  product.  These  jobs  do  not  re-
quire  a  Bachelor’s  degree  at  all  times,  but  they  do  require  special-
ized  knowledge;  a  good  understanding  of  technology,  math  and
science;  good  problem-solving  skills  and  strong  communication
skills. And since the footprint of technology has profoundly changed
many jobs, it is not just the manufacturers that rely on people with
these skills.

Unfortunately,  however,  today’s  students  do  not  seem  motivated
to  go  into  manufacturing  or  purse  technician  jobs.  Many  are  un-
aware  that  manufacturing  is  a  good  career  path  or  that  the  jobs
are even available. Their impressions, shaped by parents, teachers,
and  the  media,  often  see  factories,  and  hence  manufacturing,  as
dirty and dreary. As our witnesses, however, will attest today, this
is  not  the  case  in  modern  factories,  which  are  clean  and  not  at  all
characterized  by  drudgery.  As  increasing  numbers  of 
‘‘baby-
boomers’’ retire, changing the impression of young people will be an
important part of recruiting more young people to these jobs.

Offering  our  students  training  opportunities  for  promising  ca-
reers  is  just  as  important  as  changing  their  perceptions.  Commu-
nity  colleges  can  provide  this  bridge  to  students—those  fresh  from
high  school  as  well  as  older  students  who  may  be  retraining  for
other work. Many of these schools offer tech-training programs that
prepare students with the kinds of skills now highly in demand by
industry.

The  National  Science  Foundation  funds  the  operation  of  33  cen-
ters  around  the  country  that  are  at  the  forefront  of  tech-training

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

education.  Specializing  in  training  for  careers  as  diverse  as  envi-
ronmental  technician  or  micro-systems  specialist,  these  centers
offer  excellent  training  to  students  at  their  host  institutions  and
work  to  provide  community  colleges  across  the  country  with  best
practices in curriculum and industry skill standards. These centers
maintain strong partnerships with industries that guide the devel-
opment of a program. One of the important focuses of this hearing
is  how  these  partnerships  between  community  colleges  and  indus-
try  create  the  programs  that  are  most  beneficial  to  students  and
to their future employers.

As  we  will  hear  this  afternoon  from  our  outstanding  witnesses,
community  colleges  face  steep  challenges  to  implementing  these
important  programs.  Mainly,  the  programs  suffer  from  unfortu-
nately low enrollment in some cases, which makes them difficult to
develop  and  maintain  on  a  community  college’s  tight  budget.  Also
the  schools  must  deal  with  the  reality  that  many  of  their  students
are  not  adequately  prepared  coming  in,  in  basic  math  and  science
to immediately enter these programs, which sometimes discourages
potential  applicants.  These  are  challenges  that  must  be  addressed
if the country is to have a workforce that is congruent with indus-
try needs.

Most  importantly,  I  hope  this  hearing  will  highlight  that  it  is
time  to  get  serious  about  better  equipping  all  students  to  compete
in  the  global  economy.  There  are  good  jobs  waiting  to  be  had,  and
if  we  don’t  want  to  lose  those  jobs  because  companies  can’t  find
qualified employees here in the U.S., we need to act. And I look for-
ward to the comments of our outstanding witnesses today.

And  with  that,  I  now  recognize  Dr.  Ehlers  for  an  opening  state-

ment.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Baird follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BRIAN BAIRD

Good  afternoon.  I’d  like  to  welcome  everybody  to  today’s  hearing  which  will  look
at  the  vital  role  skilled  production  workers  and  technicians  play  in  today’s  work-
force.

The  Science  and  Technology  Committee  as  a  whole,  and  this  subcommittee  espe-
cially,  is  very  focused  on  improving  math  and  science  education.  In  this  technology
driven  world,  giving  our  students  a  thorough  science,  technology,  engineering,  and
mathematics—or  STEM—education  is  the  best  way  to  ensure  that  they,  and  our
country, will stay competitive and prosperous.

Recent  reports,  like  the  National  Academies’  Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm,
have  sent  up  red  flags  warning  that  we  are  not  graduating  nearly  as  many  sci-
entists  and  engineers  to  keep  up  with  the  growing  economies  in  China  and  India.
Similarly troubling are recent reports that we may not have enough qualified indi-
viduals  to  take  the  production  jobs  and  technician  jobs  that  keep  U.S.  manufac-
turing and other industries running. According to the National Association of Manu-
facturers, 80 percent of their survey respondents report difficulties in finding quali-
fied  people  to  run  their  production  processes  and  serve  as  technicians.  Other  State
and  regional  studies  report  that  manufacturers  in  their  areas  are  experiencing  the
same difficulties.

It  is  well  known  that  U.S.  manufacturing  has  lost  a  significant  number  of  jobs
in recent years either to off-shoring or automation. But this is only part of the story.
U.S. manufacturers have embraced technology and lean production methods to stay
competitive  within  the  global  economy.  This  has  shifted  the  labor  requirements
away from unskilled workers to skilled, technology-literate men and women who can
run  and  maintain  complex  machines  and  ensure  a  high-quality  product  These  jobs
do  not  require  a  Bachelor’s  degree,  but  they  do  require  specialized  knowledge;  a
good  understanding  of  technology,  math,  and  science;  good  problem  solving  skills
and  good  communication  skills.  And,  since  the  footprint  of  technology  has  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

foundly  changed  many  jobs,  it’s  not  just  manufacturers  that  rely  on  people  with
these skills.

Unfortunately,  today’s  students  do  not  seem  motivated  to  go  into  manufacturing
or pursue technician jobs. Many of them are unaware that manufacturing is a good
career path or that these jobs are even available. Their impressions, shaped by par-
ents, teachers, and the media, see factories as dirty and dreary. As I’m sure our wit-
nesses  will  attest  today,  this  is  not  the  case  in  many  modern  factories,  which  are
clean  and  not  characterized  by  drudgery.  As  increasing  numbers  of  ‘‘baby-boomers’’
retire,  changing  the  impressions  of  young  people  will  be  an  important  part  of  re-
cruiting more young people to these jobs.

Offering  students  training  opportunities  for  promising  careers  in  these  fields  is
just  as  important  as  changing  their  perceptions.  Community  colleges  can  provide
this  bridge  to  students-  those  fresh  from  high  school  and  as  well  as  older  students.
Many  of  these  schools  offer  tech-training  programs  that  prepare  students  with  the
kinds of skills now highly in demand by industry.

The  National  Science  Foundation  funds  the  operation  of  33  centers  around  the
country that are at the forefront of tech-training education. Specializing in training
for careers as diverse as environmental technician or micro-systems specialist, these
centers  offer  excellent  training  to  students  at  their  host  institutions  and  work  to
provide community colleges across the country with best practices in curriculum and
industry  skill  standards.  These  centers  maintain  strong  partnerships  with  industry
that guide the development of a program. One of the important focuses of this hear-
ing  is  how  these  partnerships  between  community  colleges  and  industry  create  the
programs that are most beneficial to students and their future employers.

As we will hear this afternoon, community colleges face steep challenges to imple-
menting  these  important  programs.  Mainly,  the  programs  suffer  from  low  enroll-
ment, making them difficult to develop and maintain on a community college’s tight
budget. Also, the schools must deal with the reality that many of their students are
not adequately prepared in math and science to immediately enter these programs,
which  discourages  potential  applicants.  These  are  challenges  that  must  be  ad-
dressed  if  the  country  is  to  have  a  workforce  that  is  congruent  with  industry’s
needs.

Most  importantly,  I  hope  this  hearing  will  highlight  that  it’s  time  to  get  serious
about  better  equipping  ALL  students  to  compete  in  the  global  economy.  These  are
good  jobs  and  it  we  don’t  want  to  lose  them  because  companies  can’t  find  enough
qualified employees here in the U.S.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
A century-and-a-quarter ago, 80 percent of our workforce worked
on  farms.  That  began  to  change  at  that  time,  with  the  beginning
of  the  industrial  era.  Most  of  the  workers  did  not  have  a  high
school  education,  but  they  didn’t  need  it  for  the  industries  of  that
time, the manufacturers, for two reasons. First of all, the manufac-
turing  process  was  fairly  simple.  Secondly,  when  you  grow  up  on
a  farm,  you  learn  an  immense  amount  about  machinery.  You  live
with  tools.  You  learn  how  to  make  things  and  do  things,  and  so
they  transferred  very  easily  into  the  industrial  workplace  and  into
manufacturing. Today, technical training and jobs have change sig-
nificantly since that time and even since I joined the workforce. At
that time, many manufacturing workers did not need a high school
diploma to do their job well, and if they had a high school diploma
it  was  a  definite  plus.  Things  have  changed.  Today,  we  hear  from
employers that the K–12 education system is not sufficiently train-
ing  students  to  meet  the  demand  for  technically-skilled  positions.
My mantra has been that all jobs require a basic understanding of
science and math and technical jobs are no exception. We must im-
prove science, technology, engineering and math literacy for all stu-
dents.

It is interesting that the international tests that have been done
to  compare  our  K–12  educational  system  with  the  equivalents  in
other countries have made our system look very bad, very deficient.
And  I  believe  that  it  is  extremely  important  that  the  community

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

colleges and industry have stepped in to fill the gap. Both of them
have done this each in their own way. Despite the challenges facing
our  K–12  system,  our  workforce  still  remains  globally  competitive,
so how can it be that we are doing less well in K–12 education than
all  of  the  other  nations,  and  yet  we  are  competitive.  As  I  said,  it
is  due  to  community  colleges  filling  the  gap  between  a  high  school
education  and  employment.  And  furthermore,  these  institutions
prepare  students  for  the  workforce,  lay  a  foundation  for  further
study at four-year institutions and provide continuing education for
experienced  workers.  I  do  not  believe  community  colleges  receive
the  recognition  they  deserve  for  providing  these  education  services
critical to our economy.

Another  factor  is  the  training  that  industry  itself  has  provided.
It  may  shock  you  to  know—it  certainly  did  when  I  first  heard  it—
that  the  amount  spent  by  industry,  both  on  remedial  training  for
lack  of  education  as  well  as  upgrading  education  to  handle  more
technically  complex  equipment,  the  total  amount  they  spend  ex-
ceeds  the  total  amount  the  Federal  Government  uses  to  fund  ele-
mentary  and  secondary  education.  That  is  a  huge  drain  on  our  fi-
nancial  resources  in  industry.  If  we  could  only  do  better  in  the
school systems, then the industry and the manufacturing would be
far more efficient.

In  its  2005  survey  of  the  U.S.  manufacturing  workforce,  the  Na-
tional Association for Manufacturers found that skill shortages are
extremely  broad  and  deep,  cutting  across  industry  sectors  and  im-
pacting  more  than  80  percent  of  the  companies’  surveys.  In  fact,
the shortage is so severe in some cases that some positions remain
unfilled for long periods of time.

I am glad that industry is taking action to address the skills gap,
as  I  mentioned  earlier,  but  in  addition  to  that,  they  are  working
with  educational  institutions  to  develop  innovative  mechanisms  to
attract  students  to  these  fields  instead  of  relying  purely  on  tradi-
tional  recruiting  strategies.  Companies  have  identified  the  high
performance  skills  in  their  workforce  as  the  most  critical  compo-
nent  of  their  future  business  success.  In  Michigan,  manufacturing
accounts for almost 20 percent of the state’s GDP. Nationwide, our
workforce in manufacturing is 14 percent. In agriculture, now, it is
less  than  two  percent,  a  major  shift  in  our  economy  in  125  years.
Like our witnesses today, our Grand Rapids Community College,
in  my  district,  and  the  Michigan  Small  Business  and  Technology
Development  Center  are  working  to  alleviate  the  skills  gap  be-
tween  industry  and  education  in  my  region.  The  Federal  Govern-
ment supports these goals through programs such as Workforce In-
novation  and  Regional  Economic  Development,  the  WIRED  pro-
gram, and the Manufacturing Extension Partnership Program, bet-
ter  known  as  the  MEP.  I  am  a  strong  supporter  of  both.  Unfortu-
nately,  we  have  not  had  a  lot  of  strong  support  for  the  MEP  pro-
gram,  but  the  WIRED  program  is  very  successful,  and  the  rem-
nants of the MEP program are also successful.

I note that some of today’s submitted witness testimony address-
es  the  need  to  reverse  the  waning  student  interest  and  negative
perception  of  these  fields.  The  historic  perception  that  technical
fields  are  dark,  dirty,  dangerous,  and  dull,  to  add  to  your  descrip-
tion,  reflects  the  larger  cultural  battle  we  are  fighting  about  how

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

young  people  perceive  science  and  technology.  I  look  forward  to
working with each of you and my colleagues on making science and
math  more  approachable  and  subsequently  shifting  attitudes  to-
wards technical education and employment.

I  thank  our  witnesses  for  being  here  today  to  discuss  these  im-
portant  issues,  and  I  thank  Chairman  Baird  for  organizing  this
hearing. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Technical  training  and  jobs  have  changed  significantly  since  the  time  I  entered
the  job  market.  At  that  time,  many  manufacturing  workers  did  not  need  a  high
school diploma to do their job well. Things have changed! Today, we hear from em-
ployers that the K–12 education system is not sufficiently training students to meet
the  demand  for  technically-skilled  positions.  My  mantra  has  been  that  all  jobs  re-
quire a basic understanding of science and math and technical jobs are no exception.
We  must  improve  science,  technology,  engineering  and  math  literacy  for  all  stu-
dents.

Despite  the  challenges  facing  our  K–12  system,  our  workforce  still  remains  glob-
ally  competitive.  I  believe  that  is  largely  due  to  community  colleges  filling  the  gap
between  a  high  school  education  and  employment.  These  institutions  prepare  stu-
dents  for  the  workforce,  lay  the  foundation  for  further  study  at  a  four-year  institu-
tion,  and  provide  continuing  education  for  experienced  workers.  I  do  not  believe
community  colleges  receive  the  recognition  they  deserve  for  providing  educational
services critical to our economy. In its 2005 survey of the U.S. manufacturing work-
force, the National Association for Manufacturers found that skill shortages are ex-
tremely  broad  and  deep,  cutting  across  industry  sectors  and  impacting  more  than
80  percent  of  companies  surveyed.  In  fact,  the  shortage  is  so  severe  in  some  cases
that some positions remain unfilled for long periods of time. I am glad that industry
is taking action to address the skills gap and working with educational institutions
to develop innovative mechanisms to attract students to these fields, instead of rely-
ing  purely  on  traditional  recruiting  strategies.  Companies  have  identified  the  high-
performance  skills  of  their  workforce  as  the  most  critical  component  of  their  future
business success. In Michigan, manufacturing accounts for almost twenty percent of
the  state’s  GDP.  Like  our  witnesses  today,  Grand  Rapids  Community  College  and
the  Michigan  Small  Business  and  Technology  Development  Center  are  working  to
alleviate  the  skills  gap  between  industry  and  education  in  my  region.  The  Federal
Government  supports  these  goals  through  programs  such  as  the  Workforce  Innova-
tion  and  Regional  Economic  Development  (WIRED)  and  the  Manufacturing  Exten-
sion Partnership Program (MEP).

I note that some of today’s submitted witness testimony addresses the need to re-
verse  the  waning  student  interest  and  negative  perception  of  these  fields.  The  his-
toric  perception  that  technical  fields  are  ‘‘dark,  dirty,  dangerous  and  dull’’  reflects
the  larger  cultural  battle  we  are  fighting  about  how  young  people  perceive  science
and  technology.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  my  colleagues  on  making
science  and  math  more  approachable  and  subsequently  shifting  attitudes  towards
technical education and employment.

I  thank  our  witnesses  for  being  here  today  to  discuss  the  important  topic  of  edu-
cating  skilled  technicians,  and  thank  Chairman  Baird  for  organizing  this  hearing.
Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers. I also want to acknowl-
edge  the  presence  of  Mr.  Miller,  the  Chair  of  the  Oversight  Com-
mittee,  and  the  gentleman  from  Maryland,  Dr.  Bartlett.  If  there
are  any  Members  who  wish  to  submit  additional  opening  state-
ments,  those  statements  will  be  added  to  the  record  at  this  point.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Community  colleges  play  a  key  role  in  providing  access  to  tomorrow’s  high-tech-

nology workforce.

Of particular interest to me are minority-serving institutions such as Historically
Black Colleges and Universities and their importance in training students to fill to-
morrow’s high-tech jobs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

In  Texas,  there  are  near  50  minority  serving  institutions,  including  Paul  Quinn
College  in  the  Dallas  area.  Minority-serving  institutions  contain  disproportionately
high enrollments of African American, Hispanic, and Native American students.

My  district,  in  Dallas,  contains  a  majority  of  individuals  who  are  Black  and  His-
panic.  Over  the  years,  I  have  worked  to  increase  federal  efforts  to  encourage  these
groups to pursue careers in science, technology, engineering and math.

The  U.S.  Census  reports  that  Hispanics  are  already  the  largest  minority  popu-

lation in the country, and the numbers are growing.

Hispanics are projected to account for more than 16 percent of the U.S. population

in 2014.

Hispanics are expected to account for 24 percent in 2050.
These  increases  will  affect  the  racial  and  ethnic  make-up  of  enrollment  rates  at
colleges  and  universities,  and  I  predict  that  Minority  Serving  Institutions  will  be-
come even more important in creating educational opportunities.

Today’s witnesses will share with Subcommittee Members the challenges faced in
attempting to serve this segment of the future high-tech workforce as well as strate-
gies for success at smaller colleges and universities.

Again, welcome to today’s witnesses.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  hosting  this  hearing  to  examine  the  challenges  fac-
ing  advanced  manufacturing  industry  in  attracting  skilled  production  workers  and
technicians,  and  to  consider  the  role  of  community  colleges  in  recruiting  and  train-
ing students for these careers.

As the demand for high-skilled, high-tech production workers increases, manufac-
turing companies have found the supply of well-trained employees lacking such that
the  growth  and  development  of  industry  may  be  threatened.  I  look  forward  to  ex-
ploring ways that Congress can help to counteract this disturbing trend.

Numerous reports such as the 2005 Skills Gap Report—A Survey of the American
Manufacturing  Workforce  have  shown  that  eighty  to  ninety  percent  of  manufac-
turing  companies  are  having  difficulty  finding  skilled  production  workers,  a  role
which is rapidly surpassing that of low-skilled employees. While community colleges
have been identified as one of the best sources of training for such jobs, lack of fund-
ing, low enrollment, and students’ inadequate math and science backgrounds create
major obstacles, severely limiting the technical training these institutions can offer.
Today’s  hearing  focuses  on  the  important  task  of  bolstering  the  ability  of  Amer-
ica’s  community  colleges,  in  collaboration  with  industry  partners,  to  develop  and
publicize  successful  tech-training  programs.  I  am  eager  to  hear  our  witnesses’  as-
sessments  of  the  programs  and  partnerships  implemented  thus  far  so  that  we  can
reflect on the successes and inefficiencies of the current strategies and seek to make
modifications  for  improvement.  Your  first-hand  experiences  are  vital  to  overcoming
the technician shortage through technical education programs and industry support.
To all the witnesses—thank you for taking time out of your busy schedules to ap-

pear before us today. I look forward to hearing your testimony.

Chairman  BAIRD.  And  now  it  is  my  great  privilege  to  introduce
our witnesses, and I will start with a friend from my home district,
who is the very distinguished president of South Puget Sound Com-
munity  College,  who  has  also  served  as  president  of  Bellingham
Technical College and held positions at Guilford Technical in North
Carolina. Dr. Pumphrey, thank you for being here.

Dr.  Stephen  Fonash  is  the  Director  of  Penn  State’s  Center  for
Nanotechnology  Education  and  Utilization  and  is  an  active  re-
searcher in the field of nanotechnology.

Mr. Eric Mittelstadt is the Chief Executive Officer of the national
Counsel for Advance Manufacturing. He has been very active in in-
dustry, serving as the Chair of America’s leading robotics manufac-
turer,  FANUC,  among  many  other  projects  and  activities.  Mr.
Mittelstadt, thank you for being here.

And  finally,  Ms.  Monica  Poindexter,  who  is  currently  Director  of
Corporate  Diversity  at  the  California-based  Genentech,  Incor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

porated.  Her  work  in  workforce  development  for  Genentech  led  to
the  company’s  colaboration  with  community  colleges  to  train  tech-
nicians for the biotech industry.

So we have got an outstanding panel of witnesses to address pre-
cisely the questions before us today. As our witnesses should know
from  our  prior  communications,  we  try  to  keep  the  testimony  lim-
ited  to  five  minutes.  Under  Dr.  Ehlers’s  term  as  Chair,  we  had  a
push-button  up  here  that  has  a  trapdoor  below  your  seat,  and  you
get  about  a  15-second  grace  period,  and  then  you  vanish,  and  we
shall carry on without you. So try to keep it down to five minutes.
I  know  these  are  tremendously  important  topics.  We  will  have  a
good  opportunity  for  give-and-take  in  the  questioning,  so  we  very
much  appreciate  your  presence,  and  we  shall  just  work  from  the
left to the right as we look at it.

Dr. Pumphrey, please, enlighten us with your remarks.

STATEMENT OF DR. GERALD PUMPHREY, PRESIDENT, SOUTH

PUGET SOUND COMMUNITY COLLEGE

Dr.  PUMPHREY.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Baird,  Dr.  Ehlers,  Mem-
bers of the Committee. I have been asked to respond to a few ques-
tions.  The  first  series  of  questions  is  ‘‘what  factors  are  involved  in
the  decision  by  a  community  college  when  deciding  whether  to  de-
velop  or  continue  a  technical  training  program  in  a  particular
field?’’  How  does  the  college  evaluate  the  potential  impact  of  the
program  in  comparison  to  its  associated  costs,  and  what  are  the
biggest challenges faced by a community college in either initiating
or continuing a program with low enrollment?

First,  I  would  say  that  it  is  useful  to  think  of  a  publicly  funded
community college as a state-assisted business, because we do very
much  operate  on  a  business  model.  It  happens  that  our  capital  fa-
cilities  and  a  substantial  portion  of  our  revenue  in  the  State  of
Washington are provided by the state, but the students’ tuition and
fees  are  part  of  that  revenue  stream  as  well.  So  when  we  look  at
an  opportunity  to  start  a  new  technical  training  program,  we  are
looking  at  employment  demand  and  differentiating  amounts  of
growth, retirements and turnovers, and the potential costs. We are
also looking at the potential for student demand.

We  evaluate  potential  new  programs  as  a  business  opportunity
by  looking  at  the  cost  and  availability  of  faculty,  facilities,  and
technology  and  also  the  willingness  of  the  industry  sector  to  col-
laborate on curriculum. Given that our margins are often very thin,
we  need  to  evaluate  the  possibility  of  external  funding  to  help  off-
set  startup  and/or  operating  costs  for  highly  specialized  or  tech-
nically sophisticated programs, and the more specific it is, the more
likely we are to need external help to do it.

And  there  are  the  political  considerations  around  program  ap-
proval and accreditation requirements and other sorts of issues. We
have  to  understand  whether  another  college  offers  a  similar  pro-
gram within geographic proximity, and that is why we have State-
approval boards.

There  are  two  big  challenges  as  I  see  it.  The  first  is  our  ability
to  respond  at  industry’s  pace.  We  are  not  organized  like  industry,
and  it’s  very  difficult  for  us  to  move  as  quickly  as  industry  does,
and  that,  in  fact,  is  one  of  my  greatest  fears  for  the  effectiveness

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

of  community  colleges  over  time.  The  second  challenge  is  around
capitalization, where you get the money to respond with.

We  really  do  run  these  technical  programs  as  separate  business
units,  so  we  are  paying  a  lot  of  attention  to  enrollment  and  its  ef-
fect  on  revenue.  If  we  do  not  have  the  students  in  the  program,  it
is very difficult for us to sustain it.

The next set of questions surround what factors influence the low
enrollment  of  technical  training  programs  and  how  the  low  enroll-
ment can be remedied, and what efforts do yours and other colleges
make  to  attract  the  largest  population  of  students  to  technical
training.  Well,  there  is  a  fundamental  problem  these  days  in  the
technical  trades:  40  percent  of  the  enrollment  in  higher  ed.  in  the
U.S. is by males, 60 percent by females. If you are looking at man-
ufacturing, that is a traditionally male-dominated industry. It need
not be so. There are many women in a wide variety of careers, and
many  of  us  have  special  outreach  programs  to  recruit  women,  but
that is a fundamental problem for recruitment.

Student interest in the program is driven by a variety of factors,
including  wages,  advancement  opportunities,  perceived  working
conditions,  visibility  of  the  industry,  the  availability  of  alternative
opportunities, the relative effect of education or training on employ-
ment  prospects.  If  the  job  is  available  without  education  or  train-
ing,  that  is  a  deal  breaker  for  students  interested  in  enrolling  in
the program. Colleges do employ a wide variety of outreach efforts
in  high  schools.  Many  of  us  have  tech-prep  programs.  We  have  ar-
ticulated dual-credit arrangements. We have outreach coordinators
that  work  with  the  high  school  to  communicate  the  opportunities.
These  work  better  when  industry  goes  with  us.  We  are  selling
training;  the  industry  is  selling  the  jobs.  The  student  is  interested
in the job, so we are more effective when we work together on that.
The  last  set  of  questions  were  what  challenges  does  inadequate
math/science  preparation  pose  to  technical  training  programs.  Do
you  know  of  colleges  involved  in  innovate  ways  of  addressing  this
dilemma,  particularly  in  collaboration  with  secondary  schools?  I
can  tell  you  that  inadequate  math  and  science  preparation  has  an
impact on the operating budgets of the college, because we have to
divert  substantial  resources  from  college-level  work  to  remedial
work,  whether  it  is  in  literacy  through  adult  basic  education,  the
GED  program,  English  as  a  Second  Language—all  of  which  are
vital parts of our mission, but they are not college-level work—also
through  the  developmental  education  programs  that  we  run  that
take students who need some amount of brushing up on their math
skills  in  particular  to  bring  them  up  to  entry  level  for  college-level
courses, so it is a diversion of effort. It is a diversion of money, and
we  are  proud  to  do  it  because  it  is  an  absolutely  vital  service  for
our  community,  but  typically  that  is  not  funded  at  the  same  level
as college-level work.

Ultimately,  as  much  as  we  would  like  to  say  it  is  not  the  case,
I feel it has an impact on the quality of the graduates that we put
out.  We  know  that  the  longer  a  student  spends  in  remedial  or  de-
velopmental education, the less likely they are ever to make it into
college-level  work.  There  is  a  certain  threshold  they  have  to  meet
to get there.

And I think I am out of time, so I will stop here.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

[The prepared statement of Dr. Pumphrey follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF GERALD PUMPHREY

What  factors  are  involved  in  a  decision  by  a  community  college  when  de-
ciding  whether  to  develop  or  continue  a  tech-training  program  in  a  par-
ticular field? How does the college evaluate the potential impact of the pro-
gram in comparison to its associated costs? What are the biggest challenges
faced  by  a  community  college  in  either  initiating  or  continuing  a  program
with low enrollment?

Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education.  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity
to testify before your subcommittee today. My name is Gerald Pumphrey, and I am
President  of  South  Puget  Sound  Community  College.  It  is  my  privilege  to  speak
with  you  today  on  the  topic  of  technician  education.  It  is  a  topic  within  my  experi-
ence  at  four  community  and  technical  colleges  in  the  States  of  Washington  and
North Carolina, and as a consultant within the Program Development Services sec-
tion of the State Board for Community Colleges in North Carolina.

Community and technical colleges initiate technical training programs in response
to  employment  demand,  most  often  in  the  geographic  region  they  serve.  Employ-
ment  demand  often  results  from  the  growth  of  an  industry  and  thus  job  openings
within  it.  Also,  the  pending  wave  of  retirements  by  baby-boomers  will  require  re-
placement of skilled workers in many technical occupations. In other cases, increas-
ing  sophistication  of  technology  will  require  retraining  of  incumbent  workers  and  a
higher  level  of  education  for  entry-level  workers.  A  sustainable  and  sufficient  level
of  job  openings  for  graduates  is  a  necessary  condition  for  any  successful  technical
education  program.  Programs  that  serve  a  cluster  of  similar  or  related  industries
are usually more stable than one that serves a single large industry.

Prior to starting a new program, community and technical colleges will verify that
career entry into the targeted occupation or range of occupations requires education
and skills that are appropriate to a certificate or an associate degree. If these knowl-
edge and skill requirements are minimal, the college may explore a customized skill
training approach rather than a full program with permanent facilities, equipment,
and  faculty.  If  the  program  demands  more  extensive  theoretical  preparation  and
skill development than can be provided at the associate degree level, the college may
partner with a university or pass up the opportunity altogether.

As  a  condition  for  creating  a  new  program,  colleges  will  assess  the  potential  for
student enrollment demand, sometimes directly through surveys of high school stu-
dents,  groups  of  incumbent  workers,  or  unemployed  workers.  This  phase  of  explo-
ration  usually  includes  a  study  of  potential  starting  wages  and  career  progression
opportunities.  If  there  is  no  positive  differential  in  the  starting  wage  of  a  training
program graduate, student demand for the training is likely to be suppressed. Like-
wise, the ability to advance in the career by initial hiring is a positive indicator for
starting a new technical education program.

If  the  college  is  governed  by  a  State  board  or  other  program  approval  authority,
it may be required to demonstrate that initiating a new program is not unduly com-
petitive with similar programs at other colleges in its geographic proximity. The col-
lege  may  take  under  consideration  whether  a  new  program  will  have  a  synergistic
or  competitive  relationship  with  its  own  existing  programs.  Often,  a  college  will
weigh  the  prospects  of  success  for  the  proposed  program  and  the  potential  benefit
it offers its community. If the proposed program is understood to be critical to local
economic  development  or  services  in  the  community,  the  college  may  engage  in  in-
tense  political  activity  on  its  own  campus  or  before  the  body  that  has  authority  to
approve the program.

Ideally,  curriculum  will  be  designed  in  conjunction  with  industry  partners.  Other
considerations  in  curriculum  development  potentially  include  requirements  for  ex-
ternal  program-level  accreditation,  industry-wide  skill  standards,  and  licensure
standards  for  graduates,  etc.  Close  collaboration  with  industry  at  this  stage  of  pro-
gram design is essential to successful technician education.

The  academic  and  technical  curriculum  content  drives  requirements  for  faculty,
facilities,  and  equipment.  As  technology  becomes  more  specialized  and  advanced,
colleges  can  face  difficulty  in  finding  and  affording  qualified  faculty.  Colleges  may
face  constraints  in  the  availability  of  classroom/laboratory  space,  particularly  when
programs  require  specialized  electrical,  mechanical,  or  data  connections.  Colleges
vary  widely  in  their  ability  to  acquire  and  maintain  sophisticated  equipment,  and
the  rapid  evolution  of  technology  makes  this  a  particularly  daunting  task.  Some

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

technician  education  programs  experience  high  costs  for  consumable  supplies,  utili-
ties, and software licensing agreements.

17

Before  making  a  decision  to  implement  a  new  program,  the  college  must  deter-
mine  if  it  can  muster  the  operating  and  capital  funds  to  sustain  it.  Sources  often
include  revenue  from  State  funding,  tuition,  fees,  and  external  training  contracts.
Colleges  often  face  multiple,  simultaneous  opportunities  to  develop  technical  edu-
cation programs, and usually must engage in a comparative cost analysis and reach
some  judgment  concerning  opportunity  costs.  In  many  cases,  support  from  the  rel-
evant industry is essential to start and continue operation of the program.
What factors influence the low enrollment of tech-training programs? How
can  low  enrollment  be  remedied?  What  efforts  do  your  and  other  colleges
make to attract the widest possible population of students to tech-training?
Low enrollment in technical training programs can result from a variety of exter-
nal and internal factors. Among the external causes, the perception of a lack of em-
ployment  opportunities  can  be  a  strong  influence.  In  2007,  many  colleges’  informa-
tion technology programs are only now recovering from enrollment declines that fol-
lowed  the  recession  in  that  industry  after  2001.  If  it  is  possible  to  begin  a  career
without  technical  education,  or  if  having  that  technical  education  secures  no  wage
advantage,  fewer  students  will  enroll  in  a  training  program.  Sometimes,  students
perceive that better opportunities are available in a more dominant or more visible
industry,  leaving  both  viable  jobs  and  the  training  programs  that  support  them  be-
hind.

In some cases, factors internal to the college can have a negative influence on en-
rollment in technician education programs. If the college is unable to identify a tar-
get  student  population  and  market  the  program  effectively,  enrollment  may  suffer.
If,  over  time,  the  college  allows  its  facilities  and  equipment  to  become  obsolete,  en-
rollment will decline. If the program faculty do not maintain their own technological
currency, or if their teaching skills decline, students will not continue to participate.
These issues highlight the critical importance of maintaining strong, industry-based
advisory committees for each of the college’s technical programs.

Community  and  technical  colleges  employ  a  variety  of  strategies  to  attract  stu-
dents  to  technical  education  programs.  Most  work  with  the  high  schools  in  their
service  areas  to  connect  related  secondary  career  and  technical  education  programs
with college programs in similar disciplines. These connections are often made with-
in  the  context  of  Tech  Prep  articulation  agreements  that  give  the  high  school  stu-
dent advanced placement credit for college-level work. Many colleges engage in a va-
riety of other high school outreach programs in which college recruiters present pro-
grams for high school students and parents, along with workshops for teachers and
counselors.  Some  colleges  offer  summer  camps  for  middle  and  high  school  students
to provide them exposure to technical or scientific careers. The last two colleges for
which  I  have  worked  have  held  fairs  to  provide  exposure  for  women  to  nontradi-
tional careers in the trades or technical careers. In both colleges, we have had active
referral systems in place with our regional WIA one-stop centers. In my experience,
two  factors  are  worthy  of  note.  First,  employers  and  their  representatives  usually
have  a  higher  impact  on  recruitment  for  training  programs  related  to  their  indus-
tries  than  do  college  personnel.  Second,  community  and  technical  colleges  rarely
have sufficient funding for effective marketing.
What  challenges  does  inadequate  math/science  preparation  pose  to  tech-
training programs? Do you know of colleges engaged in innovative ways of
addressing  this  dilemma,  particularly  through  collaborating  with  sec-
ondary schools?

The  fact  that  nearly  half  of  the  students  entering  community  and  technical  col-
leges require at least some remediation in mathematics is a multi-dimensional prob-
lem  for  the  colleges.  Remedial  or  developmental  education  clearly  diverts  resources
from  college-level  programming.  These  pre-college  courses  are  typically  funded  by
the  states  at  a  lower  value  per  full-time  equivalent  student  than  college-level
courses. This dilutes the funding stream and financial health of the institutions. The
greater  the  length  of  time  a  student  spends  in  remedial  or  developmental  courses,
the less likely she or he is to matriculate into and complete a college program.

To  the  extent  a  student’s  remediation  is  incomplete  or  imperfect,  the  technical
education curriculum is invariably diluted. As a case in point, I was once summoned
to  a  pharmacology  class  by  the  department  chair  of  a  medical  assisting  program.
Her colleague was engaged in a laborious process of teaching the students long divi-
sion  of  decimals  for  the  purpose  of  calculating  drug  dosages.  As  frightening  as  this
revelation was, there was also an undeniable shortchanging of the intended pharma-
cological content.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

are 

available 

at 

information 

about 

the 

project 

Washington State has a promising initiative to improve the ability of high school
students  to  enter  college-level  mathematics  courses  without  remediation.  The  Math
Transitions  Project  is  built  on  a  detailed  curriculum  analysis  and  defines  com-
petency-based  standards  for  college  readiness  in  mathematics.  The  standards  and
additional 
http://
www.transitionmathproject.org.
What is an industry partner’s ideal role in a community college tech-train-
ing program? Please elaborate on your experiences with industry partners.
Once  the  determination  is  made  that  employment  opportunities  and  student  en-
rollment  demand  are  sufficient  to  sustain  a  technical  education  program,  a  college
and  the  supporting  industry  can  begin  the  detailed  work  of  creating  a  partnership.
Curriculum  development  presents  an  early  opportunity.  In  the  past,  I  have  worked
with  technicians,  front-line  supervisors,  human  resource  professionals,  industrial
trainers,  and  engineers  to  create  curriculum  for  educating  computer-aided  machine
operators  and  programmers  (Outboard  Marine  Corporation,  Burckardt  Amerida,
Amp,  Inc.),  chemical  process  technicians  (Dow  Corning,  Proctor  &  Gamble,
Stockhausen, Ciba Specialty Chemicals), and process operators (Conoco-Phillips, BP,
Shell,  Tesoro.)  In  most  cases,  we  used  source  documents  from  National  Science
Foundation-funded  Centers  of  Advanced  Technology,  or  from  organizations  promul-
gating  skills  standards  (National  Institute  for  Metalworking  Skills)  as  a  starting
point. We often prioritized, selected, and occasionally modified these curriculum ma-
terials to fit local needs. When working with multiple industrial partners, the proc-
ess often involves reaching a consensus on the content needs shared by all the part-
ners  and  an  agreement  that  any  additional  proprietary  training  be  done  in-house
after  hiring.  Collaboration  among  the  college  and  its  industrial  partners  on  cur-
riculum design is a fundamental building block of a successful partnership.

While developing a program in Chemical Process Technology at Guilford Technical
Community  College  in  Greensboro,  North  Carolina,  a  group  of  engineers  from  the
participating  companies  identified  nine  unit  operations  that  their  future  employees
needed to perform. Using standardized connections, they designed modular units for
each  of  these  processes,  facilitating  interchangeable  sequencing  and  simulating
manufacturing  of  a  variety  of  products.  These  engineers  produced  CAD  files  of  this
modular  equipment  and  the  laboratory  space  that  the  college  planned  to  renovate
for  use  by  the  new  program.  They  secured  substantial  donations  of  pumps,  valves,
and  other  components  from  surplus  inventory  in  their  plants.  They  worked  with
their purchasing managers to leverage deep discounts for remaining equipment pur-
chased  by  the  college.  The  result  was  a  laboratory  that  supported  the  curriculum
and  was  flexible  enough  to  meet  the  needs  of  both  career-entry  trainees  and  the
companies’  incumbent  work  forces.  Dow  Corning  provided  a  two-for-one  matching
grant to cover the hard cash costs of the project.

Conoco-Phillips, BP, Shell, and Tesoro provided similar assistance with the devel-
opment  of  a  Process  Technology  program  at  Bellingham  Technical  College  in  Bel-
lingham,  Washington.  Industry  support  for  that  program  and  a  related  one  in  In-
strumentation and Process Control Technology led to the college’s designation by the
state as a Center of Excellence in Process Manufacturing.

One  of  the  most  productive  models  for  a  partnership  between  community  and
technical colleges and an industry is the approach to service technician training de-
veloped first by General Motors and now shared by most automotive manufacturers.
As  microprocessor  technology  spread  throughout  a  host  of  automotive  applications,
General Motors foresaw the need for a higher level of theoretical preparation for the
technicians who serviced its products in the dealerships. They developed a program
that is structured with alternating periods of study and practice on campus and pe-
riods  of  cooperative  education  work  experience  supervised  by  seasoned  technicians
in the workplace. The manufacturers have typically supported these programs with
donated vehicles and components, technical update training for the faculty, and real
time access to the latest technical service databases. At Guilford Technical Commu-
nity  College,  both  General  Motors  and  Ford  contracted  with  the  college  to  provide
update training for dealership technicians. The income from these training contracts
was  used  to  further  augment  the  quality  of  the  tools  and  technology  for  the  career
entry programs.

In  all  of  the  colleges  for  which  I  have  worked,  we  have  had  a  strong  system  of
advisory  committees.  These  committees  are  constituted  by  members  representing
employers and who are close to the evolving skill needs of their workforce. They pro-
vide  feedback  on  developments  in  their  industries  to  keep  the  programs  current.
Many  are  involved  in  student  recruitment  and  outreach,  securing  cooperative  edu-
cation work opportunities, and assisting with the placement of graduating students
in jobs. They have often assisted in securing donations of equipment and sometimes

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

funding. Many have served as guest speakers for classes or assisted in finding other
speakers to do so.

In  some  rare  cases  so  far  limited  to  the  medical  industry,  I  have  received  help
from  partners  through  salary  supplements  or  relocation  assistance  for  faculty  in
high  skill,  high  wage  career  fields.  At  South  Puget  Sound  Community  College,  we
have a three-year contract with Providence St. Peter Hospital to expand our nursing
program  by  an  additional  class  cohort.  We  would  not  have  been  able  to  respond  to
their employment needs to the same extent without the contract.
What impacts do shifts in industry demand have on tech-training programs
and how do community colleges address these?

There  are  three  principle  types  of  shifts  in  industry  demand  that  affect  technical
education  programs.  Most  industries  are  now  on  a  constant  path  of  technology  re-
newal  in  attempts  to  gain  competitiveness  by  increasing  productivity,  reducing
costs,  speeding  product  development  cycles,  customization  of  products  to  customer
specifications,  or  some  combination  of  these  efforts.  In  the  face  of  this  accelerating
evolution in technology, colleges face increasing difficulty in keeping curriculum cur-
rent, helping faculty keep their skills up-to-date, and in keeping instructional equip-
ment  and  software  parallel  with  industry  practice.  An  effective  advisory  committee
can  keep  a  college  apprised  of  the  nature  and  extent  of  these  requirements,  but
many  colleges  struggle  with  the  costs  of  remaining  current.  The  colleges  most  suc-
cessful in meeting these demands are those in effective partnerships with industries
that  participate  financially  to  keep  technology  in  the  training  environment  equiva-
lent to that deployed in the production setting.

The  technological  evolution  has  also  been  accompanied  by  a  large-scale  shift  by
industries  to  embrace  the  quality  movement,  lean  manufacturing,  and  other  strate-
gies for improving productivity and quality by empowering employees closest to the
work processes to make decisions about them. This has fundamentally changed the
goal  of  most  technical  education  programs  from  producing  workers  outfitted  with  a
specific  set  of  skills  and  a  narrowly  defined  knowledge  base  toward  producing  em-
ployees  with  a  broader  contextual  knowledge  of  an  industry,  including  its  tech-
nology,  production  processes,  business  practices,  and  the  culture  of  its  customer
base. Educated technicians are now also expected to be fluent in the use of a variety
of  information  technologies,  participate  fully  in  team-based  problem  solving  strate-
gies, and to have a broader knowledge base that allows them to absorb future shifts
in production processes and technologies at a minimum expense to the employer for
re-training.

These changes in expectations have caused colleges to seek mechanisms for better
connecting  the  student  learning  experience  across  academic  and  technical  dis-
ciplines. Many colleges have experimented with team teaching and learning commu-
nities in which intact cohorts of students enroll in blocks of related courses. Colleges
still  struggle  to  an  extent  to  develop  tools  for  assessing  cross-functional  learning.
These  types  of  changes  have  not  been  easy  to  implement  within  the  architecture  of
college organizational structures and cultures. Most of the colleges have broad mis-
sions  that  include  not  only  technician  education,  but  academic  transfer  programs,
remedial  and  developmental  education,  and  continuing  education  that  respond  to  a
broad variety of interests in their communities. This breadth of mission, along with
the  momentum  of  academic  and  institutional  cultures,  has  not  created  the  condi-
tions for many colleges to emulate the organizational structures or thoroughly inte-
grate  the  quality  and  productivity  tools  that  have  been  widely  adopted  by  their  in-
dustry partners.

The third type of shift in industry demand is directly related to the expansion or
contraction  of  labor  market  demand.  These  shifts  can  arise  from  industry-wide  re-
sponses to fluctuation in the business cycle, or from the start-up, expansion, or fail-
ure  of  individual  companies.  Obviously,  these  changes  have  an  impact  on  the  de-
mand  for  graduates,  and  they  also  have  an  impact,  sometimes  delayed,  on  student
enrollment in related technical education programs.

It is easier for the college to respond to expansions. In some cases, the college can
hire  an  additional  instructor  and  schedule  classes  in  existing  facilities  during  ex-
tended  hours  of  the  day.  In  others,  the  college  can  respond  with  highly  focused
classes  to  up-skill  incumbent  workers  for  promotion  into  more  advanced  positions
while offering accelerated, customized training for entry-level workers. If the growth
in demand is broad across industry sectors and projected to be sustained, the college
can plan to rent or build additional capacity. Industries are often much more likely
to  enter  into  substantive  partnerships  with  colleges  in  periods  of  strong  expansion
and short labor supply.

Contractions  are  far  more  difficult  for  colleges  to  deal  with.  If  the  industry  de-
mand  remains  strong,  but  student  enrollment  is  weak,  the  college  will  assess  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

underlying reasons and may choose to develop an action plan. The action plan may
involve  a  renewed  marketing  effort  and/or  address  fundamental  issues  of  program
quality, including the technical or pedagogical skills of the instructor and/or the ade-
quacy of instructional equipment.

Assuming a decline in demand for graduates or by students for enrollment is pro-
jected to continue, the college must face the difficult question of whether to continue
the program. It is often the case that the college needs to redirect the funding that
supports the program in question for responding to a new or different demand. Most
often,  some  students  are  enrolled  in  the  program  and  provisions  must  be  made  for
them  to  graduate.  Faculty  contracts  often  specify  detailed  procedural  requirements
for  terminating  programs.  If  the  positions  of  tenured  faculty  are  to  be  eliminated,
the process can be lengthy, contentious, and expensive. Often, a residual level of de-
mand continues in the employment sector, but it is too low to sustain a college pro-
gram.  In  these  situations  the  college  may  face  vocal  opposition  to  terminating  the
program  from  industry  representatives  allied  with  the  affected  faculty.  The  college
may  need  to  make  a  sound  business  decision  in  an  unsupportive  political  environ-
ment, but the resistance more often delays than prevents a choice that is ultimately
inevitable in the face of inadequate enrollment.

BIOGRAPHY FOR GERALD PUMPHREY

Gerald Pumphrey was appointed President of South Puget Sound Community Col-
lege  in  August,  2006.  He  was  President  of  Bellingham  Technical  College  in  2001–
2006. Positions he has held at Guilford Technical Community College in Jamestown,
NC  include:  Vice  President  of  Instruction,  1999–2001;  Dean  of  Instruction,  1998–
1999; Director of Workforce Preparedness, 1996–1998; and Division Chair of Trans-
portation, 1995–1997. He received a B.A. from Florida State University, FL; a M.A.
from Appalachian State University, NC; and an Ed.D. from Clemson University, SC.
His  memberships  include:  Economic  Development  Council  of  Thurston  County,
2006–present,  Board  of  Directors;  Rotary  Club  of  Olympia,  March  2007–present;
Thurston  County  Roundtable  2006–present;  South  Sound  Manufacturers’  Alliance,
2006–present,  Executive  Committee;  Pacific  Mountain  Workforce  Development
Council,  2006–present;  American  Association  of  Community  Colleges,  Presidents’
Academy  Executive  Committee;  Transatlantic  Training  and  Technology  Alliance;
Junior Achievement of Pierce and Thurston Counties, 2006–present; Board of Direc-
tors Downtown Renaissance Network, 2002–present; Northwest Workforce Develop-
ment Council, 2002–present, Executive Committee; Center for Information Services,
2001–present;  Past  memberships  include:  Rotary  Club  of  Bellingham,  2003–2005;
GHG Housing Corporation, 1998–2001; Piedmont Triad Center for Advanced Manu-
facturing, 2000–2001.

Chairman  BAIRD.  That  threat  of  the  trapdoor  gets  them  every

time.

Dr. PUMPHREY. It does.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Pumphrey,  thank  you  for  your  remarks.  I

think you were very cogent and concise, and I appreciate it.

Dr. Fonash, please?

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  STEPHEN  J.  FONASH,  CENTER  FOR
NANOTECHNOLOGY  EDUCATION  AND  UTILIZATION,  PENN-
SYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY
Dr. FONASH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Sub-
committee  for  inviting  me  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  am  an  ac-
tive nanotechnology researcher, but I have also become involved in
community  college  education,  and  my  comments  come  from  that
kind of a perspective.

Now,  let  me  begin  by  saying  that  the  generally  accepted  picture
of  manufacturing  in  today’s  work-world,  and  one  which  I  strongly
agree  with,  is  that,  as  technology  fields  mature,  their  manufac-
turing components tend to migrate out of the United States. A good
example  of  this  is  the  semiconductor  industry.  The  consequence  of
this  picture  is  that  manufacturing  in  the  United  States  must  be
cutting edge and innovative. It must define the forefront to survive.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

It  follows  that  America’s  technical  workforce  must  be  equally  cut-
ting  edge  and  prepared  for  a  lifetime  of  learning.  It  must  be  pre-
pared for innovation and innovating.

Much  of  the  cutting-edge  research  that  flows  into  industry  and
into  U.S.  manufacturing  comes  from  research-intensive  univer-
sities.  I  believe  these  institutions  also  have  a  role  in  bringing  cut-
ting-edge technology and the spirit of innovation to community col-
lege  education,  and  thereby  to  America’s  technical  workforce.  Re-
search-intensive  universities  have  the  facilities,  the  means  to  sus-
tain  these  facilities  and  the  resident  expertise  to  give  technology
students  intensive  hands-on  exposure  to  the  equipment,  concepts
and  innovation  that  will  drive  tomorrow’s  manufacturing.  A  part-
nership  of  community  colleges,  industry,  and  research-intensive
universities  is  a  very  powerful  one  which  can  create  and  sustain
strong associate degree technology education essential to continued
U.S. global competitiveness.

In Pennsylvania, we have created such a partnership in the crit-
ical far-reaching field of nanotechnology. This is a partnership that
we  have  named  the  Pennsylvania  Nanofabrication  Manufacturing
Technology  Partnership.  It  receives  support  from  the  Common-
wealth  of  Pennsylvania  and  has  since  1999,  and  in  July  2001,  it
was  established  as  a  National  Science  Foundation  Advance  Tech-
nology  Education  center.  With  the  addition  of  the  resources  of
being  designated  an  ATE  center,  the  program  has  grown  from  a
partnership of seven community colleges, Penn State, and industry
in  2001,  to  a  partnership,  today,  of  the  14  community  colleges  in
Pennsylvania, Penn State campuses across the Commonwealth, the
Pennsylvania  State  System  of  Higher  Education  and  industry.
Today graduates of the partnership’s programs earn their two-year
nanotechnology  degrees  from  21  different  Pennsylvania  institu-
tions.  With  the  addition  of  the  resources  of  the  ATE  center,  we
have  also  been  working  with  numerous  community  colleges  across
the  country  that  want  to  emulate  our  partnership  and  research-
sharing model in their technology-education efforts.

A  key  aspect  of  our  partnership  is  what  we  term  the  ‘‘capstone
semester.’’  It  is  taught  using  the  state-of-the-art  facilities  and  ex-
pertise  resources  of  Penn  State’s  University  Park  campus.  All  stu-
dents in the nanotechnology programs of the 21 partners must take
this  total,  hands-on  emersion  into  nanoscale  fabrication,  synthesis,
and  characterization.  This  six-course  capstone  semester  experience
is  provided  by  Penn  State  three  times  a  year  as  a  service  for  the
two-year-degree-granting  schools  engaged  in  the  education  of  tech-
nicians.

The motivation for industry to play a role in advance technology
education is well understood. The motivation for research-intensive
universities  to  play  a  role  in  technology  education  is  less  clear.
There  is  a  well-established  innovation  path  from  research  univer-
sities to industry, which turns ideas in the laboratory into products
for American industry. It is considered prestigious to participate in
that pathway. There needs to be an equivalent innovation pathway
from universities to technology education which turns new ideas in
the laboratory into skills and learning in the technology classroom.
Being  a  participant  on  this  pathway  needs  to  be  deemed  equally
prestigious.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

If  I  were  to  distill  my  thoughts  down  to  one  idea,  I  would  say
innovation  and  cutting-edge  technology  has  to  move  quickly  to  the
community  college  classroom,  just  as  quickly  as  it  moves  to  indus-
try,  and  I  believe  the  best  way  to  do  this  is  to  encourage  partner-
ship and research sharing among community colleges and research-
intensive universities.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Fonash follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN J. FONASH

Question  1:  Please  describe  the  evolution  of  your  program—how  it  began
in  response  to  industry’s  stated  needs  and  how  the  program  has  changed
as  the  industry  needs  and  focuses  have  changed.  Please  describe  how  the
program  adjusted  after  the  drop-off  in  demand  for  semi-conductor  manu-
facturing technicians that occurred around the year 2000. How do you pre-
pare your students to be adaptable to the changing needs in high-tech man-
ufacturing?

Our program originated from calls in 1998 from Lucent, Fairchild Semiconductor,
and  Air  Products  for  increased  technical  education  in  Pennsylvania  in  the  micro-
and  nano-scale  fabrication  and  characterization  techniques  used  in  the  semicon-
ductor industry. To address this need, Penn State University, Pennsylvania commu-
nity  colleges,  other  two-year-degree  granting  institutions  in  Pennsylvania,  and  in-
dustry  worked  together  to  create  a  two-year  degree  program  teaching  micro-  and
nano-scale  fabrication  and  characterization  with  an  emphasis  in  semiconductor  ap-
plications.  Today,  this  effort  has  evolved  into  the  Pennsylvania  Nanofabrication
Manufacturing Technology (NMT) Partnership. Today, its programs provide a broad
micro- and nano-scale fabrication, synthesis, and characterization educational expe-
rience  addressing  the  career  needs  of  students  and  the  technician  needs  of  a  spec-
trum  of  industries.  The  Partnership  has  received  support  from  the  Commonwealth
of  Pennsylvania  since  1999,  and  in  July  2001,  was  established  as  a  NSF  Advanced
Technological  Education  (ATE)  Center.  As  an  NSF  ATE  center,  the  Partnership
works  with  numerous  institutions  in  other  states  to  aid  in  replicating  our  edu-
cational programs and partnership approach.

At  the  inception  of  the  Partnership,  it  was  decided  that  each  two-year-degree
granting  institution  should  formulate  its  own  nanofabrication  education  program.
However, each program was required to include a one semester hands-on immersion
in micro- and nano-scale fabrication and characterization which we termed the ‘‘cap-
stone  semester.’’  Curriculum  development  was  done  in  concert  with  industry
through an Industry Advisory Board which oversaw, and today continues to oversee,
the program and course development. The key—and unique aspect—of the program
was  the  development  of  this  capstone  semester.  This  capstone  semester  experience
is provided by Penn State three times per year at its University Park campus (fall,
spring,  and  summer)  as  a  service  for  the  two-year-degree  granting  schools  engaged
in the education of technicians and production workers.

The  ‘‘capstone  semester’’  is  taught  at  Penn  State’s  University  Park  campus  and
it is only there that a critical mass of students must converge. This is an important
consideration for three reasons: (1) community colleges across the country find that
technology training programs do not attract a large number of students, (2) commu-
nity  colleges  cannot  afford  to  have,  and  even  more  importantly,  cannot  afford  to
maintain  the  expensive  equipment  needed,  and  (3)  community  colleges  do  not  have
the resident expertise required to use this equipment to teach micro- and nano-scale
manufacturing  technology.  With  the  approach  taken  in  the  NMT  Partnership,  each
‘‘home school’’ contributes students to the capstone semester at University Park and
the  individual  home  schools  need  not  have  a  critical  mass  in  order  to  offer  this
training. They do not have to create whole new curricula for students but only have
to  modify  course  content  to  prepare  students  for  the  capstone  experience.  With  the
approach  taken,  Penn  State’s  broad  facilities  and  the  resident  expertise  were  from
the start, and are now, used to teach the defining, hands-on capstone semester expo-
sure  to  advanced  micro-  and  nano-scale  fabrication  and  characterization.  The  ap-
proach  was,  and  continues  today  to  be,  that  the  two-year  degree  granting  institu-
tions use the capstone semester courses in their programs as they see fit. These six
courses  are  ‘‘on  their  books’’  as  their  courses  and  each  home  school’s  students  pay
their  institution’s  tuition  even  while  taking  the  capstone  semester.  The  State  of
Pennsylvania  enables  this  by  paying  the  difference  between  the  home  school’s  tui-
tion and the actual cost of the capstone semester experience.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

With  the  drop-off  in  demand  for  semiconductor  manufacturing  technicians  which
occurred  in  the  2000–2001  time  period  and  with  the  increasing  hiring  of  the  NMT
Partnership  students  by  chemical,  information  storage,  and  pharmaceutical  compa-
nies, it became apparent that micro- and nano-scale fabrication and characterization
training should not be focused only on semiconductor manufacturing but that there
was a ubiquitous need. The dramatically changed fortunes of the semiconductor in-
dustry at that time also taught the Partnership that students must be prepared for
a  lifetime  of  changes  and  shifts.  As  a  consequence,  the  capstone  semester  courses
were  refocused  to  provide  even  more  general  training  in  micro-  and  nano-scale  fab-
rication, synthesis, and characterization. The community colleges of the Partnership
responded  by  modifying  additional  curricula  and  thereby  inserting  the  capstone  se-
mester  into  degree  programs  in  fields  such  as  chemistry,  manufacturing,  and  life
sciences.  The  on-set  of  these  changes  and  their  continuing  evolution  may  be  seen
in  Fig.  1.  With  this  broadening  of  the  Partnership,  micro-  and  nano-scale  fabrica-
tion, synthesis, and characterization education areas, companies such as Rohm and
Haas,  Merck,  Johnson  &  Johnson,  PPG,  and  Lockheed  Martin  joined  the  Industry
Advisory Board. The current composition of that Board is seen in Table I. The broad
spectrum  of  Pennsylvania  companies  that  have  hired  NMT  Partnership  graduates
is presented in Table II.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Being designated as an NSF ATE center has been absolutely critical to our being
able  to  broaden  our  educational  impact  and  to  our  success.  It  has  enabled  the  pro-
gram to go from a Partnership of seven community colleges and Penn State in 2001
to  a  Partnership  of  all  14  PA  community  colleges  plus  Penn  State  campuses  and
the  Pennsylvania  State  System  of  Higher  Education.  Today  the  Partnership’s  mis-
sion  can  be  summarized  as  the  following:  to  educate  a  workforce  that  is  skilled  in
micro- and nano-scale manufacturing concepts in which can be transferred from in-
dustry  to  industry  as  the  economic  winds  wax  and  wane.  In  short,  we  want  to  pro-
vide  students  with  an  excellent,  broad  education  and  the  ability  to  take  advantage
of career opportunities as they may occur across a wide spectrum of industries. We
want  to  make  industry  cutting  edge  and  competitive  and  to  give  it  a  cutting  edge
and competitive workforce that can adjust to rapid change. We also want to provide
two-year degree students with clearly defined pathways to a variety of four year de-
gree  opportunities.  With  that  latter  objective  in  mind,  the  four-year  degree  State
System  of  Higher  Education  schools  have  been  added  to  the  Partnership.  Working
with the two-year degree institutions, these schools have created pathways whereby
two-year  degree  graduates  can  use  the  capstone  semester  credits  to  build  four  year
degrees in chemistry with a concentration in nanotechnology, in biology with a con-
centration  in  nanotechnology,  in  physics  with  a  concentration  in  nanotechnology,
and in engineering technology with a concentration in nanotechnology.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Question 2: What demographic profile does your program draw? How have
you faced the challenge of recruiting more students to your program?

The  demographic  profile  of  the  students  at  NMT  Partnership  schools  is  that  of
the  21  community  colleges  and  other  two-year-degree  granting  institutions  in  the
Partnership from across Pennsylvania. Figure 2 gives the female and minority com-
positions  of  the  students  who  take  the  capstone  semester.  The  representations  for
females and minorities is close to that seen across the country for engineering. The
Partnership has embarked on using three day Nanotech Camps, held in the summer
at  University  Park  for  high  school  students,  as  a  recruitment  tool  and  a  means  to
increase female and minority interest in nanotechnology-based manufacturing. Last
summer a total of 206 high school students attended these Nanotech Camps at Penn
State. Of these students, 50 percent were under-represented minorities and 56 per-
cent  were  female.  This  summer,  it  is  anticipated  that  50  percent  of  the  attendees
will  be  female.  Further,  of  the  10  Nanotech  Camps  scheduled,  four  will  be  exclu-
sively for under-represented minorities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

Community  colleges  find  that  recruiting  students  for  technology  programs  is  dif-
ficult whether addressing minority, female, or general populations. At least some of
the reasons for this problem lie in (1) parental desire for students to attend a four-
year  degree  school,  (2)  a  perceived  lack  of  clear  paths  to  four-year  degrees  for  stu-
dents  attending  two-year  degree  schools,  (3)  a  nation-wide  aversion  to  science  and
technology,  and  (4)  lack  of  aggressive  marketing  by  the  community  colleges.  In  the
NMT Partnership, the various schools recruit their students. Partnership participa-
tion arms them with distinct, advantageous points to convey to prospective students
and  their  parents.  These  include:  (1)  students  will  have  a  hands-on  opportunity  to
work  with  the  latest  equipment  and  learn  the  very  latest  technology  from  practi-
tioners,  (2)  students  will  spend  one  semester  in  the  environment  of  a  research  uni-
versity,  (3)  students  will  get  more  hands-on  experience  than  four-year  engineering
students,  (4)  pathways  are  in  place  for  two-year  students  to  continue  to  four-year
degree programs with nanotechnology concentrations, and (5) two-year degree NMT
graduates  of  Partnership  schools  have  been  receiving  salaries  in  the  $30,000  to
$50,000 per year range. Even with these ‘‘sales-points,’’ the marketing of the unique
micro-and  nanotechnology  education  opportunities  provided  in  Pennsylvania  to
counselors,  teachers,  parents,  and  students  has  been  hampered  by  (4)  above;  i.e.,
lack of aggressive marketing by the community colleges.

The  Partnership  has  prepared  materials  and  tools  to  assist  in  marketing  efforts.
Included  are  nanotechnology  product  bags  showing  some  of 
latest
nanotechnology-based consumer products, web access to nanotechnology tools for re-
mote operation, a movie on a day in the life of a student who is taking the capstone
experience,  testimonials  from  industry,  testimonials  from  graduates,  and  a  public
service  announcement  from  the  PA  Governor.  Many  of  these  may  be  seen  on  the
Partnership  web  site  www.cneu.psu.edu.  In  addition  the  Partnership  holds
nanotechnology workshops for middle school and high school teachers to work to cre-
ate  a  cadre  of  teachers  who  understand  the  far  reaching  impact  of  this  technology.
To  date  over  500  teachers  have  taken  these  workshops.  However,  all  these  efforts
are only useful when coupled with a strong marketing effort. Community college fac-
ulty  do  not  seem  to  have  the  time  to  do  the  needed  recruiting,  community  colleges
do not seem to have adequate marketing capabilities, and administrators worry sup-
port  for  nanotechnology  education  programs  such  as  the  PA  NMT  partnership  will
evaporate.

the 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Question  3:  How  do  you  determine  your  math/science  curriculum?  What
steps  do  your  partner  community  college  institutions  take  to  ensure  stu-
dents can meet the demands of your program?

With the added resources available since becoming an NSF ATE center, our Part-
nership  has  grown  to  21  institutions  offering  33  nanotechnology  two-year  degrees
across  Pennsylvania.  Each  school  uses  the  capstone  semester  as  an  integral  part  of
its two-year degree programs which are based on micro- and nano-scale fabrication,
synthesis, and characterization. Each institution has tailored these degrees to meet
the  industry  focus  in  its  area.  For  example,  the  two-year  degree  programs  in  the
Pittsburgh area tend to be materials processing oriented. Those in the Philadelphia
area  tend  to  be  chemistry  and  biotechnology  oriented.  The  two-year  degrees  offered
by Partners run the gambit from nano-manufacturing to nano-biotechnology.

With this number of institutions and this variety of degree types feeding into the
capstone  semester  hands-on  experience,  it  is  not  feasible  to  even  attempt  to  stand-
ardize  the  math/science  courses  and  curriculum  base  for  the  Partnership.  To  try  to
do  so  would  take  years  since  each  institution  has  its  own  course  and  curriculum
committees  and  procedures.  Rather  than  attempting  this  approach,  we  chose  to
standardize  the  skill  set  that  must  be  provided  by  each  math/science  curriculum
feeding into the capstone semester. Each institution must certify that this required
skill set is met by each student it sends to the capstone semester. The capstone se-
mester  then  builds  on  this  entry  skill  set.  Students  emerge  from  the  capstone  se-
mester  with  the  technician  skill  set  established  by  the  Industry  Advisory  Board.
This is shown in Table 3.

Table III

Skill Set Acquired from the Capstone Semester

Micro- and Nanotechnology Foundation Skills
• Basics of Chemical and Material Properties
• Chemical and Materials Handling
• Health, Safety, and Environmental Concerns
• Cleanroom Use, Design, and Maintenance
• Pumps, Flow Control Systems, Scrubbers, Sensors: Use and Maintenance
• Vacuum Systems: Use and Maintenance
• Plasma Generating Systems: Use and Maintenance
• Furnaces: Use and Maintenance
• Chemical Reaction Systems: Use and Maintenance
• Contamination Control
• Process Integration
• Introduction to Statistical Process Control
• Biocompatibility

Micro- and Nanotechnology Synthesis and Fabrication Skills

• Pattern Generation
• Chemical, Physical, and Biological Self-Assembly
• Nanoparticles: Colloidal Chemistry
• Nanoparticles: Plasma and Grinding/Milling Approaches
• Nanoparticles: Chemical Vapor Deposition

• Optical, E-beam, Stamping, and Imprinting Lithography
• Etching and Deposition
• Chemical Vapor and Physical Vapor Deposition
• Materials Modification

• Bottom-up

• Top-down

• Hybrid

Micro- and Nanotechnology Characterization Skills

• Optical Microscopy

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

• Scanning Probe Microscopy

• Atomic Force Microscopy

• Electron Microscopy

• Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM and Field Emission SEM)
• Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM and Field Emission TEM)

• Chemical Characterization

• X-ray (Energy Dispersive Spectroscopy)
• Secondary Ion Mass Spectroscopy
• Auger Electron Spectroscopy
• Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy

• Electrical Characterization

• Current-Voltage Measurements
• Capacitance Measurements
• Opto-electronic Device Measurements

• Physical Characterization

• Spectrophotometer
• Profilometer
• X-ray Diffraction

Micro- and Nanotechnology Professional skills

• Team Building
• Problem Solving
• Project Organization and Planning
• Research Skills
• Assessing Cost of Ownership
• Presentation Skills
• Technical Reporting and Documentation
• Intellectual Property

Question  4:  What  is  the  ideal  role  for  industry  partners  in  developing  and
running a successful tech-training program? Please elaborate on industry’s
role  in  creating  skill  standards,  developing  curriculum,  providing  student
development  opportunities,  defraying  the  cost  of  equipment,  and  hiring
graduates.

For a meaningful advanced manufacturing and technology education program, in-
dustry must be involved from the inception. This was the situation for our Partner-
ship—in  1998  companies  such  as  Lucent,  Fairchild,  and  Air  Products  went  to  the
Pennsylvania government with Penn State representatives to argue for the semicon-
ductor  oriented  micro-  and  nanofabrication  education  effort.  This  evolved  into  the
33 very broad micro- and nano-scale manufacturing technology two-year degree pro-
grams  of  today’s  NSF  ATE  center.  From  the  very  beginnings  these  companies,  and
the  26  additional  companies  that  have  joined  them  over  the  ensuing  nine  years,
have  constituted  our  program’s  Industry  Advisory  Board.  We  have  worked  to  keep
this group small enough to be active and interactive and yet broad enough to encom-
pass  representatives  from  all  the  various  Pennsylvania  industries  now  impacted  by
nanotechnology from pharmaceuticals to the alternative-energy companies and from
information  storage  to  measurement  tools  companies.  Our  current  Industry  Advi-
sory  Board  (Table  I)  last  met  this  past  May  2007  in  its  Partnership  guidance  role.
An Industry Advisory Board plays an extremely crucial role in advanced manufac-
turing  and  technology  education  for  the  very  basic  reason  that  it  tells  you  if  what
you are doing is meaningful, or not, to companies. One must temper its advice, how-
ever,  with  the  understanding  that  in  some  cases  an  industry  view  can  be  a  very
‘‘this  quarter’’  perspective—after  all,  in  the  beginnings  of  our  program,  before  the
collapse of much of the semiconductor manufacturing in this country, we were being
told to emphasize the semiconductor industry aspect of micro- and nano-scale manu-
facturing.  Nonetheless,  the  Industry  Advisory  Board  and  its  input  to  courses  and
curriculum  has  been  the  principal  force  in  shaping  our  program.  Every  year  the
Board  reviews  the  skill  set  responsibilities  of  the  community  colleges,  the  course
content of the capstone semester courses taught for the community college by Penn

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

State,  and  the  skill  set  to  be  developed  in  the  capstone  semester  experience.  The
current capstone semester skill set that comes out of this industry input, just modi-
fied as a result of the May 2007 Board meeting, is seen in Table III.

The innovation and vision of research intensive universities is sought after by in-
dustry  to  aid  in  keeping  their  products  on  the  cutting  edge  and  competitive  inter-
nationally.  That  same  innovation  and  vision  of  research  intensive  universities  is
also needed to aid in keeping community colleges on the cutting edge of skilled tech-
nician  and  production  worker  education.  The  ‘‘this  quarter’’  perspective  that  indus-
try can sometimes bring in its assessment of workforce skill needs can be tempered
by the ‘‘next decade’’ perspective of products and manufacturing that a research in-
tensive  university  can  bring.  This  perspective  is  critical  to  the  students’  well  being
and to the country’s long term economic health. Students must be educated with an
understanding of basic fabrication, synthesis, and characterization and imbued with
the basic desire to continue to want to learn. It is only this approach that will allow
the  workforce—and  ultimately  the  country—to  adapt  to  the  changing  needs,  which
surely will come, in high-tech manufacturing.

A  proposed  list  of  the  ideal  roles  industry  can  play  in  advanced  technical  edu-
cation programs such as micro- and nano-scale fabrication, synthesis, and character-
ization is the following:

(1) Delineate  the  skills  needed  for  workers  and  evolve  these  as  the  industries

react to competition and market forces

(2) Monitor courses and curricula to insure these skills are taught
(3) Assist with student recruitment
(4) Provide student development opportunities such as internships
(5) Assist with equipment costs
(6) Hire graduates

Research  intensive  universities  should  have  an  equally  important  role  in  ad-
vanced technical education programs such as micro- and nano-scale fabrication, syn-
thesis,  and  characterization.  A  proposed  list  of  the  ideal  roles  research  intensive
universities can play is the following:

(1) Balance the near-term perspective of industry with the longer-term perspec-

tive of a research university

(2) Provide the facilities and resident expertise as a service to allow community
colleges to offer hands-on experiences in a broad variety of micro- and nano-
scale manufacturing processes

(3) Provide  the  facilities  and  resident  expertise  to  offer  ‘‘teaching-the-teachers’’
education  for  keeping  community  college  faculty  current  in  manufacturing
technology

(4) Assist community colleges with the development of student recruitment ma-
terials  (e.g.,  provide  brochures,  web  access  to  equipment,  web  available  in-
formational materials)

The  motivation  for  industry  to  play  these  proposed  roles  in  advanced  technology
education  is  well  understood.  The  motivation  for  research  intensive  universities  to
play  the  roles  proposed  for  them  for  advanced  technology  education  is  less  clear.
There  is  a  well  established  innovation  path  from  research  universities  to  industry
which  turns  new  ideas  in  the  laboratory  into  products.  It  is  considered  prestigious
to  participate  in  this  pathway.  There  needs  to  be  an  equivalent  innovation  path
from  universities  to  technology  education  which  turns  new  ideas  in  the  laboratory
into  skills  and  learning  in  the  technology  classroom.  Being  a  participant  on  this
pathway needs to be deemed equally prestigious. Innovation has to move to industry
rapidly  to  keep  it  competitive.  Innovation  has  to  move  to  the  technology  classroom
equally rapidly to keep the country’s workforce competitive and to provide a lifetime
of opportunities for technical workers. Perhaps something like a Morrill Act for the
21st century is needed to insure that innovation and cutting edge developments are
moved  quickly  into  the  teaching  of  the  ‘‘branches  of  learning  as  are  related
to. . .(the) mechanic arts.’’

BIOGRAPHY FOR STEPHEN J. FONASH

Dr.  Stephen  Fonash  holds  the  Bayard  D.  Kunkle  Chair  in  Engineering  Sciences,
at  the  Pennsylvania  State  University.  He  is  also  the  Chairman  and  Chief  Tech-
nology  Officer  of  NanoHorizons,  a  nanoscale-materials  engineering  company.  Dr.
Fonash’s  activities  at  Penn  State  include  serving  as  the  Director  of  Penn  State’s

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

Center  for  Nanotechnology  Education  and  Utilization  (CNEU)  and  as  the  Director
of the National Science Foundation Advanced Technology Education Center.

Prof. Fonash’s education contributions focus on nanotechnology workforce develop-
ment  and  on  nanotechnology  secondary  and  post-secondary  education.  His  research
activities encompass the processing and device physics of micro- and nanostructures
including  solar  cells,  sensors,  and  transistors.  Current  research  activities  include
studies of the effects of nanoparticle plasmon-related enhancement of optical charac-
terization  techniques,  electrical  sensing  based  on  nanowires,  and  nanowire  transis-
tors.  He  has  published  over  300  refereed  papers  in  the  areas  of  education,
nanotechnology, photovoltaics, microelectronics devices and processing, sensors, and
TFTs.  His  book  ‘‘Solar  Cell  Device  Physics’’  has  been  termed  the  ‘‘bible  of  solar  cell
physics’’  and  his  solar  cell  computer  modeling  code  AMPS  is  used  by  over  600
groups  around  the  world.  Dr.  Fonash  holds  23  patents  in  his  research  areas,  many
of  which  are  licensed  to  industry.  He  has  founded  two  companies,  serves  on  the
boards  of  several  companies  and  journals,  and  is  also  a  consultant  to  a  variety  of
firms.  Prof.  Fonash  received  his  Ph.D.  from  the  University  of  Pennsylvania.  He  is
a Fellow of the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers and of the Electro-
chemical Society.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you very much, Dr. Fonash.
Mr. Mittelstadt, please.

STATEMENT OF MR. ERIC MITTELSTADT, CEO, NATIONAL

COUNCIL FOR ADVANCE MANUFACTURING

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Baird  and  Ranking
Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  very  much
appreciate  and  am  honored  to  testify  today  on  what  NACFAM  be-
lieves  is  a  critical  issue  in  the  21st  century,  and  that  is  the  need
for  a  more  highly  skilled  and  lifelong-learning  workforce.  I  com-
mend you for this hearing, and I hope that I can add to our collec-
tive understanding of the issues and what community colleges and
industries are doing to meet the demand.

Let  me  briefly  set  the  stage  for  why  higher  skill  levels  are  re-
quired of production workers and technicians now and in the future
and  why  innovative  and  collaborative  approaches  to  training  them
are  essential.  Manufacturing  has  led  the  U.S.  economy  in  produc-
tivity gains in recent years, but that productivity must continue to
increase  for  a  number  of  reasons:  these  include  demographics,  in-
creasing  customer  demands,  the  hypercompetitive  global  economy,
inevitable fluctuations in our economy, and finally because we have
fewer people than China and India have, for example, we have got
to remain more productive and innovative if we are going to remain
a world power.

To achieve the dramatic increases in manufacturing productivity
of  the  past  20  years  or  so  has  required  increasing  use  of  the  tech-
nologies  of  automation,  information  technology,  statistical  quality
control,  and  on  and  on.  To  utilize  these  effectively,  production
workers continuously need more skills. This added sophistication of
production  jobs  is  magnified  by  the  coming  dramatic  reduction  in
the size of the U.S. workforce as millions more baby-boomers retire
in  the  next  decade  than  the  number  of  new,  young  workers  enter-
ing  our  workforce.  Obviously,  this  demographic  fact  of  life  affects
all sectors, from stockbrokers to teachers, from retail salespeople to
healthcare  workers,  and  it  certainly  affects  manufacturing.  Thus,
the  current  and  near-future  outlook  for  graduates  of  technical
training  programs  is  excellent,  even  as  the  reality  of  increasing
productivity  continues  to  reduce  the  number  of  traditional  manu-
facturing jobs, similar to agriculture in the previous century.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Data  from  a  number  of  industries  show  shortages  already  of
qualified workers, and this will only get worse as the demographics
play  out.  Faced  with  this  reality,  many  companies,  their  associa-
tions  and  educational  institutions  are  all  taking  multiple  and  col-
laborative approaches to attract more students to these careers. In
addition,  companies  must  pay  higher  wages  and  benefits  to  those
positions.  They  have  got  to  increase  their  training  efforts.  They
need  to  utilize  objective-skill  standards  and  certifications.  Compa-
nies are also realizing that they cannot solve this problem by them-
selves. They are partnering with community colleges to guide tech-
prep  programs  to  address  the  required  skilled  upgrades  and  work-
ing  through  their  associations  to  attract  more  students  to  those
skilled  careers.  For  example,  the  Business  Champions  Program  of
the  Manufacturing  Institute  Center  for  Workforce  Success  encour-
ages manufacturing executives ‘‘to engage the business community,
elected  officials,  foundation  leaders  and  State  policy-makers  about
the importance of community colleges in developing a skilled work-
force.’’  Further,  their  ‘‘Dream  It  Do  It’’  program  works  to  raise  the
perception  of  manufacturing  careers  among  current  and  potential
students.

The  necessary  skills  for  even  production  workers  now  includes
STEM  education  to  enable  them  to  most  effectively  use  the  ad-
vanced  equipment  and  techniques  so  essential  to  U.S.  manufac-
turing  competitiveness.  STEM  skills  are,  for  example,  included  in
the  advance-manufacturing  competency  model  sponsored  by  the
Department  of  Labor,  in  whose  development,  we  at  NACFAM  and
other  industry  associations  participated.  STEM  skills  are  also  in-
cluded  in  the  manufacturing-skills  standards  council  work  of
NACFAM  with  the  American  Federation  of  Laborers  Working  for
America Institute.

In  conclusion,  today  there  is  great  progress  being  made,  but  the
challenges  are  even  greater.  The  required  21st  century  workforce
skills  are  not  only  important  to  every  individual  worker,  they  are
increasingly becoming essential for continued American innovation,
and therefore, prosperity. Moreover, as daunting as these workforce
challenges  are,  they  are  only  one  of  many  facing  U.S.  manufactur-
ers. In the new paradigm of network-centric manufacturing, a new
level of what we call intense collaboration is required among OEMs
and  suppliers,  but  also  with  labor  education  and  government.  The
future competitiveness of our nation depends on the success on the
intense  collaboration,  including  as  it  applies  to  the  critical  issues
being discussed here today.

NACFAM  is  looking  forward  to  working  with  you  to  make  it  all

happen. Thank you very much.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mittelstadt follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ERIC MITTELSTADT

A  key  issue  facing  our  great  nation  in  the  21st  century  is  the  need  for  a  more
highly trained work force to maintain the U.S. position as a world power. NACFAM
commends the Subcommittee for this hearing, and hopes it can add to the collective
understanding  of  the  issues  and  what  community  colleges  and  industry  are  doing
to meet the demand.

While  today’s  focus  is  on  production  workers  and  technicians,  many  of  the  points
herein  apply  to  most  sectors  of  the  U.S.  economy.  It  is  helpful  to  set  the  stage  for
why  higher  skill  levels  are  required  of  these  workers  now  and  even  more  so  in  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

future,  and  why  innovative  and  collaborative  approaches  to  training  for  them  are
essential.

Manufacturing  has  led  the  U.S.  economy  in  productivity  gains  in  recent  years.
Overall the concerns of the 80’s and into the 90’s that Japan would surpass our pro-
ductivity  have  been  put  to  rest.  Today  however,  there  are  new  challenges  from
China  and  India  especially,  and  in  the  remainder  of  this  new  century  others  will
arise as other nations in Southeast Asia, Latin America, Africa and even the Middle
East,  seek  to  improve  their  economies  and  the  standard  of  life  of  their  citizens.
Therefore,  manufacturing  productivity  must  continue  to  increase  for  a  number  of
reasons:

lower prices.

population and increasing demand (output).

• Demographics—tens of millions fewer workers (input) by 2018, but a growing
• Consumer  pressures  for  higher  quality,  content  and  customization  at  ever
• An  increasingly  ‘‘hyper-competitive’’  global  economy  as  more  and  more  na-
• The inevitable fluctuations in the economy—when times are tough, companies
• And  finally,  because  the  U.S.  has  fewer  people  than  China  and  India  for  ex-
ample,  we  must  be  more  productive,  and  innovative,  for  the  America  to  re-
main a world power.

tions seek to improve their economies to become more like America.

must squeeze every penny they can out of costs just to survive.

This need for increased productivity generates some inescapable trends:

• The  need  for  increased  productivity  means  producing  more  (output)  with
• Thus, there will be an inevitable reduction in the number of traditional man-

fewer workers (input).

ufacturing jobs.

• Similar  to  agriculture  in  the  previous  century,  but  hopefully  not  as  se-

vere, and also necessary because of the shrinking workforce.

• The  experience  lost  by  the  retirement  of  the  ‘‘baby-boomers’’  along  with  the
increasing use of technology on the factory floor requires well-trained workers
and lifelong learning to keep those skills current.

• Another  way  of  looking  at  this  is  that  the  experience  of  the  retirees  will
be  replaced  by  the  increased  skills  of  younger  workers  because  the  latter
can’t  possibly  enter  the  workforce  with  the  experience  of  those  retiring
from it.

• All of this requires innovation in both product and process development & de-
ployment,  and  also  in  labor-market  policies  by  businesses  as  well  as  in  the
education and training practices of the institutions preparing workers for the
future.

Achieving  the  dramatic  increases  in  manufacturing  productivity  over  the  past  20
years  or  so  has  required  increasing  use  of  the  technologies  of  automation,  informa-
tion technology, statistical quality control, lean, just-in-time delivery, etc. To utilize
these  technologies  effectively  means  manufacturing  production  jobs  require  more
skills, including STEM capabilities even on the factory floor. This added sophistica-
tion  of  production  jobs  is  magnified  by  the  coming  dramatic  reduction  in  the  size
of the U.S. workforce because the ‘‘baby-boomers’’ retiring over the next decade will
be  millions  more  than  the  number  of  new  young  workers  entering  the  workforce.
Obviously  this  demographic  fact  of  life  affects  all  sectors—from  stock  brokers  to
teachers,  from  retail  sales  people  to  health  care  workers,  and  certainly  includes
manufacturing. Thus the current and near-future outlook for graduates of technical
training  programs  is  excellent  even  as  the  reality  of  increasing  productivity  con-
tinues  to  reduce  the  number  of  traditional  manufacturing  jobs  just  as  happened  in
agriculture  the  previous  century.  Data  from  a  number  of  industries  already  show
shortages  of  technicians  with  the  necessary  qualifications.  For  example,  the  Na-
tional  Association  of  Manufacturers  (NAM)  2005  Skills  Gap  survey  said  that  ‘‘over
80 percent of respondents stated they face, right now, shortages of qualified employ-
ees including skilled production employees, scientists and engineers.’’ This will only
get worse as the demographics play out.

Faced with the current and growing shortage of qualified technicians, many com-
panies,  their  associations,  and  educational  institutions  are  all  taking  multiple  and
collaborative  steps  to  attract  more  students  to  careers  as  ‘‘skilled  technicians’’  re-
quired  for  both  engineering  and  production  work  in  the  21st  century.  For  example,
successful  companies  must  pay  higher  wages  and  benefits  for  many  of  these  posi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

tions  to  attract  the  scarce  talent  they  need  to  effectively  utilize  their  production
technologies  and  to  continue  to  increase  their  productivity  and  competitiveness.
They  are  also  increasing  their  training  efforts,  utilizing  skill  standards  and  certifi-
cations to assure that the people they hire and train have the necessary skills, and
improving their retention practices. All of this leads to more students seeing the ad-
vantages  of  ‘‘skilled  technician’’  careers  with  companies  that  care  about  them  as
skilled individuals.

Perhaps  most  importantly,  companies  are  realizing  that  they  cannot  solve  this
problem  by  themselves  or  just  by  complaining  to  educational  and  training  entities.
They  are  increasingly  partnering  with  community  colleges  to  guide  their  tech-prep
programs to address the required skill upgrades, and working through their associa-
tions  to  attract  more  students  to  careers  as  skilled  technicians  and  skilled  produc-
tion workers.

One significant example of this is the Dream It Do It program of the NAM Manu-
facturing  Institute’s  Center  for  Work  Force  Success.  This  program  aims  at  raising
the  perception  of  manufacturing  careers  among  current  and  potential  students.  It
is  a  regional  approach  to  ‘‘Manufacturing  Careers  Campaign(s). . .providing  youth-
oriented  awareness  and  education  initiatives  designed  to  captivate  and  prepare  the
next generation of skilled American manufacturing talent.’’

Another  example  is  their  Business  Champions  program  to  encourage  manufac-
turing  executives  ‘‘to  engage  the  business  community,  elected  officials,  foundation
leaders  and  State  policy-makers  to  learn  more  about  community  colleges  including
their  strengths  and  challenges  in  developing  a  skilled  workforce.’’  With  ‘‘45  percent
of  all  undergraduate  students  enrolled  in  community  colleges,’’  this  program  recog-
nizes  the  necessity  for  business  to  partner  with  those  institutions  to  advise  them
on what is required to prepare students for the more demanding jobs of the future.
The necessary skills needed by even production workers today include the knowl-
edge  derived  from  STEM  education.  With  this  knowledge  they  can  more  effectively
use  the  automation,  IT,  and  advanced  production  techniques  so  essential  to  U.S.
manufacturing  competitiveness.  This  can  be  seen  in  the  Advanced  Manufacturing
Competency  Model  developed  by  the  Department  of  Labor  (DOL)  with  help  from
NACFAM, the National Association of Manufacturers (NAM), the National Institute
for Metalworking Standards (NIMS), the Society of Manufacturing Engineers, et al.
The  foundation  for  the  Competency  Model  is  derived  from  research  done  by  the
Manufacturing  Skill  Standards  Council  (MSSC)  as  part  of  a  project  co-managed  by
NACFAM  and  the  American  Federation  of  Labor’s  Working  for  America  Institute.
Key  elements  of  the  Model  include  STEM  skills,  collaboration,  problem  identifica-
tion,  communication,  team  and  various  other  skills  requirements  for  production
workers and first line supervisors in the MSSC and other skill standards mentioned
above.

Expanding on the latter two examples, and adding others:

• Advanced Manufacturing Competency Model (DOL)

• Led by industry and government
• Tied  to  existing  manufacturing  standards,  including:  AWS  (welding),
• Used  to  describe  needed  competencies  and  as  one  basis  for  DOL  grants

NIMS (metalworking), MSSC, etc.

• Manufacturing Skill Standards Council (MSSC)

• Led by industry and labor, with input from education and government
• Focused on production workers and first-line supervisors
• Covers all manufacturing industries
• Validated standards, assessments, certification process
• Uses textbook and curriculum to prepare workers for testing

• Career Cluster Initiative (Department of Education—DOE)

• Led by industry, education and government including the states
• Aimed  at  providing  career  paths  for  all  sectors  and  curriculum  for  them
• NACFAM leads the Advanced Manufacturing effort in this initiative

• STEM Talent Development Regional Conferences

spective

• Led  by  MEP  centers  so  far,  with  NACFAM  assistance  and  national  per-
• With  industry,  labor,  education,  government  in  a  regional  economic  area
• For example, Philadelphia regional conference

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

• 170 attendees paid fees to attend
• Determined  what  needed  to  be  done  by  whom  and  with  whom  at  re-

gional, State and national levels

• Within  two  weeks  of  the  event  set  up  a  ‘‘Regional  Compact’’  to  drive

action in detail

• Conducted the project without taxpayer money!

These  examples  only  scratch  the  surface,  but  they  show  there  is  great  progress

being made. Nevertheless, the challenges are even greater.

As  daunting  as  the  workforce  issues  are,  they  are  only  one  of  many  challenges
facing U.S. manufacturers. Based on NACFAM’s research with a number of compa-
nies  in  various  industries,  the  biggest  trend  in  the  future  shape  of  manufacturing
is toward ‘‘network-centric manufacturing’’; that is, OEMs are increasingly becoming
assemblers  or  integrators.  They  purchase  systems,  subsystems  and  components  not
only  manufactured,  but  increasingly  also  engineered,  developed,  and  often  invented
by their supply chain; i.e., by the ‘‘network.’’

This requires significantly more capability throughout the supply chain, including
over 300,000 smaller manufacturers (SMMs). These SMMs face the same challenges
as  the  OEMs,  but  without  the  resources  of  big  companies  to  cope  with  them.  This
puts  significant  strain  on  the  smaller  companies  and  on  the  infrastructure  sup-
porting  them.  It  is  especially  critical  in  Defense  procurement  because  the  large  de-
fense OEMs are in many cases dependent on SMMs for mission critical components
and/or systems.

This  new  paradigm  requires  ‘‘intense  collaboration’’  among  people  and  among  or-
ganizations including not only OEMs and their suppliers (often smaller SMMs), but
also  in  many  cases  with  education  and  government  entities.  It  also  requires  better
‘‘connectivity’’  for  the  exchange  of  data  and  information  to  improve  real  time  per-
formance for global competitiveness.

Concerning the infrastructure, these increasing requirements for especially SMMs
demand  more  efficient  and  effective  alignment  of  Federal  Government  programs
with the real needs of those extended enterprises; i.e., the ‘‘networks’’. Also required
is  more  alignment  of  programs  across  federal  agencies,  not  only  for  economic  effi-
ciency,  but  also  because  SMMs  simply  do  not  have  the  resources  to  sort  out  which
programs will help solve their problems. Thus, another requirement is easier access
to  the  multiplicity  of  government  programs  so  they  can  do  the  job  they  were  in-
tended to do for SMMs.

Advanced manufacturing ‘‘intense collaboration’’ means OEMs and their suppliers,
often  SMMs,  must  work  together  among  themselves,  and  with  government,  labor,
educators, and others in the community to address problems industry cannot handle
on  its  own.  Chief  among  such  problems  is  the  issue  of  increasing  skill  levels  in
American  manufacturing  workers,  the  subject  of  this  hearing.  NACFAM’s  role  is
often  to  broker  the  required  ‘‘intense  collaboration’’  among  the  different  sectors  of
industry, labor, education and government because it has members in most of these
sectors.

Business implications of ‘‘network-centric manufacturing’’:

• For OEMs and SMMs, competitiveness comes from:

• Innovation—new technologies, products, processes
• Faster times to market with the resulting products
• The  help  of  the  entire  network,  including  skilled  employees,  educators

and government at all levels

• This requires robust capabilities at all manufacturing tiers in:

• Innovative product and process design and development
• Supply chain collaboration and connectivity
• Increasingly in corporate citizenship, including sustainability, green man-

ufacturing, etc.

• Creative labor-market policies for the above needs

Worker implications of ‘‘network-centric manufacturing’’:

• Because  of  the  demands  on  businesses,  workers  of  the  future  at  all  levels

must be enabled to work in a more ‘‘network-centric’’ way with:

• More skills in science, technology, engineering & math (STEM)
• Collaboration  skills  for  teamwork,  inside  and  outside  of  their  companies

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

• Creativity,  analytic  and  problem  solving  skills  for  greater  innovation  in

product and process

• Continuous updating of all these skills to be:

• The best they can be for their current positions and employers
• Easily mobile to other jobs in new industries

To respond to these needs educators must:

• Collaborate  with  industry  to  understand  its  needs,  both  current  and  future
• Collaborate  with  government  to  innovatively  optimize  the  return  on  public

dollars they spend

Government implications:

• In today’s constrained budget environment, focus must be not only on funding
levels (input), but more importantly return on public dollars (output), e.g., for:
• R&D—new industries and jobs from new technologies, products and proc-
esses  we  cannot  imagine  today,  just  as  in  past  decades  we  could  not
imagine much of what we take for granted today

• Workforce  investment,  including  economies  of  use  with  regional  &  eco-

nomic development activities

• Government  at  best  will  take  time  to  achieve  its  strategy  for  U.S.  manufac-

turing; at worst it will not get much done

What progressive companies must do:

• Manufacturers must hedge by doing all they can for themselves and their em-

ployees, including more creatively:

— Recruiting new workers, both entering and displaced
— Retaining  existing  workers  through  empowerment  to  accomplish  mean-
ingful goals, competitive compensation policies, and trust that they truly
want to contribute

— Training incumbent workers to continuously upgrade their skills as well

as experience

— Utilizing employees past their traditional retirement age
— Leveraging foreign labor without losing U.S. competitiveness

— Companies that succeed in all of this will prosper

All of this suggests that metrics for strengthening U.S. manufacturing should be:
• Not  just  how  many  manufacturing  jobs  there  are,  although  this  is  obviously:

• Critical to the people involved, but it measures only input
• Especially with a shrinking workforce, output is also essential

• Similarly, percent of GDP is misleading; for example:

• New  components  of  GDP  (telecom,  homeland  security,  disaster  recon-

struction, etc.)

• Mean lower percent of GDP for manufacturing even if absolute manufac-

turing output grows, as it has.

• More important is the manufacturing output increase from:

• Unimaginable  new  industries  with  new  jobs  as  a  result  of  R&D,  both

public and private

• Automation, Lean, 6-Sigma, Just-in-Time, etc.

Because  we  all  want  to  help  the  American  worker,  government  needs  to  cre-

atively:

• Encourage and enable workers to continuously learn to:

• Prepare themselves to be the best they can be today, and
• Be ready for new jobs not now imagined
• Not just try to preserve old jobs, but rather:

• Devise innovative ways to minimize unemployment

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

• Creatively  mitigate  inevitable  short-term  displacements  in  a  growing  econ-
omy;  e.g.,  worker  retraining,  health  care  assistance,  transferable  pensions,
etc.

• Make  its  policies  and  programs  for  manufacturing  the  most  competitive  and

accessible, vis-a´-vis other countries

Key points to leave with you today:

• Leadership is essential in today’s ‘‘flat world’’
• Importance of output rather than only input

• In everything we do, whether for our company or our country

• Trend to ‘‘network-centric manufacturing’’ demands:

• ‘‘Intense collaboration’’ and connectivity among business, labor, education

and government

• Innovation especially in labor-market policies such as:

• Greater  recognition  of  the  criticality  of  skilled  production  workers

and technicians to American economic prosperity

• More recognition of and support for the important role of community

colleges in educating those workers and technicians

• Encouragement and support for lifelong learning to both workers and

employers

• Policies  for  health  care,  pensions,  etc.,  that  recognize  the  realities  of
the  21st  century  concerning  multiple  jobs  and  employers  over  the
span of almost everybody’s working lifetime

BIOGRAPHY FOR ERIC MITTELSTADT

Eric Mittelstadt since January 2005 is the Chief Executive Officer of the National
Council  for  Advanced  Manufacturing  (NACFAM),  a  leading  industry  think-tank
based  in  Washington,  DC,  focused  on  advancing  policies  to  help  make  U.S.-based
manufacturers more productive and globally competitive.

Mr. Mittelstadt is also chairman emeritus of FANUC Robotics America, the lead-
ing robotics company in the USA since 1984, and named one of ‘‘Michigan’s 11 best
companies  to  work  for’’  in  1999.  He  headed  that  organization  from  it’s  startup  as
a  joint  venture  between  General  Motors  Corporation  and  FANUC  LTD  of  Japan  in
1982, first as President and Chief Executive Officer through August, 1997, and then
as  Chairman  and  CEO  through  December  1998,  leading  it  to  $370  million  in  rev-
enue.  Before  that,  his  GM  positions  included  Managing  Director  in  Uruguay,  Prod-
uct  Planning  Director  in  both  Germany  and  Chevrolet,  and  engineering  and  man-
agement positions at GM engineering staff.

Separately,  Mr.  Mittelstadt  heads  his  own  firm,  Mittelstadt  Associates,  Inc.,  spe-
cializing in top management strategy and implementation consulting, especially con-
cerning  customer  and  employee  satisfaction,  team  building  and  financial  perform-
ance. He is a past member of the board of Ellison Technologies, Inc., a leading ma-
chine  tool  distributor  and,  through  its  Automated  Concepts,  Inc.  subsidiary,  a  long
time successful integrator of robotic systems for various industries.

Born  in  Detroit,  Mr.  Mittelstadt  received  a  BME  from  General  Motors  Institute
(now Kettering University) in 1958, an MBA from Wayne State University in 1965,
and completed the Tuck Executive Program at Dartmouth College in 1980.

Mr.  Mittelstadt  has  served  a  number  of  volunteer  organizations.  He  is  a  past
Chairman  of  the  NACFAM  Board,  and  has  been  a  member  of  the  Board  and  chair
of  its  Advanced  Manufacturing  Leadership  Forum  (AMLF).  He  has  been  a  member
of the Board of Directors of the Manufacturing Skill Standards Council (MSSC).

Mr. Mittelstadt is listed in Who’s Who in Manufacturing and Who’s Who in Entre-
preneurs.  In  1992  he  won  the  Joseph  F.  Engelberger  Award  for  Robotic  Industry
Leadership.  He  is  past  Chair  of  the  USA  Robotics  Industries  Association  (RIA),  the
International  Federation  of  Robotics  (IFR),  the  Board  of  Control  of  Michigan  Tech-
nological  University,  the  Board  of  Trustees  of  St.  Luke’s  Episcopal  Health  Min-
istries, and the South Oakland County Chamber of Commerce. He is a past member
of  the  Detroit  Regional  Chamber  of  Commerce  Board  of  Directors,  the  Oakland
County  Executive’s  Business  Roundtable,  Bloomfield  Hills  City  Planning  Commis-
sion,  Cranbrook  Schools  Board  of  Governors,  the  Vestry  of  Christ  Church
Cranbrook,  and  Past  President  and  member  of  the  board  of  the  Bloomfield  Open
Hunt.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

Mr. Mittelstadt resides in Davidson, North Carolina with his wife, Susanne, a re-
tired freelance writer and professional volunteer. The Mittelstadt’s have seven chil-
dren and fourteen grandchildren.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you very much, Mr. Mittelstadt.
Ms. Poindexter.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  MONICA  L.  POINDEXTER,  ASSOCIATE  DI-
RECTOR,  CORPORATE  DIVERSITY,  GENENTECH,  INCOR-
PORATED
Ms. POINDEXTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the
Subcommittee  for  inviting  me  to  testify  before  you  today.  One  of
my  responsibilities  has  been  to  partner  with  local  community  col-
leges  to  develop  programs  to  train  students  to  work  in  the  bio-
technology industry.

Genentech  was  founded  in  south  San  Francisco,  California,  31
years  ago  with  the  goal  of  using  human  genetic  information  to  de-
velop  novel  medicine  for  serious  and  life-threatening  diseases.  We
are among the world’s leading biotechnology company with 14 prod-
ucts  on  the  market  and  over  50  products  in  the  pipeline  and  more
than  10,000  employees.  The  key  to  our  success  has  been  our  com-
mitment to hiring the most qualified workers available and to pro-
vide an environment for them to succeed. Our goal is to recruit and
retain people who are the best at what they do, people who are mo-
tivated, who have high standards of quality and integrity and pos-
sess a flexible, entrepreneurial spirit and are committed to improv-
ing human health.

A  particular  focus  of  hiring  in  recent  years  has  been  in  the  area
of  product  manufacturing.  When  the  Food  and  Drug  Administra-
tion  approves  a  new  drug,  we  face  the  task  of  creating  up  a  tech-
nical workforce capable of manufacturing the product to the precise
standards  of  the  FDA.  Traditionally,  we  have  sought  to  hire  these
employees  from  four-year  college  institutions,  but  increasing  we
have  seen  the  benefit  of  working  with  local  community  colleges  to
develop  graduates  of  two-year  programs  who  have  the  skills  nec-
essary to succeed in our industry.

Our  experience  with  two-year  community  colleges  has  proven
they  can  be  an  important  source  of  highly-motivated,  well-trained
technical  workers.  Often,  these  students  have  some  workplace  ex-
perience  before  they  enroll  in  community  college.  Their  motivation
for attending school is to develop the skills they need to qualify for
the types of jobs we offer.

In the mid-1990s, Genentech began to work with Solano Commu-
nity  College,  located  in  Vacaville,  California,  to  develop  a  bio-
technology  certificate  program  to  provide  technical  education  to
students who had an interest in a career in biotechnology.

The  program  began  with  a  professor  on  sabbatical  from  Solano
Community  College  who  spent  six  months,  working  full  time  at
Genentech  to  gain  an  understanding  of  our  manufacturing  proc-
esses.  He  spent  an  additional  six  months  working  with  60
Genentech employees to develop a bio-manufacturing curriculum to
train students. At the time, no school in the country was providing
bio-manufacturing  training,  so  the  development  of  this  program
was the creation of a new academic discipline.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

The  program  teaches  students  the  basics  of  chemistry  and  biol-
ogy  through  a  combination  of  lectures  and  laboratory  work.  In  ad-
dition to the science of biotechnology, students learn about the reg-
ulatory  environment  in  which  we  work.  One  of  the  best  aspects  of
the  program  is  that  students  experience  working  in  a  laboratory
environment.  The  students  must  wear  protective  gowns,  work  in
teams,  prepare  batch  records,  and  perform  other  tasks  that  they
would in a real manufacturing setting. They participate in an exer-
cise  in  which  they  keep  the  lab  running  around  the  clock  for  four
straight days by working in shifts. Much of their work is done with
equipment donated by Genentech.

In  2002,  we  launched  a  similar  program.  That  program  was  in-
spired in part by the events of 9/11. The airline industry struggled
following  this  tragedy,  and  many  of  the  United  Airlines  mechanics
from  the  San  Francisco  Airport  were  forced  to  seek  new  employ-
ment.  We  recognized  that  mechanics  possessed  skills  that,  with
some  training,  could  be  transferable  to  the  biotechnology  industry.
We  partnered  with  the  Center  of  Workforce  Development  at  Sky-
line  Community  College,  the  San  Mateo  County  Workforce  invest-
ment and labor Council to develop a 12- to 14-week curriculum for
a  bio-manufacturing  certificate  program.  Course  instruction  in-
cludes  basic  skills  in  biology,  bio-manufacturing,  chemistry  and  an
introduction to biotechnology careers.

Through  the  programs  in  which  we  are  involved,  we  are  able  to
help shape the curriculum to ensure that graduates have the skills
we  value  in  an  employee.  We  have  seen  more  than  500  students
graduate  from  the  various  programs  with  which  we  are  involved,
and  many  have  been  hired  by  Genentech  and  other  biotechnology
companies.

Biotechnology is a high-growth, high-wage industry that provides
an  opportunity  for  people  to  build  good,  longstanding  careers.  It  is
a  dynamic  industry  that  is  constantly  in  need  of  workers  trained
in  specific  technical  skills.  Our  experience  has  shown  that  commu-
nity  colleges  can  be  an  important  pipeline  for  the  development  of
these workers.

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today,  and  I

look forward to answering your questions.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Poindexter follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF MONICA L. POINDEXTER

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  for  inviting  me  to
testify before you today. My name is Monica Poindexter and I am the Associate Di-
rector  for  Corporate  Diversity  at  Genentech,  Inc.  One  of  my  responsibilities  at
Genentech  has  been  to  coordinate  our  efforts  with  local  community  colleges  to  de-
velop programs to train students to work in the biotechnology industry.

Genentech,  which  is  based  in  south  San  Francisco,  California,  is  considered  the
founder of the biotechnology industry. Genentech was founded 31 years ago with the
goal  of  developing  a  new  generation  of  therapeutics  created  from  genetically  engi-
neered  copies  of  naturally  occurring  molecules  important  in  human  health  and  dis-
ease. Within a few short years, Genentech scientists proved it was possible to make
medicines  by  splicing  genes  into  fast-growing  bacteria  that  produced  therapeutic
proteins.

Today,  Genentech  continues  to  use  genetic  engineering  techniques  and  advanced
technologies  to  develop  medicines  that  address  significant  unmet  needs.  Genentech
is among the world’s leading biotechnology companies, with 14 products on the mar-
ket for serious or life-threatening medical conditions, over 50 projects in the pipeline
and more than 10,000 employees.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

The key to our success has been our commitment to hire the most qualified work-
ers available and provide an environment for them to succeed. Our goal is to recruit
and  retain  people  who  are  the  best  at  what  they  do—people  who  are  motivated  to
achieve results, have high standards of quality and integrity, possess a flexible, en-
trepreneurial spirit, are committed to improving human health, and want to develop
to their full potential.

A  particular  focus  of  our  hiring  in  recent  years  has  been  in  the  area  of  product
manufacturing.  When  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  approves  a  new  drug  we
face  the  task  of  quickly  scaling  up  a  technical  workforce  capable  of  manufacturing
the  product  to  the  precise  standards  of  the  FDA.  Traditionally  we  have  sought  to
hire  these  employees  from  four-year  college  institutions,  but  increasingly  we  have
seen  the  benefit  of  working  with  local  community  colleges  to  develop  graduates  of
two-year programs who have the skills necessary to succeed in our industry.

Our experience with two-year colleges has proven they can be an important source
for  highly-motivated,  well-trained  technical  workers.  Often  these  students  have
some workplace experience before they enroll in a community college. Their motiva-
tion  for  attending  school  is  to  develop  the  skills  they  need  to  qualify  for  the  types
of  jobs  we  offer.  And  the  community  college  setting  is  ideally  suited  to  teach  these
students  how  to  work  in  a  highly  regulated  technical  environment  like  the  bio-
technology industry.

In  the  mid-1990’s,  Genentech  began  to  work  with  Solano  Community  College,  lo-
cated  in  Vacaville,  California,  to  design  a  biotechnology  certificate  program  to  pro-
vide  technical  education  to  students  interested  in  careers  in  biotechnology.  At  the
time,  we  had  just  committed  to  build  the  largest  biotech  manufacturing  facility  for
the  large-scale  production  of  pharmaceutical  proteins  in  the  world.  We  knew  we
were going to need to hire hundreds of qualified individuals to operate our new facil-
ity.

The  program  began  when  a  professor  on  sabbatical  from  Solano  Community  Col-
lege  spent  six  months  working  full-time  at  Genentech  to  gain  an  understanding  of
our  manufacturing  processes.  He  then  spent  part  of  the  next  six  months  working
with  more  than  60  Genentech  employees  to  design  a  bio-manufacturing  curriculum
to  train  students  to  work  at  Genentech  and  other  biotechnology  manufacturing  fa-
cilities in the area.

At  the  time,  no  school  in  the  country  was  providing  bio-manufacturing  training
so  the  development  of  this  program  was  the  creation  of  a  new  academic  discipline.
The  program  teaches  students  the  basics  of  chemistry  and  biology  through  a  com-
bination of lectures and laboratory work. In addition to the science of biotechnology,
students  learn  about  the  regulatory  environment  in  which  we  work.  They  learn
about the structure and authority of the Food and Drug Administration, this history
of key FDA laws, and how those laws led to the development of good manufacturing
processes.

One of the best aspects of this program is that students experience what it is real-
ly like to work in a bio-manufacturing facility. Working in a laboratory environment,
students  must  wear  protective  gowns,  work  in  teams,  batch  records,  and  perform
other  tasks  just  as  they  would  in  a  real  manufacturing  setting.  They  even  partici-
pate  in  an  exercise  in  which  they  keep  the  lab  running  around  the  clock  for  four
straight  days  by  working  in  shifts.  Much  of  their  work  is  done  with  equipment  do-
nated by Genentech.

By  the  end  of  this  program,  students  know  whether  they  have  the  interest  and
the skills to seek a career in biotech manufacturing. Roughly 60 of the 250 students
who have completed the program at Solano Community College have been hired by
Genentech  and  many  others  are  now  employed  by  other  biotech  companies  in  the
area.

The  success  of  this  program  led  to  the  creation  of  a  similar  effort  at  Miri  Costa
Community College in Oceanside, California, where we have another manufacturing
facility. The curriculum has also been replicated at other community colleges across
the country.

In 2002 we began a similar effort with a community college near our headquarters
in San Mateo County, California. This program was inspired in part by the tragedy
of  September  11,  2001.  The  airline  industry  struggled  following  9/11  and  many  of
the United Airlines mechanics at San Francisco Airport were forced to seek new em-
ployment.  We  recognized  that  the  mechanics  possessed  skills  that  with  some  train-
ing could be transferable to the biotechnology industry.

We partnered with the Center for Workforce Development at Skyline Community
College,  the  San  Mateo  County  Workforce  Investment  Board,  and  the  San  Mateo
County Labor Council to develop curriculum for a bio-manufacturing certificate pro-
gram.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

The  program  was  designed  to  prepare  students  who  possess  transferable  skills
from  other  occupations  for  entry-level  positions  in  the  biotech  industry.  Course  in-
struction  includes  basic  skills  in  biology,  bio-manufacturing,  chemistry,  and  an  in-
troduction  to  biotechnology  careers.  The  course  was  designed  through  a  joint  effort
by Skyline College, San Mateo Workforce and Development, and Genentech.

The bio-manufacturing career pathway has five key phases leading to employment

at wages of $35,000 per year and above:

1. The program begins with an outreach and assessment effort to introduce in-
dustry  opportunities  to  the  students,  gauge  the  student’s  level  of  interest,
screen for basic English and math skills, and determine the candidates abil-
ity to succeed in the program.

2. Phase 2 is a three-month bridge program to introduce students to the indus-
try,  provide  intensive  training  in  English,  math  and  computer  skills,  and
offer needed counseling and support.

3. Next is a three-month college credited course providing needed skills training
including  an  introduction  to  applied  chemistry  and  biology,  applied  math,
and lab skills.

4. Program graduates then have the opportunity to interview for a 90-day paid

try-out employment period at wages of $12–$15 per hour.

5. Finally, participants are assisted in finding full time employment.

In addition to providing training to the students, the program provides opportuni-
ties  for  continuing  education  for  the  faculty.  The  Faculty  Rotation  Program  allows
professors  to  gain  an  industry  understanding  of  the  core  Product  Operations  func-
tions  that  are  critical  to  the  manufacturing  of  Genentech  products.  It  also  provides
them the opportunity to update their skills, curriculum and teaching styles to meet
the real-time demands of industry in the classroom.

The faculty program takes place over a six to eight month period and involves five
rotation  assignments  within  our  Products  Operations  organization,  including  fer-
mentation,  recovery,  lab  services,  media  prep  and  filling.  The  rotations  provide
hands on experience and interaction with team members and management.

Following  the  success  of  the  program  at  Skyline  Community  College,  we  worked
with another local school, Ohlone Community College in Fremont, California, to de-
sign a similar program. That program has been in operation since 2004.

Since  creation  of  the  bio-manufacturing  certificate  program  at  Skyline  College,
and  the  addition  of  the  program  at  Ohlone  College,  350  students  have  successfully
completed  the  program  and  received  a  certificate.  More  than  90  percent  of  the  stu-
dents  applied  for  internships  at  Genentech  and  121  were  hired  as  interns.  In  addi-
tion,  six  graduates  were  directly  hired  as  full-time  employees  at  Genentech  and  46
of the interns have been converted to full-time employees.

Through  the  programs  in  which  we  are  involved,  we  are  able  to  help  shape  the
curriculum to ensure that graduates have the skills we value in an employee. These
programs not only set students on a successful career path but they allow companies
like ours to increase the base of qualified workers from which we can hire.

The  education  of  these  students  does  not  end  when  they  are  hired  at  Genentech.
As  with  all  employees  of  our  company,  we  provide  opportunities  for  these  workers
to  grow  their  skills  and  develop  their  careers.  Each  year  during  our  annual  manu-
facturing shut-down we encourage our workers to take courses to refresh their tech-
nical skills and build their professional development. We also offer cross-training op-
portunities, where manufacturing employees do rotations in different jobs to become
more well-rounded and gain greater understanding of entire manufacturing process.
Biotechnology  is  a  high-growth,  high-wage  industry  that  provides  opportunity  for
people to build good, long-lasting careers. It is a dynamic industry that is constantly
in  need  of  workers  trained  in  specific  technical  skills.  Our  experience  has  shown
that  community  colleges  can  be  an  important  pipeline  for  the  development  of  those
workers.

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  look  forward  to  an-

swering any questions you may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MONICA L. POINDEXTER

Monica  L.  Poindexter  is  the  Associate  Director  of  Corporate  Diversity  at
Genentech,  the  founder  of  the  biotechnology  industry  with  a  quarter-century  track
record of delivering on the promise of biotechnology. Today, Genentech is among the
worlds  leading  biotech  companies,  who  manufactures  and  commercializes  multiple
protein-based biotherapeutics for serious or life-threatening medical conditions—giv-
ing Genentech one of the leading product portfolios in the biotech industry.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

Monica has worked at Genentech for seven years; during her tenure at Genentech
Monica  has  held  positions  as  Sr.  College  Programs  Manager  &  Sr.  Staffing  Man-
ager. In these roles her responsibilities included overseeing the recruitment for New
Grad  Talent,  and  Internship/Co-op  Program  Management  at  the  Community  Col-
lege, Undergraduate and Graduate MBA, MD, JD, Ph.D. educational levels recruit-
ing  across  Genentech.  Monica  actively  participates  in  filling  the  pipeline  of  diverse
talent  by  tapping  into  professional  diverse  organizations  such  as  NSBE  (National
Society of Black Engineers) NOBCHE (National Organization of Black Chemical En-
gineers),  Black  MBA  &  Hispanic  MBA  organizations.  Monica  was  instrumental  in
developing  Genentech’s  first  formal  Operations  Rotation  Development  Program  and
is a member of ORDP Steering Committee. ORDP gives recent undergraduates and
MBA graduates the opportunity to gain a broad perspective of the core Product Op-
erations  and  Quality  functions  that  are  critical  to  the  manufacture  of  Genentech
products.  In  her  current  role  as  Associate  Director  for  Diversity,  Monica  is  respon-
sible  for  developing  comprehensive  recruitment,  retention  and  development  pro-
grams  that  create  a  culture  of  inclusion  at  Genentech  where  Diversity  of  thought,
style and cultures are valued within the company.

Monica’s work in the area of Workforce Development for Genentech has led to the
development  of  signature  programs  such  as  the  Biotechnology  Certificate  Program.
From  this  partnership  the  Department  of  Labor  awarded  a  $2  million  grant  to  a
group  of  local  work  force  investment  boards  and  community  colleges,  to  continue
work  on  programs  designed  to  train  local  workers  for  jobs  in  biotechnology.
Genentech has already developed a program in partnership Skyline Community Col-
lege  to  retrain  laid-off  airline  workers  in  the  Bay  Area  and  has  launched  the  same
program  at  Ohlone  Community  College  (Fremont,  CA).  These  programs  have  been
expanded  to  include  other  sectors  that  have  experienced  significant  reductions  in
work  force.  Genentech  helped  to  develop  the  curriculum  for  the  three-month  train-
ing  program,  which  is  designed  to  prepare  students  who  possess  transferable  skills
from  other  occupations  for  entry-level  positions  in  the  biotech  industry.  Course  in-
struction included basic skills in biology, biomanufacturing, chemistry, and an intro-
duction  to  biotechnology  careers.  The  course  and  internships  prepare  trainees  spe-
cifically  for  positions  as  Bioprocessing  Technicians,  Media  Prep  Specialists  and
Pharmaceutical  Packaging  and  Materials  Specialists.  Graduates  have  an  oppor-
tunity to interview and many have joined Genentech for both 12-week, paid industry
internship positions and regular full-time positions.

In  addition,  Monica  is  the  co-founder  of  the  Genentech  Scholars  Program.  The
goal  of  this  program  is  to  provide  an  inroad  for  diverse  students  to  gain  access  to
the biotech industry by providing, a paid internship, a scholarship and potential job
placement upon graduation. The Scholarship Program is beginning its sixth year of
service  awarding  22  Scholarships  to  targeted  Bay  Area  &  San  Diego  High  Schools,
Community Colleges and Undergraduate Institutions. To date, the Genentech Schol-
ars Program has awarded $509,000.00 in Scholarships and provided over 75 intern-
ships to the Genentech Scholars throughout the Bay Area.

In  Monica’s  spare  time  she  is  involved  in  developing  and  delivering  Business  &
Professional Etiquette workshops to Bay Area community organizations. She serves
as  an  Advisory  Board  Member  for  the  UC–Berkeley  SAGE  Scholars  Program  and
serves  on  the  State  of  CA  Workforce  Investment  Board  Life  Long  Learning  Com-
mittee.

Monica  holds  a  BA  in  Sociology  &  Law  and  Society  from  University  of  California
at  Davis  and  a  Master’s  Degree  in  Human  Resources  Organizational  Development
from the University of San Francisco. Monica is an INROADS Alumna.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  I  appreciate  the
witnesses’  perspectives,  and  particularly,  it  is  nice  to  hear  that  we
have got some success models out there.

So  the  process,  now,  is  we  will  exchange  a  series  of  questions,
and in this particular committee, we actually enjoy a good dialogue.
We  are  not  here  to  put  you  on  the  spot  or  you  are  not  taking  an
oath  in  this  case.  We  have  occasionally  done  that,  but  not  in  this
kind  of  hearing.  So  this  is  really  our  chance—if  there  are  things
that  you  feel  that  we  are  not  asking  about,  feel  free  to  pitch  those
in as well.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

One of the puzzles, as we have prepared for this hearing, is that
we  hear  a  lot  of  concern  about  the  out-sourcing  of  jobs.  We  hear,
at the same time, concern by manufacturers that they can’t get em-
ployees domestically. And then we hear that sometimes when these
programs  are  created  at  community  colleges,  there  is  a  problem
keeping enrollment.

And one of the challenges must be—and I will ask Dr. Pumphrey
this—if  you  are  trying  to  decide  whether  or  not  to  initiate  a  pro-
gram like this, you have got to decide what the costs are, what the
numbers  are,  what  the  demand  is  out  there,  where  we  are  going
to  get  it.  Exactly  how  does  this  issue  of  marketing  play  into  this
in  terms  of  assessing  the  probability  that  you  will  get  the  demand
from  the  students  to  actually  take  the  courses  if  you  make  the  in-
vestment? How does that play in?

Dr.  PUMPHREY.  If  you  have  to  evaluate  whether  we  are  going  to
have students and what the likelihood of having students would be,
I would tell you that I haven’t worked for a single college that had
a  line-item  funding  for  marketing  from  any  of  its  funding  sources,
so it tends to be an underdeveloped arm, at least in the community
colleges I have worked for.

I  think  you  have  some  challenges  around  marketing  manufac-
turing programs, unless there is a high-visibility corporation in the
community.  One  of  those  challenges  has  to  do  with  all  of  the  pub-
licity  around  things  like  outsourcing  which  has  gotten  way  more
marketing than it has substance in truth. Then many of the young
people  growing  up  now  have  been  in  households  that  have  been
through  dislocation  in  the  manufacturing  workforce,  so  that  is
something  that  we  have  to  deal  with  as  well,  so  it  can  be  a  real
challenge.

Certainly,  the  work  is  fascinating  at  this  point,  very  clean,  very
sophisticated.  It  involves  a  lot  more  discretion  by  the  individual
worker, even at the operator level, than what was true in the past.
These  are  good  careers.  Their  wages  are  above  average.  There  are
promotional  opportunities.  It  is  not  a  difficult  story  to  tell,  but  I
don’t  think  either  the  college  or  industry  have  done  enough,  as
much as they could have, to be wholly effective at marketing these
programs.

Chairman  BAIRD.  That  issue  that  you  need  an  anchor-tenant,  so
to  speak,  almost.  It  seems  critical,  and  Ms.  Poindexter,  in  your
case,  you  have  that  with  Genentech.  How  has  Genentech  reached
out to the community and to the potential pool of students and ap-
plicants  to  get  the  message  out  to  parents  and  student  and  school
counselor, et cetera, here is a potential career path? What have you
done on that front?

Ms. POINDEXTER. So I would say, number one, is partnership be-
tween  the  three  entities  of  industry,  academia,  and  government.
The  other  aspect  is  co-creation.  And  when  we  look  at  how  do  we
attract, I guess, the future-talent pipeline, biotechnology is innova-
tive. It is fun, and it is something that is new. And I think students
that  have  come  through  the  program,  it  is  word  of  mouth.  When
they  have  successes,  as  far  as  their  experience  being  in  the  bio-
technology industry, experiencing what it is like to work in a man-
ufacturing  environment,  being  responsible  for  multimillion  dollars

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

of  product,  that  is  something  to  celebrate,  something  that  is  excit-
ing and something that is new.

So  when  students  have  good  experiences,  they  talk  about  it.
When  you  have  professors  that  are  also  working  in  industry  but
also  working  at  the  college/academy,  it  is  very  easy  to  generate  a
buzz.  So  I  would  say  it  is  definitely  the  possibility  of  placement
that has helped us as well.

In  Genentech,  we  are  definitely  in  accordance  within  the  South
San  Francisco  area  and  we  have  had  a  lot  of  success  with  being
able  to  hire  students  into  entry-level  positions,  so  it  is  something
good to talk about.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Fonash,  does  Ms.  Poindexter’s  comments
sound  similar  to  your  experience,  or  are  there  other  issues  you
would like to raise on that topic?

Dr.  FONASH.  Well,  I  have  heard  a  number  of  things  here  that

sound very similar to my experience.

Number  one,  I  do,  definitely,  think  community  colleges  need
more marketing. From what I have seen, they don’t have the mar-
keting  experience;  they  don’t  do  it.  But  more  marketing  is  needed.
Parents,  generally,  are  interested  in  sending  their  child  to  a  four-
year institution, and they don’t think of two-year institutions. Peo-
ple can go to two-year institutions, and there can be very nice path-
ways to four-year institutions, but that doesn’t seem to get sold.

And then, some of these programs, the students can go to a two-
year  institution  and  actually  have  better  hands-on  experience  and
learn  more  than  they  would  in  a  four-year  program.  For  example,
in engineering—I am an engineering professor—in four years, your
students  very  infrequently  see  actual  equipment  and  get  to  work
with  equipment.  Most  of  the  training  is  theoretical.  In  a  two-year
program,  they  can  have  hands-on  with  the  very  latest  equipment.
More needs to be done in that marketing. More needs to be done
to get that idea across to the parents and to the students, so I cer-
tainly echo that comment of marketing.

The other comment about jobs, I think jobs are definitely moving
out  of  the  U.S.,  but  what  is  happening  is  it  is  sort  of  a  filtering
process.  What  you  are  left  with  are  the  more  demanding  jobs,  and
industry  is  trying  to  fill  those  more  demanding  jobs,  and  that  re-
quires  the  higher-education  standards,  and  therein  lies  the  prob-
lem. If we are going to keep those jobs in the U.S., we have to meet
those more demanding requirements of the education.

My  comments  on  what  I  have  just  heard,  I  think  that  industry
is  a  very  vital  part  of  this.  Obviously,  I,  coming  from  a  research
university, I think research universities are a very vital part of this
also, and obviously, the community college community. My mantra,
if I will, for today is that research universities do so much in their
involvement with industry, creating those new opportunities, those
new  manufacturing  possibilities.  They  need  to  do  more  with  edu-
cation at the technician level, also, and helping the community col-
lege.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  appreciate  that.  Mr.  Mittelstadt,  we  will  get
to  you  in  just  a  second.  I  would  like  to  acknowledge  my  colleague,
Dr. Ehlers, for five minutes, but I am sure you have got something
to add, so we will get back to you.

Mr. MITTELSTADT. Sure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
It  seems  to  me  that  there  are  three  potential  sources  of  good
technical workers. One would be students who have dropped out of
high  school  and  have  desire  to  get  a  good  job  and  obviously  need
some  training,  those  who  have  gone  to  high  school  and  have  opted
not to go on further than that, and those who have been employed
in  some  jobs,  perhaps  technical  jobs,  and  find  themselves  unem-
ployed for whatever reason.

Can  you  give  me—and  this  is  general  for  any  one  of  you  who
wish to comment—can you give me roughly what percentage would
be  in  each  of  those  three  categories.  Are  there  any  high  school
dropouts  that  fit  neatly  into  your  programs,  or  do  they  have  to  go
back and get a GED or go back to high school?

Dr. Pumphrey.
Dr.  PUMPHREY.  Well,  I  have  had  experience  with  that.  I  would
tell  you  that  it  is  few  and  far  between.  I  had  a  rather  remarkable
instance of a fellow who is about 40 years old, who came to our col-
lege  functioning  at  the  fourth-  or  fifth-grade  level.  He  hadn’t  fin-
ished  high  school.  He  had  a  history  of  substance  abuse  and  prob-
lems with the law, and he persisted all of the way through getting
a  GED,  had  to  take  a  couple  of  more  courses  before  staring  a  pro-
gram  in  instrumentation  and  process  control,  and  today  he  works
as an engineering technician for a very prominent company in their
research facility. Those things can happen. It is not a normal path-
way and would not be a high percentage.

At the other end of that continuum would be dislocated workers,
who  have  already  worked  in  a  manufacturing  location  and  under-
stand the culture of manufacturing and need a slightly different set
of  skills  to  move  into  new  and  developing  job  opportunities.  We
have had a lot of success with those.

And  in  the  middle  would  be  recent  high  school  graduates,  who
have  thought  about  a  lot  of  things,  but  manufacturing  careers  are
not  necessary  one  of  them.  One  of  the  conundrums  that  I  do  not
wholly  understand  is  why  we  have  waiting  lists  for  allied  health
and nursing programs, and one could talk about the working condi-
tions  and  wages  in  those  careers  in  similar  terms  that  one  might
discuss manufacturing, but they have a drawing power in the pub-
lic imagination that we haven’t been able to achieve, in most cases,
with manufacturing technicians.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Well,  I  think  a  good  part  of  that  is  you  read  many
stories  about  the  coming  shortage  of  nurses  and  that  there  will  be
lots  of  jobs.  At  the  same  time,  you  read  stories  about  Michigan—
pardon  me—U.S.  manufacturing  losing  jobs,  going  offshore  and  so
forth, so I can easily see where that would be a perception.

But  just  again,  roughly  what  percentage  would  be  the  high
school  graduates?  What  percentage  would  be  displaced  workers?
Any of you?

Dr. PUMPHREY. I will give you a statistic that may help in think-
ing  about  that.  The  average  age  of  our  student  at  our  college  par-
allel or college transfer programs is around 20, and the average age
of the students in our technical programs is around 29.

Mr. EHLERS. Okay. That is helpful. Any other comments on that?
Okay,  Ms.  Poindexter,  you  took  some  people  who  had  worked  in
manufacturing  and  converted  them  to  the  biotech  industry.  Were

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

there  any  particular  problems  in  that,  and  how  specific  did  the
training  have  to  be,  or  did  you  give  them  rather  broad-based,  gen-
eral training so they could have gone to work for any company, not
just to Genentech.

Ms.  POINDEXTER.  Right.  We  were  fortunate  to  have  one  of  our
very  own  Genentech  employees  who  was  an  adjunct  professor  at
Skyline  Community  College,  who  helped  develop  their  bio-
technology  curriculum,  based  off  of  Genentech’s  manufacturing
processes  and  procedure.  So  therefore,  the  students,  in  addition,
from that same school—from Skyline College, we had the professor
of  the  biotechnology  program  spend  almost  a  year,  on  and  off,
working  through  five  different  rotations  throughout  our  manufac-
turing facilities, and so he was then able to experience—his mantra
was  I  want  to  know  what  my  students  are  learning  so  that  when
they  are  in  the  classroom,  I  can  translate  that  into  a  curriculum
that  is  going  to  be  meaningful,  that  will  lead  to  an  exact  position
for  either  Genentech  or  for  the  broader  biotechnology  industry.  So
once again, it is that co-creation and that partnership where we are
there  in  the  classroom  as  well  as  when  the  faculty  comes  to
Genentech to learn.

Challenges,  I  would  say,  and  I  think  it  was  actually  mentioned
in  one  of  the  previous  testimonies,  was  really  just  around  the
speed, for a just-in-time workforce, and so when you have the pres-
sures of getting a product out the door, it is ensuring that you have
a  workforce  that  understands  what  it  takes  to  get  it  out  the  door.
And  so  I  think  one  of  the  pressures  has  been  to  ensure  that  we
have a viable pool, just in time to meet our demand for hiring indi-
viduals for those important positions in manufacturing.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you. My time has expired.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Mr.  McNerney  is  recognized  for  five  minutes.
Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I thank the panelists

for coming out here today.

Dr.  Fonash,  one  thing  you  said  was  that  matured  manufactures
typically  go  overseas,  and  so  in  order  to  maintain  our  sort  of  emi-
nence,  we  have  to  have  cutting-edge  and  innovative  business  that
keep us in the lead, that keep manufacturing going. That is a fairly
stiff thing to do year after year, decade after decade. Surely, main-
taining  American  university  preeminence  in  the  world  is  key  to
that,  but  also  the  need  to  produce  highly  skilled  and  innovative
technical workers.

Now,  in  my  district,  the  largest  city  is  Stockton,  California.  It
has a high school that has been very successful in turning problem
students into very motivated people through their vo-tech program.
It is strictly a vo-tech school. They have the higher rate of students
going onto college than do the academic high school, and that tells
me  that  there  is  a  huge  symbionce  between  vo-tech  and  academic
training.

Would you comment on that?
Dr.  FONASH.  Well,  one  of  the  things  that  we  have  done  in  our
partnership in Pennsylvania is to try to create a pathway from the
vo-techs  and  the  academic  high  schools  to  the  community  colleges.
We call it the two-plus-two program. And then we also work to cre-
ate  clear  pathways  from  the  community  colleges  into  the  four-year
degrees, and we call that a two-plus-two-plus-two program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

But  I  was  amazed  when  I  first  became  active  in  this  aspect  of
education that these kinds of pathways were not defined at all. At
least  in  Pennsylvania,  they  hardly  existed,  and  in  Pennsylvania,
there  were  very  few  clear  pathways  from  a  community  college  to
a university, just about no pathways from vo-tech, that is non-aca-
demic high schools, into community colleges.

I  can  proudly  say  that  since  our  partnership  as  an  ATE  center
has  been  functioning,  creating  such  pathways  has  been  one  of  our
objectives,  and  I  can  say  one  of  our  achievements  is  establishing
these  kinds  of  pathways,  and  so  we  now  have  them  in  Pennsyl-
vania, and in fact, the Pennsylvania Department of Education now
uses  our  model  for  pathways  from  vo-tech  and  academic  schools
into community colleges.

So  what  is  needed?  I  think  it  is  always  motivated  faculty,  but  I
also  think  there  has  to  be  administration  who  have  to  make  sure
there  are  clearly  defined  pathways  in  place.  Appropriate  State
agencies  have  to  take  a  look  at  this.  These  sort  of  pathways  have
to be in place. I think they are very important.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Well,  one  of  the  things  that  Ms.  Poindexter
pointed out was that these students are exposed to very high levels
of responsibility and reward for the kind of work, and I think that
motivates  the  students  to  understand  the  need  for  academic
achievement as well so that they can enhance those skills.

And  concerning  that  program  that  Genentech  has,  one  of  the
questions  I  have  is  you  worked  with  Skyline  College  in  that  you
opened  up  an  office  in  Vacaville.  I  don’t  know  if  it  is  still  open  or
not.  How  likely  is  it  that  you  will  open  an  office  in  a  location  that
has  a  community  college  that  does  put  out  good,  well-trained  stu-
dents?

Ms. POINDEXTER. I would say that one of the assessments when-
ever  Genentech  is  looking  at  a  future  site  is  around  the  academic
surroundings because we do recognize that that is where a portion
of  the  workforce  would  come  from.  I  would  just  kind  of  respond  to
a  portion  of  your  answer  with  one  our  area  of  focus  is  also  to  en-
sure that those who may not be quite at that point for the two-year
degree  programs,  we  also  have  a  partnership  for  a  bridge  for  the
purpose  of  being  able  to  expose  students  to  the  two-year  degree
program before they actually go into a biotechnology certificate pro-
gram.  And  that  kind  of  addresses  looking  at  how  we  are  reaching
down to students who are at the at-risk level.

So  I  would  say  that,  you  know,  that  when  we  are  looking  at  fu-
ture  manufacturing  sites,  one  of  the  factors  is  looking  at  the  edu-
cation  system,  both  at  a  two-year,  advance  level,  as  well  as  with
research institutions in the area.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you.
Ms. POINDEXTER. You are welcome.
Mr. MCNERNEY. I yield back.
Chairman  BAIRD.  I  thank  the  gentleman.  Mr.  Miller,  five  min-

utes.

Mr.  MILLER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Undoubtedly,  I  am  not
a Member of the Subcommittee, but this is a topic of great interest
to me. Community colleges, nationally, are hugely important to the
American worker: 11 or 12 million Americans a year enroll in com-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

munity  college  courses.  But  it  is  even  more  important  in  North
Carolina. I am sure you know that, Dr. Pumphrey.

Eight-hundred thousand students are enrolled in community col-
lege courses in any given year. It is one in eight adult North Caro-
linians.  And  it  is  sometimes  very  specifically  tailored  to  job  needs.
I know that Dr. Pumphrey and Dr. Fonash have cautioned against
programs  that  are  too  neatly  tailored  to  job  need,  but  Waite  Tech-
nical  Community  College  has  an  extrusion  campus  to  teach  skills
used  in  the  extrusion  industry—extrusion  is  a  process  of  pulling
soft  plastic  and  letting  it  harden  in  different  shapes—in  an  area
where  there  are  30  or  40  manufacturers  using  that  technology
within  a  20-mile  radius.  Alamance  Community  College  had  a  bio-
technology degree program, and the great majority are placed with
one employer, Labcorp, which is one of the leading medical testing
companies  in  the  Nation.  And  students  go  directly  to  work  from
that program.

And  I  could  go  on.  There  are  lots  and  lots  of  curricula  that  are
specific  to  a  particular  community  college  in  North  Carolina  that
are tailored to a specific industry that is concentrated there, either
a  single  employer  or  concentration  industry,  and  it  becomes  kind
of a mutual draw of industry to the area because of the community
college programs and the prevalence of jobs, the availability of jobs
in that area.

Ms. Poindexter, from the employer’s standpoint, how should that
balance  be  struck?  How  important  is  it  that  the  skills  of  the  em-
ployee  come  almost  to  the  point  of  being  ready  to  go  to  work  the
first  day,  and  how  much  of  it  should  really  be  taught  at  the  work-
place  by  the  employer,  based  upon  a  more  general-understanding
education  or  job-skills  training  provided  at  the  community  college.
Ms.  POINDEXTER.  Right.  I  think  more  importantly,  as  far  as  for
the focus for the specific skills that are needed, I think that is just
to  get  the  students  into  the  door,  to  start  off  a  career  path.  And
once  they  get  into  a  company  like  a  Genentech,  that  is  where  we
would  provide  them  with  the  necessary  skills  to  take  them  to  the
next level. But when we are looking at the specific technical skills,
that’s what is lacking, so in order for the students to even have an
opportunity  to  get  into  the  manufacturing  industry,  it  is  the  base-
line exposure of what it is like to be working in a highly-regulated
FDA  environment,  and  so  that  is  something  that  I  think  it  does
need  to  be  specific  to  a  point  that  in  certain  aspects  you  do  want
creativity, but in other aspects of manufacturing, you don’t want to
have  the  creativity.  So  to  have  the  full  knowledge  and  under-
standing of what this environment and what this career path leads
to,  I  think  the  more  specific  that  we  can  be  for  certain  niche-spe-
cific  areas  like  manufacturing  lab  ware,  glassware,  where  it  re-
quires  technical  capacity,  I  think  that  is  very  important.  But  once
they get into industry, that is where industry will actually provide
them  the  upgraded  skills  training  so  that  we  can  then  open  up
broader  opportunities  for  promotion  as  well  for  future  leadership
positions within the company, because I do think it is important to
have  some  technical  level  foundation  on  beginning  and  then  to
broaden out the horizons once they are in the industry.

Mr. MILLER. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

Mr.  Mittelstadt,  you  also,  from  the  employer’s  perspective,  what

is your perspective on that?

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  Well,  I  come  from  a  somewhat  different  per-
spective  because  I  went  to  a  small,  private  school  in  Flint,  Michi-
gan  called  General  Motors  Institute  for  my  undergraduate  degree,
so  I  fully  agree  with  Dr.  Fonash’s  comments  about  the  advantage
of having people who are working almost at the same time as they
are learning. I also agree it is really helpful to have as much tech-
nical background as you can from the school as possible, so you can
be the best employee you can be once you do start.

But all individuals are coming from different points of view, and
all  programs  are  coming  from  different  points  of  view.  So  I  guess
my  answer  is  in  a  sense  all  of  the  above.  It  works  very  well  in
Alamance  where  you  have  got  a  particular  employer  who  has  got
a  certain  set  of  requirements  and  probably  will  have  for  a  few
years,  but  maybe  not  for  decades.  Maybe  the  community  colleges
have  got  to  be  looking  at  what  is  coming  next  in  terms  of  the  fu-
ture.

But I think all of those things are important having those kinds
of  skills,  and  I  think  that  is  where  the  community  college  really
shines.  By  definition,  as  indicated  by  Dr.  Pumphrey,  their  demo-
graphics  are  more  experienced  people,  people  that  have  been  out
there that understand a little bit about what is going on in the real
world and see why they are doing what they are doing in the class-
room  and  where  it  is  going  to  apply.  And  I  think  ultimately,  you
are going to get better students as a result of that, and that is why
a  lot  of  our  member  companies  really  do  partner  extensively  with
community colleges because on average, those students in those in-
stitutions are motivated to really get some knowledge that they can
use for a career.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  thank  the  gentleman.  Dr.  Bartlett  is  recog-
nized. He will fill in the chair while Mr. Ehlers has a meeting with
some  constituents.  Thank  you  for  rejoining  us,  and  you  are  recog-
nized for five minutes if you have some questions.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  am  sorry  I  couldn’t  be
here for all of your testimony. In a former life, I taught for 12 years
at a community college, and so I am very familiar with community
colleges  and  how  well  they  work  with  the  businesses  in  the  area.
At  our  community  college,  we  would  offer  any  course  that  was  de-
sired  by  the  industrial  business  community  as  long  as  there  were
enough  students  to  make  it  a  defensible  thing  to  do.  And  there
were  some  times  when  we  started  small  with  the  hope  that  it
would  grow  so  that  next  year  we  would  have  enough  students  to
justify what we were doing this year.

The  working  relationship  between  our  community  colleges  and
the business around them is really exemplary. The community col-
lege right next to me in Washington County has a program to train
truck  drivers,  and  they  partner  with  Volvo  Power  Train,  which  we
used  to  call  MAC  truck,  and  they  have  provided  all  of  the  trucks
and  all  of  the  courses  for  training  these  truck  drivers.  That  is  a
pretty pedestrian kind of need, but it is one which is really needed,
as  you  may  see  from  the  back  of  trucks.  They  are  all  giving  a  1–
800 number. Please call. We have a job for you if you are qualified.
So there is a huge need there, and that probably is one of the most

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

pedestrian  things  that  I  can  think  of  that  community  colleges  are
doing,  but  it  is  a  really  necessary  thing.  If  you  got  it,  it  was  prob-
ably  brought  by  a  truck,  wasn’t  it?  And  without  truck  drivers,  it
is not going to get there.

But  the  big  problem  in  this  area  is  not  the  working  relationship
between our businesses and the community colleges, which is going
very  well.  The  big  problem  is  finding  enough  students  who  are  in-
terested in this kind of work. And as you know, there are many in-
dustries  that  tell  us  that  if  we  can’t  increase  the  number  of  immi-
grants who are coming in on temporary work visa to fill the needs
that they have, that they are moving their company overseas where
the workers are.

And at the same time, we have far too many of our people work-
ing  at  jobs  that  pay  far  less,  far  less  rewarding  than  if  they  were
in  these  areas.  How  can  we  inspire  our  young  people  to  be  more
interested  in  this?  It  is  a  matter  of  perception;  the  average  person
in  our  society  does  not  perceive  of  these  jobs  as  being  either  well
paying  or  rewarding.  And  another  thing  I  did  in  a  former  life  was
I built homes, and I will tell you that in many respects what I did
then  is  a  lot  more  satisfying  than  what  I  do  now.  They  will  little
know and long remember what we do here today, but if I built that
house right, in 100 years from now, it will still be there. And there
are a lot of rewards from this kind of work.

But  in  our  society,  we  don’t  perceive  these  as  being  desirable  or
rewarding  career  paths.  I  suggest  that  what  we  need  to  do  is  to
have  people  working  in  these  areas  come  to  the  school  and  to  the
PTA meetings with their W–2. These jobs really pay very well, and
they  are  very  rewarding.  And  as  you  know,  I  am  a  farm  boy  and
a  hands-on  kind  of  person,  and  I  will  tell  you  that  these  are  very
satisfying kinds of work.

And  what  can  we  do  so  that  we  have  more  of  our  young  people
and their parents as they sit around the dinner table talking about,
Junior,  what  are  you  going  to  do?  Why  don’t  you  look  at  one  of
these  technical  areas?  There  are  huge  needs  and  big  rewards.  But
that  is  not  what  the  average  parent  thinks.  How  can  we  change
that?

A society gets what it appreciates, and we really don’t appreciate

those people like we should, do we?

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  I  don’t  think  that  there  is  any  question  that
that is a major challenge, and it is a challenge that goes far beyond
any industry’s capacity to meet it. It is one of those challenges that
requires  what  I  call  intense  collaboration  between  industry,  edu-
cation, and yes, government. The media as well, but the media gets
influenced  by  all  three  of  those  constituencies,  and  you  folks  have
a major impact on the media. And when you go back on your cam-
paign  next  time,  talk  again  with  your  opponent  about  that.  What
are  you  going  to  do  about  this  problem?  Make  sure  they  under-
stand  what  Dr.  Fonash  indicated.  That  off-shoring,  for  the  most
part,  are  jobs  that  nobody  wants  to  do  anyway  because  they  are
those dumb, dirty, dangerous, dull, and disappearing—I would add
a  fifth  one—jobs  that  people  are  talking  about  all  the  time.  Those
are the jobs—you don’t want to protect those jobs. You want to get
people  interested  in  the  new  kinds  of  jobs  that  are  out  there,  but
it takes all of us working to really get that point across. Every time

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

we get a chance, we have to do it, no matter whom we are talking
with.

But if you can help us in terms of that, then maybe, you know—
we  used  to  say  in  Chevrolet  that  you  spilled  that  much  in  a  day,
right?  When  you  got  down  to  some  program  that  somebody  didn’t
want  to  do,  well,  gee,  you  know,  you  can  spill  that  much  in  a  day.
Well,  certainly  that  is  true  here  in  Washington.  There  must  be
some  place  somewhere  somehow  in  this  trillions-of-dollar-kind-of-
federal-government  situation  where  we  can  find  a  few  million  dol-
lars  to  help  get  that  message  across.  Maybe  it  is  an  academic  re-
search  project  that  says  how  you  do  it,  but  give  it  to  a  school  that
is known for applying that stuff too.

There  are  a  lot  of  challenges  there,  and  there  are  things  being
done, but it is never enough. I mentioned that Dream It Do It Pro-
gram.  It  is  aimed  at  that.  There  are  a  half  a  dozen  of  them  in  re-
gions  around  the  country  now,  doing  that  kind  of  thing,  trying  to
get that message across, but you can’t stop there. It has got to keep
going.

Mr. BARTLETT. Mr. Chairman, I was only half-joking when I said
we  ought  to  send  them  with  their  W–2.  We  have  people  in  all  of
these  skills  that  are  very  articulate.  We  need  to  search  them  out
and  we  need  to  give  them  incentives,  and  your  company  needs  to
really pay them, give them some time off, some compensatory time
to go out and pitch this because we have some very articulate peo-
ple  who  are  making  very  good  money.  Go  with  the  W–2  and  pitch
this thing, and you will turn people on, but you have to do it early
before they decide to become a lawyer or a political scientist. I tell
young  people  these  are  two  potentially  destructive  pursuits.  We
have  enough  of  each  of  those.  We  need  some  people  in  these  other
areas, don’t we?

Thank you all very much. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Bartlett.  I  am  going  to  take
this—I will recognize Mr. Bilbray in just a second—an opportunity
to  respond  to  Mr.  Mittelstadt  and  Dr.  Bartlett’s  comments  as  well
and  make  a  shameless  plug.  As  you  know,  in  the  Congress,  when
there  are  people  of  like  minds,  we  form  what  is  called  a  caucus,
and there are a host of different caucuses. Myself and Phil English
recently  established  the  bipartisan  career  and  technical  education
caucus.  And  I  would  welcome  your  input,  and  when  I  have  a
chance  to  ask  some  questions,  I  will  ask  about  that.  But  it  is  a
chance  to  do  precisely  what  Dr.  Bartlett  and  Mr.  Mittelstadt  are
talking  about.  My  goal  of  our  caucus,  one  of  them,  would  be  that
in the next presidential race, when presidential candidates are run-
ning  for  office,  they  don’t  simply  talk  about  making  a  college  edu-
cation affordable, but they add the words career and technical edu-
cation.

And  by  the  way,  I  will  share  this  with  people  on  both  sides  of
the  aisle  because  I  don’t  see  it  as  a  partisan  issue.  When  you  add
those two words, you expand your reach by a minimum of 17.4 mil-
lion people who are involved in career and tech education, and you
can  add  to  that  all  of  the  employers  who  recognize  the  need  for
these  employees.  So  we  will  reach  out  to  you  and  maybe  you  can
help us spread the word.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  on  that
because  a  lot  of  these  issues  need  to  get  in  that  campaign.  They
need  to  be  talking  about  these  things  at  the  national  level.  That
is how parents start thinking about it.

Chairman  BAIRD.  And  if  politicians  start  showing  it  respect  and

attention, it will expand that reach.

us.

Mr. Bilbray is recognized for five minutes. Thank you for joining

Mr. BILBRAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I appreciate it.
I  almost  have  to  look  at  my  family  where  all  three  girls  are  col-
lege  graduates  and  academic  achievers,  and  the  boys  took  after
dad, and let us just say, are trying to fill the middle-class spectrum
within the family. I guess that is what we are really talking about
here is the preservation of the middle class and retooling what the
middle class means, and sadly, it seems like the middle class is not
only not embraced, it is almost ridiculed. So much of the media and
TV shows we see is based on that.

My  question,  though,  is—and  Eric,  you  can  jump  into  it—I  say
where  do  we  go  in  government  in  our  intervention?  Do  we  send  a
bunch  of  government  people  out  to  talk  about,  you  know—let  us
face it. I think that the Walton Foundation has probably done more
than all of the governments in the country combined talking about,
you know, keeping kids in school, getting them to learn basic skills,
usable skills out in the real world, and I just wonder how much we
can  help.  And  maybe  our  emphasis  needs  to  be  stop  hurting  it  so
bad. I don’t know how far we shall get into it, but we have almost
created this illusion or this big lie that if you are not a white-collar
worker,  you  might  as  well  be  on  welfare  because  that  is  all  that
matters. You know, there is a level here and a level there.

I would ask you more not what does government do to move the
agenda, but what government can do to get the hell out of the way
and  aide  in  other  people  moving  the  agenda,  just  as  the  Ranking
Member  was  talking  about  actually  having  corporate  spokesmen,
not government spokesmen going out there.

And I will leave that open to any one of you to comment on.
Mr. MITTELSTADT. Well, let me start a little bit. I didn’t mean to
say  we  need  multibillion  dollar  programs.  We  maybe  need  a  little
bit  to  help  jumpstart  some  of  the  data  behind  this,  but  I  do  think
that you have a bully pulpit that you need to use because you peo-
ple are the ones that get people thinking about issues. That is what
you  do.  When  you  get  reelected,  you  go  through  a  campaign,  you
talk about issues—at least you try to. Sometimes it goes into other
things  too,  but  you  have  the  opportunity  to  get  that  message
across, and I think it is important to do that because it then flows
into  the  local  K–12  system.  You  have  got  school  board  members
that  are  responding  to  the  parents.  The  parents  have  to  begin  to
understand that. So there is a big communication problem here.

We  will  do  it  too.  Industry  certainly  wants  to  do  it,  and  most  of
my  members  exactly  agree  with  you.  Government  stay  away.  We
don’t  need  your  help,  except  when  it  is  this  or  that  or  the  other
thing for us, of course, but that is the American way of life, I guess.
But  I  think  it  is  more  than  money.  It  is  talking  about  it.  It  is  get-
ting the awareness of it because we are talking about an awareness
problem.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

Ms.  POINDEXTER.  I  would  like  to  add  just  a  couple  of  comments
to  that.  I  sit  on  the  State  of  California  Lifelong  Learning  com-
mittee, and some of the issues that we talk about are opportunities
where  government  can  influence,  pretty  much,  access  to  bio-
technology  or  even  access  to  innovative  technologies.  It  is  really
education around how to develop scalable programs.

In  some  of  the  comments,  we  were  looking  at,  and  I  think  they
were  talking  about  the  class  sizes  are  maybe  a  small  cohort,  but
if we have an industry that is high growth and high wage, and we
may not have professors or teachers that even understand what the
industry  is,  That  is  part  of  the  area  where  we  focus  on  educating
our teachers.

I did a lot of college on-campus recruiting, and you would not be-
lieve  when  we  go  to  the  college  campuses,  the  teachers  and  coun-
selors are the influences around, sometimes, where students go for
their next career or where they go for college and what majors they
have  in  college.  And  if  teachers  do  not  even  know  about
nanotechnology,  if  they  don’t  know  about  biotechnology,  then  that
limits the scope of where students can be tracked for a two-year or
four-year degree area.

The  challenge  or  opportunity  that  government  can  influence  is
helping  to  educate  industry  of  how  we  can  access  some  of  the  pro-
grams  and  how  we  can  partner  with  workforce  investment  boards
to  be  able  to  develop  just-in-time  workforce  partnerships  or  pro-
grams.  Sometimes  it  is  really  knowing  the  right  people,  but  also
knowing  how  to  utilize  certain  dollars  as  well  as  have  a  leverage
to  partnerships  within  the  county  or  local  workforce  investment
boards that would help us develop this future talent pipeline.

So  I  think  its  education  and  the  other  piece  of  it  is  looking  at
Congress or the government to use the technology of how people of
my  generation  learn  of  educational  programs  and  learn  how  to  ac-
cess programs.

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  I  would  echo  that  access  issue,  and  that  is
probably  administration  more  than  Congress,  but  it  is  something
that you might want to be talking to the respective agencies about.
Smaller  companies,  particularly,  and  there  are  over  300,000  small
and  medium-sized  manufacturers  in  this  country.  They  don’t  have
time  to  figure  out  what  program  they  can  go  to.  You  got  stuff  out
there  that  is  not  even  being  spent  because  people  don’t  have  the
ability  to  understand  and  access  it.  So  access  to  those  programs  is
an important feature.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  know  my  time  is  expired.  Let  me
just  say  as  somebody  who  comes  from  one  of  the  most  plugged-in
districts in the world, North San Diego County, that I will just tell
you  something.  I  think  if  you  want  to  look  around  at  educational
institutions  that  can  plug  people  in  one  way  or  the  other,  Fairfax
is  second  to  none.  They  start  early.  They  start  right  as  they  get
into high school and middle school, and it continues on through the
community college process. And I have got to give very high grades
to  a  little  county  in  Northern  Virginia.  I  think  they  are  second  to
none,  and  maybe  a  lot  of  what  we  can  get  is  just  listening  to  our
neighbors on the other side of the river.

It  is  almost—I  hate  to  take  the  cheap  shot,  but  it  is  almost  like
a  yin  and  yang  here  between  the  District’s  structure  and  Fairfax

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

structure, and culturally, we are not that far apart. But education-
ally  and  institutionally,  there  are  huge  gaps  there,  and  really,  I
think  it  would  be  beneficial  for  anybody  who  really  wants  to  talk
about  a  national  prototype  to  take  a  look  at  where  something
works  and  where  it  doesn’t  work,  right  across  the  river  from  this
little creek you call the Potomac.

Thank you very much, and I yield back.
Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Mr. Bilbray.
We  will  do  a  second  round  of  questioning,  and  this  is  a  chance
for us to follow up on some issues we haven’t touched base on, but
feel  free,  also,  if  there  is  something  you  feel  is  urgent  that  we
haven’t addressed.

One  of  the  questions  I  have  about  this  is,  my  understanding  of
some  of  the  high  technology  and  manufacturing—and  Mr.
Mittelstadt,  maybe  you  can  speak  particularly  to  this—is  that  if
we—that it sort of works like a bicycle pace line, if you ever watch
those  bicycle  races.  When  you  fall  off  that  pace  line,  you  are  done.
You can’t get back on it because you are out of the slipstream, and
once it goes, it just goes off without you.

And  I  have  been  talking  to  some  our  high-tech  manufacturers
back  home.  We  have  got  a  lot—Sharp  Microelectronics,  Hewlett
Packard  are  in  my  district.  Once  this  goes  offshore  or  leaves  our
borders, you lose the workforce with the feel for the process. If you
are  not  dealing  with  the  300  millimeter  wafers  somebody  else  is,
and all of the things that go with that, you lose. If you are not deal-
ing  with  the  day-to-day  process  of  producing  a  genetically  engi-
neered  pharmaceutical  or  bio-ceutical,  you  lose  that  feel  and  you
lost that feedback mechanism, plus you lost your personnel. People
will go somewhere else. And the hard part is getting back on that.
And  I  am  particularly  interested  in  knowing  if  that  is  of  concern
to you folks, because you can’t just keep generating new pace lines.
You  have  got  to  somehow  stay  in  that.  If  you  fall  off  the  training
loop, what happens? And how do we not have that happen?

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  You  are  right.  That  is  difficult  for  companies
to  come  back  under  those  circumstances.  I  am  sure,  there  are  ex-
amples of them having done it, however. We have seen some exam-
ples  of  people  who  have  off-shored  and  then  brought  it  back,  and
yes, had a difficult problem doing it but were able to because of lots
of other factors. You can’t give up just because it is a problem.

More  importantly,  we  are  trying  to  get  more  and  more  smaller
companies to understand that there are lots of techniques that they
use  on  a  day-to-day  basis  that  don’t  require  all  kinds  of  resources
that  allow  them  to  compete.  And  we  often  use  an  example  of  a
small  company  in  North  Aurora,  Illinois  that  basically  was  sup-
plying  flywheels  to  a  major  construction  equipment  manufacturer.
They were the sole-source. They got told by the major company, ei-
ther  meet  the  Chinese  price,  or  you  will  lose  the  business.  The  fa-
ther  called  the  two  sons  in  and  said,  look,  I  am  going  to  retire  in
three or four year, if you don’t figure out how to solve the problem,
you  don’t  have  anything  for  your  future,  so  they  figured  out  how
to  solve  it.  And  they  did  it.  They  made  it  happen.  They  looked  at
what they needed to do with automation, with 6 Sigma quality con-
trol,  training  their  workers,  doing  all  kinds  of  things.  A  hundred-
person  company,  they  wound  up  meeting  the  price,  even  though  it

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

didn’t  include  all  of  the  other  things  that  go  along  with  it,  it  was
just  labor,  material,  and  freight.  It  didn’t  include  all  of  the  other
stuff  about  how  the  customer  had  to  do  all  of  the  quality  things
and  educate  the  Chinese  workforce,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  They  still
met it. And they wound up expanding their business and qualifying
for  other  work  with  other  companies.  And  there  are  hundreds,  if
not  thousands  of  examples  like  that,  but  it  takes  an  awareness  on
the part of people to exercise that leadership.

And here again, that bully pulpit is important. It is important for
folks  that  are  in  the  public  domain  to  be  talking  about  that.  And
maybe  I  am  overemphasizing  that,  but  the  media  listens  to  politi-
cians.  They  don’t  listen  to  companies.  They  don’t  listen  to,  maybe
even  educators,  as  much  as  we  would  like  them  to,  but  they  cover
your  campaigns,  and  if  you  can  talk  about  these  kinds  of  things
and  get  that  kind  of  ability  to  influence  the  media,  I  think  it  will
help. We will work with you in terms of anything we can do to help
make it happen.

Chairman BAIRD. Are there others who want to comment on that

Dr. Fonash.
Dr.  FONASH.  Yes,  if  I  may  comment,  I  think  that  once  you  fall
of  that  pace,  you  are  off  the  pace,  and  I  think  the  only  answer  to
is it to create a new line. And instead of making chips, for example,
you  should  turn  to  something  like  self-assembly  for  transistors  or
the  kinds  of  things  that  people  are  exploring  with  nanotechnology.
That  is  what  I  believe.  I  believe  that  these  races  will  go  off,  but
you  have  to  create  a  new  game,  a  new  race,  and  I  think  you  have
to  do  that  all  of  the  time,  and  you  have  to  have  the  technology
workforce  that  is  capable  of  staying  up  with  that  kind  of  a  pace.
I  think  the  pace  is  there.  I  think  it  is  only  going  to  get  faster.
Chairman  BAIRD.  That  will  carry  certain  problems  with  our  col-

leges, I would imagine, to keep up.

issue?

Dr. Pumphrey.
Dr. PUMPHREY. Maybe I am not as sanguine about our prospects
as  my  colleagues.  I  had  an  interesting  personal  experience.  I  at-
tended a departmental graduation for my daughter at North Caro-
lina State University in December of 2005. It was in the college of
textiles and that is certainly a manufacturing industry that is em-
ploying high technology today. It was a December graduation, so it
was fairly small, three dozen baccalaureate graduates. Probably 80
percent  of  the  graduates  from  North  Carolina  and  Virginia,  12
Master’s  degree  candidates,  half  of  them  from  the  United  States;
seven Ph.D. candidates, one of them from the United States.

These folks are being educated, not just so they can manage pro-
duction lines, but the work that gets designed in the United States.
They  are  going  to  take  the  competition  to  a  higher  level,  clearly,
with  the  expertise  they  get  in  our  research  universities,  so  I  think
the  race  gets  faster  which  makes  it  even  more  problematic  if  you
fall out of line.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Ms.  Poindexter,  do  you  want  to  add  a  com-

Ms. POINDEXTER. I would just say in relation to the two-year de-
gree,  when  looking  at  international,  we  are  really  looking  at  our
local  pool  to  keep  and  maintain  from  the  local  community  colleges

ment?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

and our local communities where we have our manufacturing facili-
ties.  So  that  is  where  it  makes  sense  for  us  to  keep  our  workforce
local, especially relating to the two-year-degree areas.

Chairman BAIRD. Back to Mr. Bilbray’s comments: we sure want
to  make  sure  we 
incentivize  you  to  stay  there  and  don’t
disincentivize  you  in  a  way  that  would  motivate  you  to  locate  off-
shore.  We  are  glad  that  you  are  committed  to  keeping  the  local
manufacturing and education base.

Mr. Miller.
Mr.  MILLER.  Yes,  thank  you.  A  couple  things,  first  of  all,  Mr.
Chairman, on the subject of Congressional caucuses that are perti-
nent to this committee hearing, I will trump your career and tech-
nical education caucus——

Chairman  BAIRD.  My  switch  that  shuts  off  his  mic,  where  is  it?
Mr. MILLER. Three years ago, I started a community college cau-
cus,  and  I  will  happily  join  your  career  and  technical  education
caucus,  and  would  welcome  you  in  the  community  college  caucus.

Dr. Pumphrey, does your daughter still live in Raleigh?
Dr.  PUMPHREY.  No,  sir,  she  lives  in  Wilmington  and  works  for  a

prominent textile corporation.

Mr. MILLER. Okay. I was going to ask that you mention my name

to her.

I  disagree  with  one  of  the  points  made,  and  that  is  the
outsourcing of jobs, the jobs that we are losing, are jobs that Amer-
icans  don’t  want,  they  are  dark,  dirty—whatever  the  alliteration
was—and  by  reference,  less  skilled  and  poorly  paid.  Now,  I  agree
that  this  country’s  economic  future  cannot  be  unskilled  jobs  in
labor-intensive  industries.  But  we  are  losing  very  sophisticated
jobs.

Dr.  Fonash,  you  said  that  at  least  the  jobs  were  pausing  in  the
United States, but once the industries became mature, they moved
onto somewhere else. My observation is that more and more manu-
facturing  processes  or  products  are  going,  even  those  developed
from American research, are going to other places from the outset.
And  I  am  not  convinced,  either,  that  American  workers,  although
highly skilled, working hard to develop skill and we have had wave
after  wave  of  job  loss.  If  you  visit  a  textile  factory  now,  it  is  not
like  the  Sally  Field  movie.  Those  are  very  sophisticated  operation
with very sophisticated machinery, and we are still losing the jobs.
And  North  Carolina’s  experience  is  particularly  intense.  I  think
we are second only to Michigan in the percentage of manufacturing
jobs  that  we  have  lost,  per  capita.  And  North  Carolina  workers
work  hard  and  will  go  back  to  community  colleges  and  community
colleges  are  not  a  secret.  They  know  they  are  there.  And  still  we
are  losing  jobs,  and  the  jobs  we  have  are  not  paying  anything  like
the value that those employees are adding through their skills.

I know that the typical answer to what we need to do about pro-
tecting  American  jobs  is  improve  the  jobs  skills  of  our  workforce.
Our  workers  are  working  hard  to  try  to  maintain  current  skills,
and  we  are  still  losing  jobs,  and  the  jobs  we  have  are  not  being
compensated, even in a way to keep up with inflation.

What else do we need to be doing?
Dr. FONASH. Well, I don’t see any way of getting out of the game.
The  game  is  innovate  or  perish,  and  I  see  no  way  of  getting  out

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

of the game. We used to have terrible wars, and people would mur-
der  each  other  in  the  millions.  Today,  we  have  wars,  but  they  are
much more sophisticated. They are economic, and the only answer,
the  only  defense  is  innovation,  innovation,  innovation.  I  think  you
have  to  do  that  in  education  also.  I  think  the  jobs  will  constantly
get more sophisticated. I think the pressures on education will con-
stantly  get  more  severe,  but  I  see  no  end  to  the  game.  That  is  the
game.  I  prefer  it  to  the  game  that  we  had  before,  but  it  is  an  ex-
tremely difficult game.

Mr.  MILLER.  And  again,  I  am  not  suggesting  that  we  are  going
to  protect  unskilled  jobs  or  relatively  unskilled  jobs  in  labor-inten-
sive industries.

Does  anyone  else  have  an  answer  to  what  else  we  can  be  doing
other  than  we  are  simply  stuck  in  a  desperately  competitive  inter-
national marketplace, and we can’t affect it?

Ms. POINDEXTER. I mean I would just submit the question or the
statement  that  if  we  continue  to  do  the  same  thing,  we  are  going
to  get  the  same  result.  And  if  we  look  at  where  we  are  today,  we
have  21st  technologies.  Genentech  is  an  example  of  technology  in
the 21st century.

The  question  I  would  ask  you  all  is  is  our  education  system  in

the 21st century?

Mr.  MITTELSTADT.  I  think  that  is  a  legitimate  question  as  well,
but I understand your concern. I happen to live in Allen Davidson,
North  Carolina,  near  Charlotte,  so  I  am  not  quite  in  your  district,
I guess, but at least I am in the state, and there are some tremen-
dous  people  there,  and  they  are  very  capable  of  things,  and  what
you  are  really  saying  is  that  they  are  upgrading  their  skills,  but
the jobs aren’t there yet. But you are doing some other things, too,
and unfortunately there is time lag. You have the research campus
that is going in in Canopolis, for example, where you are really try-
ing to do some things to invent new industries.

And  I  really  share  Dr.  Fonash’s  comment  that  in  the  macro-
sense, that is what is required. You have got to keep changing the
game.

I  have  a  cousin  who  just  passed  away  a  little  while  ago  at  104.
When she was in high school in the 19-teens, she would never have
imagined  millions  of  people  in  an  auto  industry.  In  the  40s,  she
couldn’t have imagined millions in a television industry; in the 50s,
maybe  millions  in  a  computer  industry;  and  in  the  70s,  biotech  or
whatever. We see nanotechnology and hydrogen now, but there are
more, and there have got to be more, and we have got to keep mov-
ing in that direction.

The problem is that what happens is there is what I call an inev-
itable  short-term  displacement  in  a  growing  economy,  and  that  is
where,  to  me,  government  comes  in.  You  have  got  to  be  really  cre-
ative  in  terms  of  how  you  can  handle  those  short-term  displace-
ments,  how  you  can  do  the  things  you  do.  People  don’t  want  to
move  from  where  they  are,  but  maybe  that  is  where  the  jobs  are.
At the same time, as we have said recently, we have got a shortage
of  millions  of  engineers.  Well,  we  have  got  engineers  laid  off  all
over the country, but the ones that are laid off don’t want to go to
where  the  jobs  are,  where  the  shortages  are.  And  that  is  human
nature. They have got that right, obviously.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

So  one  of  my  experiences  was  to  be  the  managing  director  of
GM’s  smallest  but  best  plant  in  Uruguay  in  South  America.  One
of  the  things  I  learned—it  was  a  very  small  country—it  is  a  tough
damn job to run a country. And that is the jobs you folks have got.
And  if  there  is  anything  we  can  do  to  help  you  figure  out  how  to
creatively  get  at  these  things,  we  sure  want  to  do  it.  It  is  a  tough
job,  because  exactly  what  you  are  saying  is  going  to  happen  until
some  of  that  research  comes  out  of  some  of  those  universities  you
have  got  in  North  Carolina,  the  research  institutes  you  have  got,
things  that  can  provide  local  jobs  that  are  going  to  start  there  for
the people that are there and don’t want to leave there.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Mr. Mittelstadt.
Mr. Bilbray.
Mr. BILBRAY. Mr. Chairman, I want to apologize because we real-
ly are talking about a bigger picture. We are talking about how you
can’t separate the education institutions from the business institu-
tions  from  the  governmental  institutions,  and  my  colleagues  here,
I  think  are,  you  know,  very  much  predisposed  to  bipartisan  co-
operation.

If  I  could  just  point  out  that  one  of  the  things  that  scares  me  to
death, and I don’t think we talk about enough here in Washington,
is what can we do when it comes down to the type of benefits two-
year institutions don’t get, especially from endowments. You know,
it  is  nonexistent  for  two-year  institutions,  and  you  get  a  lot  of  the
stuff  we  talk  about,  huge  resources  coming  out  of  the  private  sec-
tor, to go into the wealthiest of the wealthiest of the population and
their educational institutions, but in the blue-collar neighborhoods,
and the two-year institutions like where I went, it is no way in the
world would you ever get any of that.

It is a challenge, and I am not saying we can correct it here, but
Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  just  like  to  remind  all  of  us  that  when  we
talk about competitiveness, do you realize that the Federal Govern-
ment  is  operating  a  tax  structure  100  years  old,  based  on  the  con-
cept  that  our  borders  would  be  locked  tight  by  tariffs,  and  we  are
still  operating  off  of  a  system  that  creates  a  situation  to  where
somebody  in  Australia  or  China  can  make  a  product,  the  product
is not even taxed in their country, imported into the United States
and  sold  tax-free,  where  if  you  make  the  same  product  in  the
United  States,  it  is  taxed  on  its  labor  and  on  its  capital,  and  then
it is supposed to be competitive.

My  family  emigrated  out  of  two  parts  of  the  world,  one  out  of
North Carolina, with the Boone family in 1790, but also from Aus-
tralia.  My  cousins  come  in  from  Australia,  and  they  say,  darn
Brian,  do  you  realize  that  a  Miata  in  Australia  is  more  expensive
than a Miata in California or in the United States. I say, of course,
because  they  put  the  tax  on  at  the  sales  level,  so  they  are  able  to
sell  their  product,  and  their  workers  are  able  to  compete  in  the
world  market,  where  we  have  almost  tied  this  millstone  around
your neck, saying you have got to drag this around.

And  I  know  this  is  off  the  subject,  but  I  just  think  we  need  to
really  look  at  ourselves.  When  you  say  what  can  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment do, be brave enough to start thinking about redoing stuff.
We  destroyed  one  little  industry  that  was  a  cottage  industry,  the
manufacturing  of  quality  arrows  for  archery.  We  put  a  12  percent

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

tax on all of the components, and what we didn’t realize is that we
were  making  it  tax-free  to  import  assembled  arrows  into  the
United  States,  and  it  was  12  percent  to  produce  an  arrow  in  the
United  States.  Guess  how  many  businesses  manufacture  arrows,
today,  in  the  United  States.  Only  one.  Thirteen  of  them  left  the
country,  and  we  can’t  blame  the  industry  for  doing  that.  We  can
blame  lack  of  trained  personnel  and  everything  else,  but  what  we
have got to do is blame ourselves here in Washington that we man-
dated that those jobs are exported.

So I just ask that when we talk about the educational challenges
or  whatever,  we  also  look  at  what  harm  are  we  doing  here  in
Washington.  And  I  hope,  openly,  as  a  leader  of  the  majority,  there
is  a  frank  discussion  about  do  we  want  to  continue  with  this  con-
cept?  Are  we  so  obsessed  with  redistributing  the  wealth  and  shift
and  shaft  and  the  taxation,  or  do  we  go  the  basis  of  let  us  look
more  at,  like  at  other  countries,  the  consumption  tax  so  our  prod-
ucts  are  not  taxed  just  because  they  are  made  here  in  the  United
States,  that  they  have  equal  competition,  not  just  here  in  the
United States, but overseas.

And  I  think  when  we  talk  about  jobs,  we  can’t  separate  it  from,
and—comments  from  the  panel.  I  apologize  for  ranting  on  and  on.
Ms.  POINDEXTER.  You  bring  up  a  very  good  point,  and  the  one
point  that  probably  has  not  been  discussed  is  sustainability  for
these  programs.  And  I  think  the  representatives  from  the  colleges
probably  would  agree  that  when  we  are  looking  at  sustainability
across  the  board  it  is  when  money  comes  into  the  programs,  espe-
cially  to  the  local  community  colleges,  what  is  put  in  place  after
those quick-start dollars, those CTE dollars, go away?

The biotechnology industry was started 31 years ago. How much
money  is  going  to  be  able  to  sustain  the  biotechnology  industry  30
years  from  now,  if  this  quick-start  money  goes  away  or  if  con-
tinuing education dollars go away or if programs that were in exist-
ence five years ago to reach out to students that are tying to come
into  the  two-year  and  go  to  the  four-year—what  are  we  looking  at
from a sustainability perspective?

And so I think if I were to bring anything forward, it would real-
ly be to look at, when you are looking at legislation, and when you
are  looking  at  funding  certain  programs,  look  at  not  just  the  here
and  now,  but  look  at  the  entire  industry,  five  to  ten,  15,  20  years
out, because what I hear from community college professors, every-
thing is tied to enrollment of student and then how long their fund-
ing  is  going  to  last.  When  the  funding  is  gone,  the  program  goes
away, and then that impacts industry.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  ask  for  unanimous  consent

for one more question?

Chairman BAIRD. Certainly.
Mr.  BILBRAY.  The  H1–B  program  has  a  program  that  brings  in
skilled  technical  people  into  the  country.  But  what  a  lot  of  people
don’t  know  is  it  requires  that  there  be  a  fee  paid  to  go  into  a  pool
to  help  address  the  fact  that  when  we  need  to  import  certain  tal-
ents,  it  is  a  sign  of  deficiency,  and  this  is  where  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment  really  has  the  responsibility  to  get  involved  in  education,
when we have to modify your immigration policy because of the de-
ficiency.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

Where is that money going? Do any of you know if it is being in-

tegrated into the educational institution effectively? Go ahead.

Dr.  PUMPHREY.  Yes,  sir.  When  I  was  President  of  Bellingham
Technical  College,  we  shared  $200,000  of  an  H1–B  grant  with
Everett  Community  college  in  Everett,  Washington  for  the  express
purpose of expanding the coverts of radiologic technologists that we
were training in a consortium.

Mr. BILBRAY. And your opinion about the program expandability?

Or any editorial note?

Dr.  PUMPHREY.  It  clearly  helped  us  expand  the  program,  but  it
was  not  permanent  money,  so  when  that  runs  out,  you  are  where
you started, essentially.

Mr. BILBRAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Yes,  I  would  just  point  out  that  the  amount,
if I am not mistaken, for H1–B is about $1,500 per application, and
some  recent  studies  have  suggested  that  there  is  significant—in
spite  of  the  intended  law,  a  significant  pay  differential  between
H1–B  visa  recipients  and  non-H1–B,  in  other  words,  U.S.  employ-
ees. And one of the things I have tried to advocate is that my own
belief  is  that  we  ought  to  tie  H1–B  number  increases  to  evidence
that  the  employer  requesting  the  H1–B  has  demonstrated  a  com-
mitment  to  local  education.  So  in  a  case  like  Genentech,  if  they
have  developed  the  kind  of  programs  that  they  have,  they  would
get to go to the front of the queue, in terms of asking for more H1–
Bs,  because  they  have  demonstrated  a  commitment  to  educating
the U.S. workforce.

I  have  got  a  problem  in  my  district.  I  have  got  some  innovative
companies  putting  their  Ph.D.  level  MS  level  engineers  into  the
schools, trying to create mentorship programs, and there are other
companies  sitting  by  the  side  doing  nothing.  They  can’t  get  them
involved,  and  these  are  some  reputable  companies,  and  they  have
just  said,  look,  that  is  somebody  else’s  business.  My  belief  is  that
businesses  and  industries  that  have  made  it  their  business  to  try
to  educate  the  workforce  of  tomorrow  among  the  U.S.  students
should  have  priority  in  the  queue.  If  they  do  need  H1–Bs,  I  am  a
whole  lot  more  sympathetic  if  they  can  say  these  are  all  of  the
things  we  have  done  to  educate  the  U.S.  workforce;  we  still  need
some  outside  workers,  versus  the  company  that  said,  we  haven’t
done  anything  substantive  except  pay  our  little  fee.  Those  folks  go
to the back of the queue.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Well,  I  think  we  may  want  to  look  at  that  fee  and
how  it  is  directed  because,  let  us  face  it,  in  two  to  four  days,  all
of the H1–B applications are taken up, so obviously the market can
bear more burden—and I know I have got a lot of high-tech compa-
nies  that  will  kill  me  for  this—but  anybody  in  the  private  sector
would  say  that  if  you  put  something  out  to  bid,  and  you  have  sold
for  the  year  within  four  days,  they  would  tell  you  are  selling  your
own feet.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  would  agree  with  that  entirely.  And  the  way
I would like to see that bid increase is not just monetarily but com-
mitment  to  education,  because  just  paying  the  money  and  then
making  schools  grants  is  a  little—I  think  that  is  one  way  to  do  it.
I would like to see some skin in the game from the local manufac-
turers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Mr.  BILBRAY.  And  I  would  like  to  see  how  we  are  doing  in  over-

sight with the existing program, too.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Yes,  that  is  a  good  point.  Maybe  we  could  dis-

cuss that in this committee, actually. It might be appropriate.

Dr. Bartlett.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much.
Today we have been focusing on the challenge of attracting more
of  our  young  people,  I  guess,  generally,  to  go  into  these  technical
areas,  but  Dr.  Pumphrey  introduced  us  to  a  really  more  funda-
mental problem which shares some of the challenges we have been
addressing today.

When  you  noted,  sir,  that  out  of  eight  Ph.D.  candidates,  one  of
them  was  a  U.S.  citizen,  this  year  China  will  graduate  more
English-speaking  engineers  than  we  graduate  and  probably  half  of
our English-speaking engineers are Chinese students or somewhere
near that.

I worked eight years for IBM in another life, and we knew—and
this  was  way  back,  I  left  in  ’75,  so  that  puts  it  in  a  timeframe—
we  knew  at  IBM  that  unless  something  happened  in  our  country
that  we  were  going  to  lose  our  superiority  in  computers  to  Japan,
because  then,  Japan  was  turning  out  more,  and  at  least  as  good,
perhaps  better,  scientists,  mathematicians,  and  engineers  than  we
were,  and  there  was  no  way  that  we  could  continue  to  best  them
unless  we  turned  to  and  produced  more  high  quality  scientists,
mathematicians, and engineers.

Today,  of  course,  the  challenge  is  China.  I  was  stunned  when  I
was told that India’s equivalent to our MIT is probably superior to
ours  because  they  have  100  applicants  for  every  student  they  ac-
cept. It is not that we aren’t capable. We are the most creative, in-
novative  society  in  the  world.  But  a  society  gets  what  it  appre-
ciates, and we just do not, flat out, appreciate people in these tech-
nical,  scientific,  and  engineering  areas.  If  young  men  go  into  those
areas,  they  are  called  geeks  and  nerds.  If  they  make  good  grades,
then  pretty  girls  won’t  date  them.  And  a  really  bright  girl  plays
dumb  so  that  she  can  get  a  date.  You  know,  that  tells  you  there
is  something  really  wrong  with  the  society  in  which  this  kind  of
thing occurs.

And I suggest, panel, that we need a fundamental change in our
society. Society gets what it appreciates. And you watch the people
that  are  invited  to  the  White  House  and  slobbered  all  over.  It  is
not  academic  achievers.  It  is  people  from  Hollywood  and  people
from  the  sports  area.  And  I  don’t  know  how  to  get  that  funda-
mental  change,  but  we  are  at  serious  risk.  We  cannot  continue  to
be  the  world’s  premier  economic  power  and  the  world’s  premier
military  power  when  other  countries  are  turning  out  far  more  sci-
entists,  mathematicians,  and  engineers  that  are  as  well  trained  as
ours are.

This  is  a  huge,  huge  challenge,  and  our  future  as  a  premier  na-
tion depends upon how we address this. How do we change the cul-
ture so that pursuits in these areas are really appreciated because
we  are  not  going  to  get  the  scientists,  mathematicians,  and  engi-
neers, and there will be no new companies to which we need to at-
tract  these  technical  people  we  are  talking  about  today  if  we  don’t

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

turn out enough scientists, mathematicians, and engineers. How do
we change our society so that we really appreciate those people?

Dr.  FONASH.  If  I  may  attempt  an  answer  at  that:  I  don’t  know
how to change it, but I know that the mechanism is—I don’t know
how  to  actually  carry  out  the  mechanism,  but  the  mechanism  is
marketing.  I  look  at  CSI,  Crime  Scene  Investigation,  these  TV
shows. Now all of the kids want to be forensic scientists.

The  media  has  immense  control  over  middle  school  and  high
school kids. It shapes their thinking. You know, they want this be-
cause they were told they should have it. They want to be forensic
scientists  because  that  looks  pretty  cool  on  television.  Engineers
don’t  look  cool.  Scientists  don’t  look  cool.  The  media  doesn’t  depict
us  as  being  cool.  We  are,  as  you  say,  nerds,  geeks.  Something  has
to be done in the basic marketing. This whole culture runs on mar-
keting, and that is the area that has to be addressed, I believe.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  This  is  a
real challenge, and if we don’t collectively address this and succeed
in changing it, we face a pretty uphill role in the future.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Bartlett.
I  think  one  of  the  positive  things  about  the  high-tech  revolution
is that the nerds and geeks have done pretty well. And Dr. Bartlett
often raises this issues of pretty girls won’t date the guys with the
doctorate  degrees.  My  wife  is  right  fetching,  and  out  of  fairness,
she has got a Ph.D. as well.

But  I  want  to  thank  our  panelists  here  for  their  contributions
today,  for  their  insights.  The  record  will  remain  open  for  a  couple
of  weeks.  If  members  of  this  panel,  or  if  you  folks,  want  to  add
something  to  it,  by  all  means,  let  us  know,  and  I  think  we  have
got  good  grist  for  the  mill  here  now  as  we  work  for  things,  and  I
think,  equally  importantly,  some  very  good  models  for  how  things
are working.

And  one  of  the  things  we  have  said,  we  need  to  market  those
models  as  well  so  that  other  community  colleges,  other  industries,
can  follow  the  kinds  of  examples  of  Genentech  and  the  folks  Dr.
Fonash  and  Dr.  Pumphrey  and  spoke  about,  and  Mr.  Mittelstadt,
helping your members hear the kinds of examples we have got here
of  successes  where  the  manufacturers  themselves  and  the  indus-
tries themselves have worked with the community college. Frankly,
that  is  a  lot  faster  turnaround  than  the  appropriations  process.
Stick  around  the  next  few  days,  and  you  will  see  what  I  mean  by
that.

Thank  you  very  much.  And  with  that,  this  committee  is  ad-

journed. Thank you to the panel.

[Whereupon, at 4:45 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(63)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

Responses  by  Gerald  Pumphrey,  President,  South  Puget  Sound  Community  College

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Brian Baird
Q1. How  can  industry  assist  community  colleges  to  market  their  programs?  You
mentioned in your testimony that companies themselves are better than commu-
nity colleges at selling their jobs to potential employees. Could industry be doing
a better job at marketing to students?

A1. Workforce  and  labor  market  demand  issues  seem  to  be  ones  on  which  compa-
nies  within  an  industry  are  usually  willing  to  approach  collaboratively.  It  is  useful
to  jointly  develop,  fund,  and  implement  campaigns  to  educate  the  public  about  ca-
reer opportunities within an industry. Many colleges struggle with marketing costs,
particularly  at  the  level  of  individual  programs.  Funding  for  the  development  and
publication of electronic and print media that is tailored to the local college and em-
ployment opportunities in the companies it serves would be beneficial. Potential stu-
dents know that the college’s product is education, and they know that it is the em-
ployers  who  have  jobs  to  offer.  It  is  more  powerful  when  company  representatives
join  college  faculty  and/or  recruiters  when  they  visit  high  schools  and  recruitment
events.

There  are  many  wonderful  career  opportunities  in  technical  fields  that  have  very
little  public  visibility.  Visibility  matters.  Colleges  have  experienced  strong  enroll-
ment  in  culinary  and  forensic  programs  not  due  to  any  overwhelming  expansion  of
job openings, but due in large part to the visibility conferred by television program-
ming in recent years. Meanwhile, employment opportunities in servicing technically
sophisticated equipment and in manufacturing are going begging for qualified appli-
cants.  Industry-wide  approaches  to  elevating  the  visibility  of  these  jobs  and  the  re-
wards they provide is important; the colleges cannot do it alone.
Q2. Dr.  Fonash  talked  about  the  benefits  of  a  research  university  affiliation  in  his
testimony.  If  a  community  college  does  not  have  access  to  such  an  institution,
or the area of technical training is outside the purview of most universities, can
the National Science Foundation Advanced Technology Education (ATE) centers
provide local programs with similar guidance? In what aspect are program like
ATEs most useful?

A2. The NSF ATE program has been very useful in aggregating technical expertise,
developing and disseminating curriculum and instructional materials, and providing
expert consulting services to the colleges with similar programs. In many cases, they
have  been  instrumental  in  developing  skill  standards  that  bring  consistency  to  and
elevate the quality of training programs. In some cases, this has resulted in creden-
tials that promote the geographic mobility of program graduates. No doubt their im-
pact has been greatest in the colleges and communities where they are located, but
there have also been significant regional and national impacts from their work with
other colleges. There is no question the model has provided value.

The  model  shared  by  Dr.  Fonash,  based  on  his  work  with  the  Center  for
Nanotechnology  Education  and  Utilization  at  Pennsylvania  State  University,  in-
cludes an ATE Center. However, this model also has an explicit regional focus oper-
ationally  defined  as  the  State  of  Pennsylvania.  It  leverages  the  intellectual  capital
of a major research university and the advanced technology concentrated in the ATE
Center  by  a  formal  articulation  with  all  of  the  state’s  14  community  colleges.  The
students  spend  their  first  three  semesters  completing  relatively  inexpensive  aca-
demic  and  fairly  generic  technical  courses  in  their  home  communities.  They  spend
the  fourth  semester  in  a  deep  immersion  in  the  rich  nanotechnology  environment
afforded  by  the  center.  This  is  a  more  powerful  model  than  many  of  the  ATE  Cen-
ters  for  effecting  a  strong  regional  impact  and  for  the  intensity  of  involvement  of
students from outside the host institution. It will not be possible for all ATE Centers
to  develop  along  these  lines,  but  it  is  well  worth  emulating  where  it  is  possible  to
do so.

Questions submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. In your experience, has industry shown more interest in community colleges cre-

ating degree programs or certificate programs?

A1. In  my  experience,  which  I  would  characterize  as  being  insufficient  for  under-
standing  as  entirely  representative,  industry  has  shown  most  interest  in  two  types
of programs. The first is a short-term, highly customized program, usually delivered

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

on  site  in  conjunction  with  a  start-up,  relocation,  expansion,  or  adoption  of  a  new
technology. These are typically directed at new hires or at an existing group of em-
ployees  who  need  new  skills.  Most  often,  these  programs  do  not  result  in  academic
credit.

The  second  type  of  program  in  which  I  have  seen  a  lot  of  industry  interest  is  a
degree program, usually an Associate in Applied Science or equivalent degree. Com-
panies have often initiated discussions about this option at the same time they have
discussed  their  customized,  short-term  training  with  us.  Interest  in  the  degree  pro-
grams is often related to the development of a sustainable source of new employees
over  the  long-term  or  to  support  advancement  and  promotion  of  their  current  em-
ployees.  A  lot  of  this  interest  has  paralleled  the  evolution  of  organizational  models
that  devolve  responsibility  for  decision-making  and  quality  control  processes  to
front-line workers and their immediate supervisors.

I  have  seen  less  interest  in  certificate  programs,  even  in  cases  where  they  might
be sufficient or even more appropriate. Some of this may have to do with the value
employers may place on the ability to set and achieve longer-term goals rather than
the occupationally relevant content.
Q2. How  do  the  different  programs  affect  the  quality  of  opportunities  for  students?
A2. In  general,  the  more  relevant  programs  are  in  preparing  students  for  specific
and available employment positions, the better the opportunities will be for the stu-
dent  both  in  the  quality  of  the  education  they  receive  and  their  employment  pros-
pects  upon  graduation.  To  keep  programs  relevant,  colleges  must  at  a  minimum
maintain  an  ongoing  dialogue  with  the  industries  the  programs  support.  That  dia-
logue  serves  to  keep  curriculum  current,  define  professional  development  objectives
for the faculty, and apprise the college of the technology the students will encounter
upon employment. If the college has an effective partnership with the industry, the
industry  will  often  contribute  content  knowledge  to  inform  the  curriculum,  provide
training  or  return-to-industry  experiences  for  faculty,  and  assist  with  acquisition  of
current technology.

Graduates  who  have  benefited  from  this  participation  are  more  likely  to  possess
the  skills  expected  by  the  sponsoring  industry.  As  a  result,  their  employment  pros-
pects  are  enhanced.  Strong  relationships  between  a  college  and  the  employers  they
serve benefit all concerned, including students and taxpayers. Individual companies,
large and small, experience changes in fortunes. Over time, the most stable partner-
ships  involve  groups  of  similar  companies  within  an  industry  sector.  This  is  not  to
argue  against  strong  partnerships  with  individual  companies,  but  to  acknowledge
the  inherent  risks  to  sustainability  for  a  program  that  depends  on  a  single  sponsor
or partner.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Stephen  J.  Fonash,  Center  for  Nanotechnology  Education  and  Utiliza-

tion, Pennsylvania State University

Questions submitted by Chairman Brian Baird
Q1. In  your  testimony  you  note  that  community  colleges  are  often  not  well  equipped
to aggressively market their program to potential students. Have you seen indus-
try take an active role in marketing their technician and skilled production jobs
to  potential  employees?  Could  the  private  sector  companies  you  work  with  be
doing more to attract students to vital training programs?

A1. In general, community colleges do not effectively package or market their tech-
nical  programs.  Those  that  have  the  ability  to  offer  cutting  edge  technology  taught
by  knowledgeable  faculty  with  state-of-the-art  facilities,  and  that  have  pathways  in
place  to  four-year  degrees,  offer  potential  students  outstanding  value  and  oppor-
tunity.  Such  two  year  programs  offer  much  more  hands-on  access  to  ‘‘ ‘real’  equip-
ment  than  four-year  engineering  and  science  degrees  thereby  giving  students  a
meaningful  taste  of  what  it  is  like  to  work  in  a  technology  field  and  meaningful
skills  to  do  so  after  just  two  years  of  training.  This  immediate  immersion  and  the
chance for technical jobs after two years is very helpful to students who are not sure
if they want a career in science and technology and are ‘‘trying to find themselves.’’
They  can  immediately  get  a  ‘‘feel’’  for  what  these  careers  are  like  and  can  make
more informed decisions. The programs that have pathways in place to four-year de-
grees  also  offer  potential  students  the  opportunity,  if  they  so  choose,  of  a  lifetime
of learning possibilities. These advantages, opportunities, and possibilities could and
should  be  packaged  and  marketed  by  community  colleges  as  a  ‘‘two-year  degrees—
doors to a lifetime of opportunities’’ package. To make it all even better, this whole
package  of  opportunities  comes  with  a  tuition  price  tag  that  is  generally  much  less
than the tuition costs of the four-year institutions.

While community colleges do not market these opportunities well, industry cannot
be  expected  to  greatly  help  in  two-year  degree  marketing—either  by  assisting  the
colleges or through direct industry efforts. There are some exceptions. For example,
industry associations such as the Semiconductor Industry Association (SIA) and the
National  Association  of  Manufactures  (NAM)  do  conduct  marketing  efforts.  How-
ever,  individual  companies  face  enormous  competitive  pressures,  cannot  afford  to
aid  in  marketing  two-year  degree  programs,  and  must  focus  on  their  immediate
needs in order to stay in business. Industry understandably wants students with the
skills  required  to  meet  today’s  immediate  challenges,  which  means  that  they  want
students  to  learn  today’s  job  skills.  Unfortunately,  these  jobs—and  their  requisite
skills—may migrate out of the country by tomorrow. Educators need to compensate
for  this  by  making  sure  students  are  taught  career  skills  and  develop  a  realization
for the need for a lifetime of learning. Students have to develop a broad knowledge
base  for  their  ‘‘economic  survival’’  over  the  course  of  their  careers  and  they  must
learn  to  be  intellectually  ‘‘fast  on  their  feet’’  so  they  can  evolve  as  technology
evolves.

Although  industries  are  focused  on  surviving  in  today’s  international  markets,
they can be a very vital partner in the ‘‘education for a career approach.’’ They have
a  strong  sense  of  what  tomorrow  will  bring.  Consequently,  their  help  is  needed  by
educators  in  making  sure  curricula  for  the  ‘‘two-year  degrees—doors  to  a  lifetime
of  opportunities’’  package  continuously  develop  and  improve.  Since  the  economic
forces  industry  faces  will  not  allow  individual  companies  to  play  major  roles  in  de-
veloping and promoting educational opportunities, that burden must fall to industry
associations,  State  and  Federal  Government.  Among  these,  only  government  can
provide the stability, perspective, and resources needed to plan and educate beyond
this quarter’s needs.
Q2. In your testimony you state the benefits that accompany a tech-training program
paired  with  a  research  university.  For  community  colleges  without  access  to  a
university,  or  for  programs  outside  areas  of  interest  to  universities,  can  ATEs
serve a similar role as research universities?

A2. The  National  Science  Foundation’s  ATE  program  strives  to  make  sure  that
there  are  diminishing  numbers  of  community  colleges  without  access  to  a  research
university.  One  of  the  key  ways  that  the  ATE  program  is  doing  this  is  by  serving
as  a  catalyst  to  bring  together  community  colleges  and  research  institutions  to  (1)
share research university resources and expertise, (2) enable community college fac-
ulty  enrichment,  and  (3)  develop  new  two-year  to  four-year  degree  programs  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

pathways. It is very important to point out that, for this type of leveraging to work,
not  every  community  college  needs  to  be  directly  linked  to  a  research  university  in
its  locale.  New  and  effective  educational  programming  developed  by  an  ATE  center
or  project  is  quickly  disseminated  across  the  country  through  the  ATE  network.  As
an illustration, the concepts developed at ATE Center for Nanofabrication Manufac-
turing Education at Penn State are being leveraged by community colleges in more
than  20  states.  In  addition,  the  approaches  of  this  PA  ATE  center  are  being  ex-
tended beyond nanotechnology to include programs areas such as biotechnology, in-
formation science and technology, engineering technology, and others.

We would not suggest that ATE Centers can or should even try to provide commu-
nity  colleges  with  the  kinds  of  resources  that  research  universities  can.  However,
ATE centers and projects around the country are playing a crucial role in promoting
innovative  approaches  to  technical  education,  including  linkages  between  research
universities  and  community  colleges.  We  are  also  observing  a  growing  interest
among  research  universities  in  participating  in  these  kinds  of  partnerships.  Re-
search intensive Land Grant universities are particularly engaged because these ar-
rangements  help  them  fulfill  their  three-part  mission  of  education,  research,  and
service.  Research  universities  also  recognize  that  by  strengthening  community  col-
lege  technical  programs  and  creating  student  pathways  from  associate  to  bacca-
laureate  degrees,  the  universities  are  helping  to  develop  a  pool  of  qualified  future
upper division undergraduate and graduate students for their own programs, includ-
ing students from under-represented groups which community colleges often tend to
disproportionately serve. This is a win-win-win arrangement for community colleges,
research  universities,  and,  most  importantly,  students—an  arrangement  that  the
ATE program is helping to seed and promote through its centers and projects.
Q3. Can  you  please  describe  in  more  detail  the  career  pathway  programs  you  men-
tioned  in  your  testimony?  How  many  high  school  students  have  participated  in
these  programs 
for
Nanotechnology  Education  and  Utilization  affiliated  community  colleges  and
have you been able to track these students: What factors attract high school stu-
dents to a two-plus-two program?

for  advanced  manufacturing 

the  Center 

through 

immersion 

A3. The  PA  Nanofabrication  Manufacturing  Technology  Partnership  has  had  423
students  who  have  completed  the  capstone  semester  total 
in
nanotechnology  fabrication,  synthesis,  and  characterization.  Those  students  in  this
group that passed through since the establishing of our ATE center have been able
to  utilize  two  types  of  education  pathways:  the  two-year  degree  to  four-year  degree
(2+2) pathway and the high school/vo-tech school to the two-year degree to four year
degree  (2+2+2)  pathway.  Before  the  efforts  of  our  ATE  center,  there  were,  in  most
cases,  no  clear  2+2  pathways  from  two-year  to  four-year  degree  granting  schools  in
PA.  Today,  using  nanotechnology  as  a  coalescing  theme,  there  are  2+2  pathways
that  lead  from  all  22  nanotechnology  two-year  degrees  available  in  PA  to  four-year
degrees. These available four-year degrees are in engineering management, various
areas of engineering technology, biology with a nanotechnology concentration, chem-
istry  with  a  nanotechnology  concentration,  and  physics  with  a  nanotechnology  con-
centration. One can go to our web site at www.cneu.psu.edu, click on a specific two-
year degree site on the map provided, and immediately be given the available four-
year degrees set up for that specific two-year degree site.

The  high  school/vo-tech  school  2+2+2  nanotechnology-based  pathways  in  PA  that
have  resulted  from  the  efforts  of  our  ATE  center  currently  number  thirty-one.  The
factors  that  we  find  attract  high  school  students  to  2+2+2  nanotechnology-based
pathways  include:  (1)  the  opportunity  to  take  courses  at  a  community  college  cam-
pus,  (2)  access  to  community  college  facilities  (e.g.,  computers,  sports  facilities),  (3)
the  ability  to  get  community  college  credit  for  high  school  courses  in  cases  where
high school teachers are certified by the colleges, and (4) the ability to lighten their
college credit load.

The 2+2 and 2+2+2 pathways have been set up recently as part of our ATE activi-
ties; consequently our tracking data are limited. In a first survey taken in 2005, we
found  that  36  percent  of  the  students  were  continuing  their  degrees  past  the  two-
year  level.  However,  this  cohort  is  not  entirely  made  up  of  students  pursuing  2+2
programs  since  some  were  students  who  came  from  four-year  degree  programs.  A
survey aimed at more precise 2+2 data is currently underway.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

Responses  by  Eric  Mittelstadt,  CEO,  National  Council  for  Advance  Manufacturing

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Brian Baird
Q1a. The National Association of Manufacturers’ 2005 Skills Gap Report—A Survey
of  the  American  Manufacturing  Workforce  stated  that  80  percent  of  the  re-
spondents  to  the  study’s  survey  indicated  moderate  to  severe  difficulty  in  find-
ing  enough  qualified  personnel  for  their  manufacturing  business.  The  authors
of  the  study  state  that  the  majority  of  those  responding  to  this  survey  were
small and medium sized businesses, with 500 or fewer employees. In your opin-
ion,  is  the  workforce  shortage  concentrated  in  this  sector  of  the  manufacturing
industry?

A1a. Today  perhaps  yes,  but  as  more  baby-boomers  retire  it  is  clear  companies  of
all  sizes  face  the  problem.  Since  most  jobs  in  the  manufacturing  sector  are  found
in small and medium sized companies, this is where employers increasingly encoun-
ter  problems  in  recruiting  both  production  workers  and  technical  workers.  Both  of
these  require  increasingly  technical  knowledge  and  skills  as  manufacturers  of  all
sizes  use  more  advanced  processes,  equipment  and  methods  to  meet  the  challenges
of  the  hyper-competitive  global  economy  of  the  21st  century.  And,  in  fact,  this  is
true  in  all  industries,  not  just  manufacturing.  For  example,  health  care,  banking,
sales,  and  on  and  on,  are  all  utilizing  ever  more  advanced  technology  to  become
more  productive  in  the  competitive  global  economy  in  which  we  live.  This  says  the
shortage is or will be felt in all sectors and by all sizes of companies.
Q1b. What  distinct  challenges  do  small  and  mid-sized  manufacturers  face  in  work-

force development and how do they address these?

A1b. Since  many  small  and  medium  sized  manufacturers  lack  the  financial  or  pro-
fessional resources to develop focused recruitment programs to attract new workers,
they often must rely on ‘‘word of mouth’’ or newspaper advertising to find new work-
ers.  Since  they  also  do  not  have  resources  to  design  and  conduct  in-house  training
programs, most newly-hired workers are only given job orientation and some on-the-
job training by the company’s older workers. Again due to lack of resources to even
look  at  something  new,  only  rarely  do  the  small  and  medium  sized  companies  seek
help from One-Stops or WIBs, or other federal, State and local programs, preferring
to ‘‘do it the way we have always done it.’’

This suggests the necessity for new approaches by government to make such pro-
grams  easier  to  access  and  easier  to  use  for  companies  too  strapped  for  resources
to have the time to sort them out, so they can leverage their efforts and satisfy their
needs with the programs available.
Q2a. Dr.  Pumphrey  and  Dr.  Fonash  stated  in  their  testimony  that  community  col-
leges  typically  lack  the  resources  to  effectively  market  their  tech-training  pro-
grams. Could the private sector take more of an active role attracting potential
students  to  tech-training  and  ultimately  jobs  as  technicians  or  skilled  produc-
tion workers?

A2a. In  view  of  the  ‘‘rate  of  change’’  in  the  manufacturing  sector,  there  is  an  in-
creasing need for manufacturers to assume a greater role in working with post-sec-
ondary educators. Many technology-oriented companies already work with local com-
munity/technical  colleges  to  help  their  workers  as  well  as  future  job  candidates  ac-
quire the technical knowledge and skills the companies need to be productive, inno-
vative,  and  competitive  in  the  global  marketplace.  Where  smaller  manufacturers
have established close working relationships with community and technical colleges,
students hear about the more technical and better paying job openings and are more
responsive to job postings or ‘‘word of mouth’’ information.

The ‘‘Dream It—Do It’’ campaign approach developed by the National Association
of  Manufacturers  (NAM)  is  one  successful  approach  whereby  businesses  of  all  sizes
can work together with government and educators in an organized and accountable
way  to  get  the  message  across.  More  regions  around  the  country  should  be  using
this approach.

But  because  of  those  serious  resource  constraints  for  the  vast  majority  of  manu-
facturers mentioned above, companies, even working with educators, cannot do it by
themselves.  This  applies  to  community  colleges  as  well.  As  I  said  in  my  testimony,
Congressional and Presidential candidates, as well as State, regional and local can-
didates,  also  can  all  help  by  making  clear  the  national  need  for  qualified  people  in
the  promising  technician  and  skilled  production  jobs  of  today  and  the  future.  This

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

needs to become a recognized national priority, and in our nation that requires gov-
ernment  leaders  of  all  parties  to  work  hard  to  communicate  the  criticality  of  the
need  to  us  all.  That  includes  doing  so  in  political  campaigns,  where  media  pays  at-
tention to what candidates say, and reports on it to the public at large.
Q2b. What  type  of  initiatives  can  industry  take  to  professionalize  or  increase  the

prestige of these types of jobs?

A2b. Manufacturers seeking to attract students and/or new workers with ‘‘the right
technical  knowledge  and  skills’’  should  develop  continuing  relationships  with  post-
secondary  institutions  (community/technical  colleges,  colleges  and  universities  with
STEM-focused programs, and graduate level programs focusing on science and tech-
nology)  and  with  deans,  department  heads,  classroom  instructors,  counselors,  and
other staff in these institutions.

Small and medium sized manufacturers concerned about the availability of young,
entry-level  workers  should  develop  similar  working  relationships  with  local  high
schools and secondary-level technical schools and their teachers and staff to educate
students about the more technical and upwardly mobile career opportunities in their
companies.  Where  NAM’s  ‘‘Dream  It—Do  It’’  campaigns  are  operating,  manufactur-
ers should work closely with local program sponsors to inform high school adminis-
trators,  teachers  and  students  of  the  job  opportunities  available  in  their  companies
for graduates having the increasingly technical knowledge and skills needed in 21st
century manufacturing entities.
Q3. What would be the most effective measures industry could take to bridge the gap
between  industry’s  fast  paced  rate  of  change  and  the  inability  of  most  commu-
nity college tech-training programs to respond at a similar rate?

A3. Manufacturers  of  every  size  must  establish  ongoing  relationships  with  edu-
cators at all levels to make sure teachers, counselors, professors, and administrators
are familiar with the rapid changes occurring in their companies, the skills required
for  success  in  this  rapidly  changing  competitive  environment,  and  the  capabilities
required  to  succeed  in  the  challenging  new  jobs  in  manufacturing.  Manufacturers
must be willing to assign executives to work year-round on industry-education part-
nerships  at  the  post-secondary  and  secondary  levels. . .to  designate  team  leaders
and  supervisors  to  help  develop  community/technical  college  curricula  aimed  at
meeting the knowledge and skills needs of students preparing for jobs in the manu-
facturing  sector. . .to  ask  skilled  workers  to  participate  in  secondary  classroom
presentations about career opportunities in their companies.

Here  again  though,  especially  for  small  and  medium  sized  companies,  national
policy  needs  to  find  creative  ways  to  free  up  the  very  scarce  resources  and  time
those  companies  need  to  do  this  essential  task.  Examples  could  be  targeted  tax  re-
ductions  for  companies  that  participate  in  such  activities,  streamlined  regulatory
compliance  requirements  to  free  up  scarce  time  for  these  more  constructive  things,
etc. Innovation and creativity in government is as important as in industry and edu-
cation,  because  our  nation  is  competing  internationally  just  as  much  as  are  our  in-
dustries, our educational institutions and our workers.

Further,  national  policy  requires  that  government  at  all  levels  be  challenged  to
find  creative  ways  to  help  companies  of  all  sizes,  educators  at  all  levels,  workers
in  all  companies,  understand  the  importance  of  the  proper  technical  preparation  to
their  own  and  their  children’s  success.  We  live  in  a  world  where  technology  will  be
increasingly  critical  to  success  in  all  fields,  including  but  not  limited  to  manufac-
turing. Companies cannot do this by themselves. It must become a national priority
for  all  sectors  of  our  great  nation,  government,  companies,  educators,  workers,  par-
ents, everyone, if we hope to get this vital message across. This is the only way we
can continue to enjoy the highest standard of living in the world and to be a world
power in this century and on into the future, given that we will never have as many
people as some other nations, India and China being only the most visible now.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Monica  L.  Poindexter,  Associate  Director,  Corporate  Diversity,

Genentech, Incorporated

Questions submitted by Chairman Brian Baird
Q1. You stated in your testimony that one of the biggest challenges Genentech faced
when  developing  its  partnership  training  programs  was  meeting  the  company’s
‘‘just-in-time’’  workforce  needs.  How  did  you  address  this  challenge?  How  did
your company balance Genentech’s fast paced needs with the community colleges’
more deliberative nature and structure, as well as with industry’s growing desire
for more versatile employees?

A1. During  the  early  part  of  2000,  the  Genentech  College  Programs  department
partnered  with  managers  in  our  company’s  manufacturing  department  to  assess
what  their  future  hiring  needs  were  and  determine  how  to  secure  skilled  workers
for  those  jobs.  From  those  early  meetings  a  Manufacturing  Task  Force  was  formed
to address where and how we would create the necessary talent pool. We identified
the number of positions we would need over the next 18–24 months and joined with
our  community  college  partners  to  develop  a  plan  to  market,  screen,  interview,  en-
roll and graduate students out of the 14-week certificate program. Graduates of the
program  were  then  offered  interviews  for  Paid  Work  Experience  co-op  slots  at
Genentech.

To meet our continuing need for skilled workers we worked with the participating
schools  to  increase  the  number  of  students  participating  in  these  programs.  As
Genentech’s  hiring  needs  have  periodically  decreased  we  have  worked  with  the
schools  to  explore  job  opportunities  for  the  students  at  other  biotechnology  compa-
nies in the area.

The  nature  of  the  program  we  developed  with  the  schools  produced  workers  with
a versatile set of skills well-suited to biotech manufacturing. Since the program was
developed in a cooperative manner between industry and academia, students receive
not  just  academic  training  but  also  hands-on  experience  that  prepares  them  to  be
useful employees.
Q2. In your testimony you talked about the need for long-term planning when devel-
oping  tech-training  programs,  especially  around  issues  of  funding  and  sustain-
ability.  How  can  industry,  government  and  academia  best  work  together  to  de-
velop and sustain tech-training programs?

A2. There  is  a  great  need  for  industries  like  biotechnology  to  have  well-trained,
highly  skilled  workers  available  to  operate  our  manufacturing  facilities.  Programs
like the ones we have developed with local community colleges are an important ele-
ment  of  ensuring  that  a  trained  workforce  is  available.  But  we  cannot  depend  on
these  programs  alone  to  provide  the  workforce  we  will  need  in  the  21st  Century.
Too many of our students fail to receive the basic education necessary to prepare
them for work in the leading 21st Century industries. A greater focus on math and
science education, as well as more opportunities for specialized skill training, would
help  to  provide  students  with  usable  skills.  I  also  believe  the  Federal  Government
needs to provide long-term funding streams for career technical programs to develop
the future skill sets needed to support high-wage and high-growth industries.

Congress should look at policies to create incentives for industry to co-create cur-
riculum  and  paid  work  experience  programs  not  just  for  students  but  for  teachers
as well. Skill and course upgrade programs are critical for the development of a fu-
ture workforce. Finally, Congress should also identify the attributes employers seek
in industries such as biotechnology and determine how well current career technical
education programs train students to meet those needs.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:47 Nov 11, 2007 Jkt 036000 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\061907\36000 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

